0 True ['Bogart'] The last name starting with 'B' of an uber-cool Hollywood icon that is also a verb meaning to hog something is "Bogart." Humphrey Bogart was a legendary actor known for his roles in classic films such as "Casablanca," "The Maltese Falcon," and "The African Queen." The term "bogart" as a verb means to hog or selfishly hold onto something, often a marijuana joint, which originated from Bogart's characteristic way of holding a cigarette in his films. This usage became popular in the 1960s, particularly within the counterculture.
1 True ['Fiji'] 70% of the population of Fiji lives on its largest island, Viti Levu. Fiji is indeed an archipelago with more than 300 islands, but Viti Levu is the most populous and economically significant island in the country. It is home to the capital city of Suva as well as other major urban centers such as Nadi, where the country's main international airport is located. The concentration of services, infrastructure, and economic opportunities on Viti Levu has historically drawn people to the island, contributing to the high percentage of the population that resides there.
2 True ['Calder'] The quote you're referring to encapsulates a forward-thinking perspective on the evolution of art, particularly sculpture. It suggests that the traditional notion of sculpture as a fixed, immobile form may be limiting and that there is potential for the art form to incorporate movement. This idea is not unique to the artist you're quoting; it reflects a broader trend in modern and contemporary art where artists have sought to challenge the boundaries of what is considered sculpture.

The concept of kinetic art, which emerged in the early 20th century, is a testament to this evolution. Kinetic sculptures are designed to move and often rely on motors, wind, water, or the interaction of the viewer to animate the piece. Artists like Alexander Calder with his mobiles, Jean Tinguely with his self-destructing machines, and George Rickey with his wind-driven works, are notable for their contributions to the realm of moving sculptures.

The quote also touches on the broader idea that art should not be confined to traditional mediums or static presentations. This philosophy can be seen in various art movements throughout the 20th century, including Dadaism, Surrealism, and Fluxus, which all embraced performance, interaction, and the dematerialization of the art object.

In contemporary practice, this concept has expanded even further with the integration of technology. Artists now use electronics, robotics, and digital media to create sculptures that not only move but also respond to their environment or viewers in real-time. Interactive installations, digital projections, and virtual reality experiences are all examples of how artists continue to push the boundaries of what sculpture can be, embracing the dynamic and the ephemeral as valid artistic expressions.

The quote "Why must art be static?... the next step in sculpture is motion" is a call to innovation and a challenge to the status quo, inviting artists and viewers alike to reconsider their expectations of what art can achieve and how it can engage with the world around us.
3 False ['The Philosophers Stone'] In medieval alchemy, the substance believed to be capable of turning base metals into gold was known as the "Philosopher's Stone" (Latin: lapis philosophorum). This legendary alchemical substance was also thought to be an elixir of life, capable of granting immortality or eternal youth to those who possessed it.

The Philosopher's Stone was sometimes referred to as the "tincture" or the "red tincture," and it was said to be able to perfect any substance or situation. The process of creating the Philosopher's Stone was known as the Magnum Opus or the Great Work, and it involved multiple stages of chemical and mystical transformations, often represented symbolically in alchemical texts.

In the Harry Potter series by J.K. Rowling, the Philosopher's Stone is a real and powerful object that Nicholas Flamel creates. It is central to the plot of the first book, "Harry Potter and the Philosopher's Stone" (published in the United States as "Harry Potter and the Sorcerer's Stone"). In the series, the stone is indeed capable of turning metals into gold and producing the Elixir of Life, which grants immortality. However, the story is a work of fiction, and in reality, the Philosopher's Stone is a symbol of the alchemist's quest for spiritual enlightenment and the perfection of the soul, rather than a literal substance that can transmute metals.
4 True ['Leontyne Price'] The American soprano Leontyne Price is known for her self-titled 1961 L.P. of arias, which is often referred to as the "Blue Album" by opera lovers. This recording showcases her exceptional vocal talent and includes a selection of arias from various operas, demonstrating her versatility and command of the operatic repertoire. Leontyne Price is considered one of the most prominent sopranos of the 20th century, particularly renowned for her interpretations of Verdi and Puccini roles, as well as her performances in the works of American composers such as George Gershwin and Samuel Barber.
5 True ['Space Station'] Commander John Sheridan and the crew of Babylon 5 lived and worked on a space station named Babylon 5. The station was a massive, five-mile-long, rotating space habitat located in neutral space, specifically in the Epsilon Eridani star system, which is about 10.5 light-years from Earth.

Babylon 5 was designed to be a neutral ground for diplomacy and trade among the various races and governments of the galaxy. It served as a political and cultural meeting place, as well as a military post, and was equipped with a command center, living quarters, diplomatic suites, commercial areas, and defense systems.

The station was created by the Earth Alliance and was the last of five Babylon stations, the first four having been destroyed or lost due to various circumstances. Babylon 5 was intended to prevent wars and maintain peace through mutual cooperation and understanding among different species.

The setting of Babylon 5 was a central element of the show, providing a rich backdrop for the complex political, military, and personal storylines that unfolded over the course of the series.
6 True ['Tyler'] William Henry Harrison, the 9th President of the United States, served as a general in the War of 1812 and is known for his victory at the Battle of Tippecanoe in 1811. When Harrison ran for president in 1840, his running mate was John Tyler. However, John Tyler did not fight in the War of 1812; he was a member of the Virginia legislature during that time.

It seems there might be some confusion here. The running mate who fought in the War of 1812 alongside Harrison was not John Tyler, but rather John Scott Harrison, who was William Henry Harrison's son and not his vice president. John Scott Harrison served in the U.S. House of Representatives and was not involved in the War of 1812.

The mix-up might stem from the 1840 campaign slogan "Tippecanoe and Tyler Too," which referred to Harrison's military service and his running mate, John Tyler. However, Tyler's role was not as a military man but as a political ally in the campaign.
7 True ['Elvis Costello'] The British musician who collaborated with Burt Bacharach on the album "Painted from Memory" is Elvis Costello. The album was released in 1998 and features songs co-written by Bacharach and Costello, blending Bacharach's sophisticated pop sensibilities with Costello's edgier songwriting style. The collaboration was well-received critically and showcased a successful partnership between the legendary composer and the respected singer-songwriter, bridging generations of music fans. The album includes the title track "Painted from Memory," as well as other notable songs like "God Give Me Strength" and "I Still Have That Other Girl."
8 True ['Corinth'] The isthmus that joins the Peloponnese with the Greek mainland is known as the Isthmus of Corinth. Corinth is indeed both an ancient and a modern city located near this isthmus. In antiquity, Corinth was a powerful city-state, and in modern times, it is a significant city in Greece, known for its historical sites and its role as a transportation hub due to its strategic location. The Corinth Canal, an engineering marvel completed in the late 19th century, now cuts through the isthmus, providing a waterway that connects the Gulf of Corinth with the Saronic Gulf, effectively making the Peloponnese an island.
9 True ['The Woman in White'] Anne Catherick is a character in the novel "The Woman in White" by Wilkie Collins. She is known for her distinctive white clothing, which is a significant element of her character and plays a crucial role in the plot. The novel is a sensation fiction and is considered one of the earliest examples of the detective novel genre. Anne Catherick's preference for white attire is a recurring motif throughout the story and is central to her identity and the mysteries that unfold.
10 True ['Eucalyptus'] Vicks VapoRub is a popular topical ointment used for cough suppression and muscle aches, as well as for relief from congestion due to colds. The strong-smelling tree oil in Vicks VapoRub is eucalyptus oil. Eucalyptus oil is known for its decongestant properties and is often used in inhalants and vapor rubs to help relieve symptoms of colds and respiratory infections. The combination of menthol, camphor, and eucalyptus oil provides the characteristic smell and soothing sensation associated with Vicks VapoRub.
11 True ['Run Interference'] The idiom related to football (soccer) that involves the concept of "run" and means to remove obstacles for someone else is "to run interference." In American football, running interference refers to offensive players blocking members of the opposing team to clear a path for a teammate carrying the ball.

When used outside of sports, "running interference" means to help someone by dealing with the people or issues that might be causing them problems or hindering their progress. For example, if a colleague is facing resistance from other departments in a company, you might step in to smooth things over and clear the way for them to complete their project successfully. By doing so, you are effectively "running interference" for them.
12 True ['Virginia Woolf'] The woman's story you are referring to is "Kew Gardens" by Virginia Woolf, which was indeed illustrated by her sister Vanessa Bell. Both Virginia Woolf and Vanessa Bell were prominent members of the Bloomsbury Group, an influential group of English writers, intellectuals, philosophers, and artists.

"Kew Gardens" is a short story that was first published in 1919. It is known for its stream-of-consciousness style and its vivid descriptions of the gardens. The story captures the thoughts and conversations of several characters as they walk through Kew Gardens in London on a summer day.

Vanessa Bell, an accomplished artist, provided illustrations for the story when it was published in book form by the Hogarth Press, which was co-founded by Virginia and her husband Leonard Woolf. The collaboration between the sisters on this project is a notable example of the interdisciplinary work that was common within the Bloomsbury Group.
13 True ['Fait Accompli'] 2-word situation that means "concluded fact" in French would be "fait accompli." This term is actually borrowed from French and is used in English to describe an event that has already occurred and is thus inevitable or irreversible. In French, "fait" means "fact" or "deed," and "accompli" is the past participle of "accomplir," which means "to accomplish" or "to complete." So, "fait accompli" directly translates to "accomplished fact," which conveys a similar meaning to "concluded fact." It implies that the situation is final and cannot be changed.
14 True ['Arsenic'] Before penicillin, salvarsan, also known as arsphenamine, was used to treat syphilis. Salvarsan is a compound that contains arsenic, a poisonous element. Arsenic compounds had been used in various forms of medicine for centuries, but salvarsan, introduced in 1910 by Paul Ehrlich, was the first effective treatment for syphilis. Ehrlich's work on salvarsan and its derivative neosalvarsan (neoarsphenamine) was a significant advancement in the treatment of syphilis and laid the groundwork for the development of modern chemotherapy. Despite its toxicity and the need for careful administration, salvarsan remained the primary treatment for syphilis until the advent of penicillin in the 1940s.
15 True ['Jon Batiste'] In 2021, the New Orleans pianist who won an Oscar and released a new album while keeping his day job as Stephen Colbert's bandleader was Jon Batiste. He won the Academy Award for Best Original Score for his work on the Pixar film "Soul," which he co-scored with Trent Reznor and Atticus Ross. Additionally, Batiste released the album "We Are" in March 2021, which showcased his versatile musical talents. He was the bandleader and musical director for "The Late Show with Stephen Colbert" on CBS until August 2022, when he stepped down to focus on other projects.
16 True ['Customs'] Upon returning to Earth from the Apollo 11 mission, the astronauts—Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin, and Michael Collins—had to go through customs and declare the Moon rocks they brought back. They filled out the necessary paperwork as if they were importing items from a foreign country. The customs declaration form was dated July 24, 1969, the day they splashed down in the Pacific Ocean after their historic lunar landing.

The form listed the "country of origin" as "Moon" and the contents as "Moon rock and Moon dust samples." The declared value was left blank, as the samples were considered priceless. This was a formality and a lighthearted gesture, as there were no actual customs duties to be paid on lunar samples, which were the property of the United States government.

The Apollo 11 Moon rocks were collected as part of the scientific objectives of the mission and were distributed for research and display purposes. Some were given to foreign countries and U.S. states as goodwill gifts, while others were studied by scientists to learn more about the Moon's composition and geological history.
17 True ['O. Henry'] 1898 which 'Gift of the Magi' author spent time in the pokey for embezzlement of bank funds?

The author of "The Gift of the Magi," O. Henry (the pen name of William Sydney Porter), was indeed imprisoned for embezzlement. However, the year of his imprisonment was not 1898 but rather 1898 to 1901. Porter was accused of embezzling funds from the First National Bank in Austin, Texas, where he had worked as a teller and bookkeeper. He fled to Honduras but returned to the United States after learning that his wife was dying of tuberculosis. He was then arrested and subsequently convicted of embezzlement.

Porter's time in prison, from 1898 to 1901, provided him with the solitude and opportunity to focus on his writing. It was during his incarceration that he began to write short stories in earnest, and after his release, he moved to New York City, where he adopted the pen name O. Henry and became a prolific and celebrated writer, known for his wit, wordplay, and twist endings in stories such as "The Gift of the Magi," which was published in 1905.
18 True ['Byzantine'] 400 to 1400 A.D. covers a significant period in the history of the Eastern Roman Empire, also known as the Byzantine Empire. During this time, mosaic art was indeed a major art form, particularly in the decoration of churches, palaces, and other important buildings.

The Byzantine era is renowned for its sophisticated mosaic work, which often featured religious themes, imperial portraits, and natural motifs like animals and plants, including the cornucopia as a symbol of abundance and prosperity. The use of mosaics was not only aesthetically pleasing but also served as a means of conveying theological concepts and imperial ideology.

The peak of Byzantine mosaic art occurred during several phases within this period:

1. **Early Byzantine (400-600 A.D.):** This period includes the construction of the Hagia Sophia in Constantinople (modern-day Istanbul) under Emperor Justinian I, which features some of the most famous early Byzantine mosaics.

2. **Middle Byzantine (600-1000 A.D.):** During this time, mosaic art continued to flourish despite political and economic challenges. Notable examples include the mosaics of the Church of the Dormition in Nicaea (Iznik) and the churches on the Greek islands such as Hosios Loukas and Daphni.

3. **Late Byzantine (1000-1400 A.D.):** This period saw a renewed interest in mosaic art, with significant works in Constantinople, such as those in the Chora Church (Kariye Museum), which are celebrated for their detail, elegance, and emotional depth.

Byzantine mosaics were typically made with small cubes of glass, gold leaf, and various colored stones called tesserae. The reflective quality of the glass and gold created a luminous effect, especially in the dimly lit interiors of Byzantine churches, where the mosaics were designed to inspire awe and contemplation.

The art of mosaic in the Byzantine Empire was not only a continuation of Roman traditions but also an influence on later artistic developments in the medieval West, as well as in the Islamic world and the Slavic countries that came under the cultural sphere of Byzantium.
19 True ['Ethiopia'] Hubert Julian, also known as "The Black Eagle," was a pioneering aviator and showman who gained fame for his daring feats, including skydiving while playing the saxophone. In the 1930s, Julian went to Ethiopia to offer his services to Emperor Haile Selassie. He was there to help defend the East African nation against Italy's invasion during the Second Italo-Ethiopian War, which lasted from 1935 to 1937.

Ethiopia, under Emperor Haile Selassie, was the African empire that Julian sought to support against Italian aggression. Despite Julian's initial role in organizing an air force for Ethiopia, his tenure there was short-lived and marked by controversy, including a crash during a test flight that led to his falling out of favor with the Ethiopian government. Nevertheless, his efforts were part of a broader international response to the Italian invasion, which ultimately led to the occupation of Ethiopia until it was liberated during World War II.
20 True ['Absolution'] The quadrisyllabic word for the forgiveness of sin granted by the sacrament of penance is "absolution." In the context of the Christian faith, particularly in Catholicism, absolution is the act of a priest forgiving the sins of a penitent in the name of God. This is done during the sacrament of penance, also known as confession or reconciliation, where the individual confesses their sins to the priest, expresses contrition, and receives absolution, which restores them to a state of grace. The word "absolution" comes from the Latin "absolvere," which means "to set free" or "to loosen from."
21 True ['Punjab'] Lahore is the capital of the Pakistani province of Punjab. Punjab is the most populous province in Pakistan and shares its eastern border with the Indian states of Punjab and Rajasthan. The province is known for its rich cultural heritage, agricultural productivity, and historical significance. The city of Lahore itself is an important cultural, historical, and economic center in Pakistan, with a history that dates back over a thousand years. It is famous for its Mughal-era architecture, such as the Badshahi Mosque and the Lahore Fort, as well as its vibrant arts and culinary scenes.
22 False ['Sohpie Dahl'] The model-turned-author actress who is the granddaughter of Patricia Neal is Sophie Dahl. Sophie is a British author and former fashion model. She is the daughter of Tessa Dahl, Patricia Neal's daughter with the writer Roald Dahl. Sophie Dahl has written several novels and children's books, and she has also appeared in various films and television series. Her modeling career was prominent in the 1990s and early 2000s, and she has since transitioned into writing and acting. Patricia Neal was an acclaimed American actress known for her roles in films such as "The Day the Earth Stood Still" and "Hud," for which she won the Academy Award for Best Actress.
23 True ['The Goldfinch'] The novel by Donna Tartt in which a boy steals a painting of a bird after a museum bombing is "The Goldfinch." The painting in question is "The Goldfinch" by the Dutch artist Carel Fabritius, which plays a central role in the story.

The novel was adapted into a film directed by John Crowley, with the screenplay written by Peter Straughan. The film "The Goldfinch" was released in 2019 and starred Ansel Elgort as the adult Theodore "Theo" Decker, the protagonist who takes the painting after the bombing. The film also featured Nicole Kidman, Oakes Fegley (as young Theo), Aneurin Barnard, Finn Wolfhard, Sarah Paulson, Luke Wilson, and Jeffrey Wright. The adaptation received mixed reviews and did not perform well at the box office.
24 True ['Daniel Defoe'] The woman known as Moll Flanders, who commits various crimes in her quest for success, is a character in the novel "The Fortunes and Misfortunes of the Famous Moll Flanders" written by Daniel Defoe. Published in 1722, the novel is a first-person picaresque narrative that details the life of Moll Flanders, born to a transported felon in Newgate Prison and living a life of crime and multiple marriages in search of financial stability and social respectability. Defoe's work is considered a classic of English literature and provides a vivid portrayal of the social and economic conditions of 18th-century England.
25 False ['Extant'] The term "Ex" in the context of art typically refers to an "exemplar" or an "example" of a particular print or artwork. It indicates that the piece is an authentic representation of the artist's work, often used for prints to show that they are genuine and made from the original plates or blocks.

When an artwork is described as an "ex," it means that it is a legitimate example of the artist's work, and it has usually been authenticated as such. This term is particularly common in the world of printmaking, where artists create multiple impressions from the same plate, block, or screen. Each impression is considered an original, but the quality can vary, and some may be more sought after than others, such as those that are signed and numbered by the artist.

The existence of an "Ex" artwork is significant for several reasons:

1. **Historical Record**: It provides a tangible record of the artist's work and creative process.
2. **Authenticity**: It serves as a benchmark for authenticity, helping to distinguish genuine works from forgeries or reproductions.
3. **Scholarship**: It aids art historians and scholars in studying the artist's technique, style, and oeuvre.
4. **Value**: It can have significant monetary value, especially if it is a rare example or part of a limited edition.
5. **Cultural Heritage**: It contributes to the cultural heritage, allowing future generations to experience and appreciate the artist's work.

Artworks that have survived over the centuries are often preserved in museums, private collections, or archives. Their survival is due to careful conservation efforts, proper storage, and sometimes, a bit of luck. The value of these works, both culturally and financially, is often immense, and they are considered treasures of human creativity and history.
26 True ['Desperado'] The middle film of Robert Rodriguez' El Mariachi trilogy is titled "Desperado." This film is the second installment in the trilogy, which starts with "El Mariachi" (1992) and concludes with "Once Upon a Time in Mexico" (2003). "Desperado" was released in 1995 and stars Antonio Banderas as the mariachi, a role he took over from Carlos Gallardo, who played the character in the first film and served as a producer on the sequels.

The Eagles hit song that shares its title with this film is "Desperado," which was released in 1973 on the album of the same name. The song was written by Don Henley and Glenn Frey and is one of the Eagles' most famous tracks. It has no direct connection to the film's plot or characters but shares a thematic resonance with the lone, wandering protagonist of Rodriguez' film.
27 False ['Siamang'] The obscure 7-letter ape you're referring to is likely the orangutan (Pongo spp.). Orangutans are found in the tropical rainforests of Borneo and Sumatra, which are part of Indonesia and Malaysia. The word "orangutan" comes from the Malay and Indonesian words "orang" meaning "person" and "hutan" meaning "forest," thus "person of the forest."

There are three species of orangutans:

1. Bornean orangutan (Pongo pygmaeus)
2. Sumatran orangutan (Pongo abelii)
3. Tapanuli orangutan (Pongo tapanuliensis), which was discovered more recently in 1997 and recognized as a distinct species in 2017.

Orangutans are the world's largest arboreal mammals and are known for their intelligence, long arms, and distinctive red hair. They are critically endangered due to habitat loss, palm oil plantations, and illegal hunting. Conservation efforts are crucial to ensure their survival in the wild.
28 False ['Abide With Me'] In a hymn or spiritual, phrases like "fast falls the eventide" and "in life, in death, O Lord" are typically used to express a sense of urgency or a plea for divine presence and guidance during times of darkness or uncertainty. These phrases do not literally instruct the listener to do anything; rather, they are part of the lyrical content that conveys a mood or theme.

Here's a breakdown of what these phrases might symbolize or imply within the context of a hymn or spiritual:

1. "Fast falls the eventide": This phrase suggests that nighttime or a metaphorical darkness is approaching quickly. It can symbolize the end of a day, the onset of hardship, or the approach of life's end. The use of "fast falls" adds a sense of urgency, indicating that time is passing and that light (whether literal or metaphorical) is fading. The singer or speaker is often asking for God's protection or comfort as this "eventide" approaches.

2. "In life, in death, O Lord": This phrase is a plea for God's presence and guidance throughout all stages of life, including the transition into death. It reflects a deep trust in God's providence and a request for divine support no matter what circumstances the individual or community might face. It is a declaration of faith and reliance on a higher power, asking for God's abiding care in all things.

In the context of a hymn or spiritual, these phrases are typically part of a larger expression of faith, hope, and the desire for a closer relationship with the divine. They serve to remind the singer and the listener of the ever-present nature of God's love and the comfort that faith can provide, even during life's most challenging moments. The hymn may be inviting the listener to reflect on their own relationship with the divine, to seek comfort in faith, and to trust in God's guidance through all of life's experiences.
29 True ['Tito'] 20th century leader who went by one name and didn't live to see the collapse of the Yugoslav nation he built is Josip Broz Tito. Tito was a Croatian communist revolutionary and statesman who served as the leader of Yugoslavia from the end of World War II until his death in 1980. He was the chief architect of the second Yugoslavia, a socialist federation that lasted until 1992, several years after his death. Tito's death in 1980 is often seen as the beginning of the end for the cohesion of the Yugoslav state, which eventually disintegrated into several independent nations in the early 1990s amidst a series of conflicts and wars.
30 True ['Don Carlos', 'Don Carlo'] The title character in the Verdi opera "Don Carlos" (originally written in French as "Don Carlos") is the son of the King of Spain. The opera is based on the dramatic play "Don Carlos" by Friedrich Schiller. In the opera, Don Carlos is the Infante (prince) of Spain and is engaged to Elisabeth of Valois, daughter of the King of France. However, political machinations lead to Elisabeth being married off to Don Carlos' father, King Philip II of Spain, instead. The opera explores themes of love, betrayal, and political intrigue, set against the backdrop of the Spanish Inquisition.
31 True ['Humboldt'] In the Galapagos Islands, the cooler, dry season is influenced by the presence of the Humboldt Current, which is named after the German naturalist and explorer Alexander von Humboldt. During the months from June to November, the Humboldt Current brings cooler waters and nutrients to the Galapagos, leading to a season known as the Garua.

The Garua season is characterized by cooler temperatures, misty skies, and a drizzle known as "garua." This season contrasts with the warmer, wetter season that occurs from December to May, which is influenced by the Panama Current and the El Niño Current. The Humboldt Current's upwelling of cold, nutrient-rich water supports a diverse and abundant marine ecosystem, which in turn supports the unique terrestrial wildlife of the Galapagos.
32 True ['Alphabet City'] Many artists have lived in the neighborhood known as Alphabet City in Manhattan's East Village. Alphabet City is named for Avenues A, B, C, and D, which are the only avenues in Manhattan to have single-letter names. This area has historically been known for its vibrant arts scene, alternative culture, and community of artists, musicians, and writers.

Alphabet City is part of the larger East Village, which has been a hub for counterculture and artistic movements since the 1950s and 1960s. The neighborhood has been associated with the Beat Generation, the punk rock scene, and various artistic communities. Rents were relatively cheap in the latter part of the 20th century, which attracted artists and contributed to a flourishing arts scene.

The area has undergone significant gentrification since the 1990s, which has changed its character, but it still retains some of its artistic heritage. Tompkins Square Park is a central gathering place in Alphabet City and has been the site of many artistic and political gatherings over the years.
33 False ['The Special Branch'] Sidney Reilly, often referred to as the "Ace of Spies," worked as an operative for the British Secret Intelligence Service (SIS), which is commonly known as MI6. The "MI" stands for Military Intelligence, Section 6. Although the term "Special Branch" is sometimes associated with British domestic counter-intelligence and security operations, Reilly was primarily associated with the foreign intelligence operations of MI6.

During his time as a spy, Reilly undertook numerous espionage activities, including operations during the Russian Revolution and attempts to undermine the Bolshevik government. His exploits were so legendary that they contributed to the inspiration for Ian Fleming's James Bond character. It's important to note that the actual structure and naming conventions of British intelligence services have evolved over time, but during Reilly's era, the foreign intelligence service was known as MI6, or more formally, the Secret Intelligence Service (SIS).
34 True ['Nader'] 2000 United States presidential election in Florida

The final official tally from Florida in the 2000 U.S. presidential election was indeed very close between George W. Bush and Al Gore. However, the third candidate you're referring to is Ralph Nader, who ran as the nominee of the Green Party. The votes you've mentioned are approximate, as the official certified results had George W. Bush with 2,912,790 votes, Al Gore with 2,912,253 votes, and Ralph Nader with 97,488 votes. The extremely narrow margin between Bush and Gore led to a contentious recount and a U.S. Supreme Court decision that ultimately resulted in Bush winning Florida's electoral votes and thus the presidency.
35 True ['Jill Scott'] The television adaptation of "The No. 1 Ladies' Detective Agency" series features actress Jill Scott as the lead character, Precious Ramotswe, and singer-songwriter Anika Noni Rose as her associate, Grace Makutsi. The show is based on the novels by Alexander McCall Smith. Jill Scott, known for her work as a Grammy Award-winning R&B and soul singer as well as an actress, brings the character of Precious Ramotswe to life, while Anika Noni Rose, a Tony Award-winning actress and singer, plays the role of the sharp and ambitious Grace Makutsi. The series is set in Botswana and follows the cases of the first and only female-owned detective agency in the country.
36 True ['Constantine'] 312 A.D. is a significant year in Roman history, particularly in the context of the conversion of Emperor Constantine the Great to Christianity. According to historical accounts, most famously recounted by the bishop Eusebius of Caesarea in his "Life of Constantine," the emperor is said to have experienced a vision that profoundly influenced his religious beliefs and policies.

The vision occurred on the eve of the Battle of the Milvian Bridge, which took place on October 28, 312 A.D. Constantine, who was marching against the forces of his rival Maxentius, reportedly saw a cross of light in the sky with the Greek words "Ἐν τούτῳ νίκα" (En toutōi níka), which can be translated as "In this sign, you will conquer."

This vision is often interpreted as a divine endorsement of Christianity and is considered a pivotal moment in the Christianization of the Roman Empire. Following the vision and his subsequent victory at the Milvian Bridge, Constantine became the first Roman emperor to convert to Christianity. He later issued the Edict of Milan in 313 A.D., which proclaimed religious tolerance for Christianity within the empire, effectively ending the persecution of Christians and allowing the religion to flourish.

The vision of the cross is a key event in the history of Christianity and is traditionally credited with playing a significant role in the spread of the religion throughout the Roman Empire and beyond.
37 True ['Ardern'] 42-year-old Prime Minister Jacinda Ardern of New Zealand made the surprise announcement on January 19, 2023, that she would be stepping down from the role. Ardern, who became the world's youngest female head of government when she was elected in 2017, cited a lack of energy to continue in the job as her reason for leaving. Her departure became effective once her party, the New Zealand Labour Party, elected a new leader, which occurred on January 22, 2023, with Chris Hipkins succeeding her as the Prime Minister.
38 False ['Fossa'] The carnivore with retractable claws that is depicted as not being terrifying to lemurs in the animated form in the movie "Madagascar" is Alex the Lion. In the film, Alex is a lion who has grown up in captivity at the Central Park Zoo and is best friends with Marty the Zebra, Gloria the Hippopotamus, and Melman the Giraffe. Despite being a carnivore and a member of the big cat family, which naturally preys on animals like zebras and antelopes, Alex is portrayed as a friendly and non-threatening character to the lemurs in the movie.

The movie plays on the natural predator-prey relationship but flips it for comedic effect, showing Alex struggling with his instincts when he encounters the lemurs and other wildlife in Madagascar. The lemurs, led by King Julien, are initially wary of Alex, but they eventually come to accept him and his friends as part of their community. The film's portrayal of these interspecies relationships is purely fictional and for entertainment purposes, as in reality, a lion would naturally see lemurs as prey.
39 False ['Ensconced'] The word you might be looking for is "fixture." In the context of a light fixture, "fixture" refers to a fixed device that is securely attached to a building's structure and provides illumination. The term "fixture" can also be used more broadly to describe anything that is securely anchored or attached to a property, such as plumbing fixtures, and is considered part of the real estate.

In a broader sense, "fixture" can imply something that is established and not likely to change, suggesting stability and permanence. So, when you say "a light fixture," it inherently conveys the idea that the light is a settled part of the building and not going anywhere.
40 True ['The Power of the Dog'] 2021 saw the release of the western film "The Power of the Dog," directed by Jane Campion. In this film, anthrax is a significant plot element, as it is initially seen to be afflicting cows on the ranch owned by the character Phil Burbank, played by Benedict Cumberbatch. The handling of the anthrax-infected cattle is a key part of the story, and the disease plays a role in the film's narrative and character development. However, it is not used as a weapon against Benedict Cumberbatch's character in the traditional sense of biological warfare; rather, it is a natural occurrence on the ranch that has implications for the plot and the relationships between the characters.
41 True ['The Turn of the Screw'] Peter Quint is a ghostly character in Henry James' novella "The Turn of the Screw," which was adapted into an opera by Benjamin Britten. The opera, also titled "The Turn of the Screw," premiered in 1954 and is known for its chilling atmosphere and psychological complexity, much like the novella on which it is based. In both the novella and the opera, Peter Quint and another ghost, Miss Jessel, are central to the plot, which revolves around their influence on two young children in a remote English country house.
42 True ['Night Vale'] Yes, that's correct! Wil Wheaton plays a chef named Chef Alan on the podcast "Welcome to Night Vale." The restaurant he works at is called Tourniquet, which is part of the fictional world created by the podcast. "Welcome to Night Vale" is a bi-monthly podcast that presents itself as a community radio show for the small desert town of Night Vale, featuring local weather, news, announcements from the Sheriff's Secret Police, mysterious lights in the night sky, dark hooded figures with unknowable powers, and cultural events.

Wil Wheaton, known for his roles in "Star Trek: The Next Generation" and "The Big Bang Theory," as well as his work as a writer and blogger, lends his voice to the character of Chef Alan, who is sometimes mentioned in the podcast's episodes. The character fits into the surreal and often darkly humorous world of "Welcome to Night Vale," where strange and supernatural events are part of everyday life.
43 True ['Chisholm'] 1972 was a significant year for women in American politics, as it marked the first time a woman, Shirley Chisholm, ran for the Democratic presidential nomination. Shirley Chisholm, who was the first African American woman elected to the United States Congress, campaigned for the nomination and won 152 delegates before eventually withdrawing from the race.

Her campaign was groundbreaking and paved the way for future female and minority candidates. Despite facing significant sexism and racism, Chisholm's bid for the presidency was an important moment in the fight for equality and representation in American politics. The eventual Democratic nominee that year was George McGovern, who went on to lose to the incumbent, President Richard Nixon, in the general election.
44 False ['Jacobs Ladder'] The high-voltage traveling arc commonly known by a biblical name is often referred to as "Jacob's Ladder." This name comes from the biblical story of Jacob, who dreamt of a ladder reaching to heaven with angels ascending and descending on it, as described in the Book of Genesis (Genesis 28:10-19).

In the scientific context, a Jacob's Ladder is a device that creates a visible path of ionized air between two electrodes, which can look like a ladder of sparks climbing upwards. The high voltage creates a plasma, which is a state of matter where the gas becomes conductive due to the ionization of its atoms or molecules. The spark appears to climb because as the air is heated by the current, it rises due to convection, causing the arc to move upward. This phenomenon is often demonstrated in physics classrooms or in science museums to illustrate electrical principles.
45 True ['The Metro'] The poem you're referring to is "In a Station of the Metro," and it is indeed one of Ezra Pound's most famous works. The full text of the poem is as follows:

```
In a station of the Metro

The apparition of these faces in the crowd:
Petals on a wet, black bough.
```

This poem is an example of Imagism, a movement in poetry that Pound was instrumental in founding. Imagist poets aimed to present an image or series of images without commentary or connecting language, allowing the reader to experience a direct and concise presentation of an emotion or scene.

The poem you're asking about that starts with "M" could be "The Millwright," which is another poem by Ezra Pound. Here is the beginning of "The Millwright":

```
Master of the mill-wright's art,
Known and knowing, grave and gay,
Brown of brawn and brain and heart,
Here to-day, to-morrow away.
```

This poem is from Pound's collection "Lustra" (1916) and reflects his interest in craftsmanship and the dignity of labor. It is a tribute to the skill and transient presence of the millwright, a craftsman who builds and maintains mills and their machinery.
46 True ["Harry's House"] The third solo pop music album by Harry Styles is titled "Harry's House." The possessive form of the title, as you've asked for, would still be "Harry's House." This album was released on May 20, 2022, and features hits like "As It Was" and "Late Night Talking." It has been well-received both critically and commercially, showcasing Styles' evolution as a solo artist after his previous albums "Harry Styles" (2017) and "Fine Line" (2019).
47 True ['Eroica'] The name for a Beethoven symphony that becomes a sexy section of the bookstore with one letter removed is "Eroica." When you remove the letter "c" from "Eroica," you get "Erotica," which is a term often associated with erotic literature or content, a section you might find in a bookstore.

The Symphony No. 3 in E♭ major, Op. 55, known as the Eroica, was composed by Ludwig van Beethoven and is one of his most celebrated works. It was originally dedicated to Napoleon Bonaparte, but Beethoven removed the dedication after Napoleon declared himself Emperor of France in 1804.
48 True ['Yemen'] The International Movie you're referring to is "Salmon Fishing in the Yemen." The film is based on the novel of the same name by Paul Torday and was directed by Lasse Hallström. It tells the story of a fisheries expert who is recruited by a consultant to help realize a sheikh's vision of bringing fly-fishing to the Yemen desert, creating an unexpected friendship and a range of personal and political challenges. The movie stars Ewan McGregor, Emily Blunt, and Kristin Scott Thomas.
49 True ['Pillars of Hercules', 'Hercules'] Spain's flag features emblems of its historic kingdoms and of the Pillars of Hercules astride the Strait of Gibraltar. The Pillars of Hercules is the name given to the promontories that flank the entrance to the Strait of Gibraltar: the Rock of Gibraltar on the European side and one of two peaks on the African side, either Monte Hacho in Ceuta or Jebel Musa in Morocco.

The modern flag of Spain, adopted in 1981, consists of three horizontal stripes: red, yellow, and red, with the yellow stripe being twice the size of each red stripe. The coat of arms of Spain is emblazoned over the yellow stripe and the red stripe at the hoist side. The coat of arms includes symbols representing the historic kingdoms of Spain, such as the lions of León and Castile, the castle of Castile, the pomegranate of Granada, and the arms of Aragon, among others. The Pillars of Hercules are depicted on the coat of arms with the motto "PLUS ULTRA," which means "More Beyond" in Latin, symbolizing the reach of Spain beyond the strait into the New World.
50 True ['Crohn'] 1967 an Ileitis and Colitis Organization held a dance featuring Ella Fitzgerald to honor Dr. Burrill Bernard Crohn. Dr. Crohn was a gastroenterologist who, along with his colleagues Dr. Leon Ginzburg and Dr. Gordon Oppenheimer, first described the disease that would come to be known as Crohn's disease in 1932. The organization that held the dance was likely a precursor to the Crohn's & Colitis Foundation, which is now a leading non-profit organization dedicated to finding cures for Crohn's disease and ulcerative colitis. The Foundation's name includes Dr. Crohn's name in recognition of his contributions to the understanding and treatment of inflammatory bowel diseases.
51 False ['Upcycle', 'Upcycling'] 1. In economics, a period during which business is at a high point is referred to as an "upturn" or "upswing." This term is used to describe a phase in the business cycle where economic activity is increasing, unemployment is decreasing, and GDP is growing. It follows a downturn or recession and precedes the peak of the cycle.

2. To be "green" in an economic or business context often means to engage in sustainable practices that minimize environmental impact. This can include using goods and resources efficiently to create products that have a smaller ecological footprint, are made from renewable or recycled materials, or contribute to a circular economy where waste is minimized, and resources are reused. The concept of being green is closely associated with environmental economics, which is a branch of economics that studies the economic effects of environmental policies.
52 True ['Lisbon'] King Carlos I of Portugal and his son Luis Filipe were assassinated in Lisbon, the capital city of Portugal. The assassination took place on February 1, 1908, when they were shot while traveling by carriage through the Terreiro do Paço, a large square in Lisbon. The assassination was carried out by members of the Republican Party, who were opposed to the monarchy and sought to establish a republic in Portugal. Following the assassination, Carlos I's younger son, Manuel II, briefly became king, but his reign was short-lived. Later that year, the Portuguese monarchy was overthrown, and the First Portuguese Republic was established.
53 False ['Jubjub'] "Beware the Jabberwock, my son!" is the opening line of the poem "Jabberwocky" by Lewis Carroll, which appears in his 1871 novel Through the Looking-Glass, and What Alice Found There. The poem is known for its creative use of nonsensical language and portmanteau words. The Jabberwock itself is a fictional creature described in the poem as a beast with "jaws that bite" and "claws that catch."

The bird you're referring to that repeats itself and is not found in any ornithological books is likely the "Pobble," mentioned in another of Carroll's poems, "The Pobble Who Has No Toes." This poem is from the same book, Through the Looking-Glass, and tells the story of a creature called a Pobble that loses its toes one by one. The Pobble is another example of Carroll's playful and imaginative use of language, creating whimsical creatures that do not exist in the real world.

Both the Jabberwock and the Pobble are products of Lewis Carroll's rich imagination and are not based on real animals or birds. They serve as examples of his skill in crafting engaging and fantastical stories that continue to delight readers of all ages.
54 True ['Inigo Jones'] England's first great architect, who began work on the Queen's House in 1616, England's first classical building, is Inigo Jones (1573–1652). He is considered the first significant English architect in the early modern period, and he introduced the classical architecture of Rome and the Italian Renaissance to England. The Queen's House, located in Greenwich, London, was designed for Anne of Denmark, the queen consort of King James I of England. It is one of the most important buildings in British architectural history, as it marked the beginning of the classical tradition in English architecture.
55 True ['Revolutionary Road'] Richard Yates' novel "Revolutionary Road" is a poignant and critical examination of American suburban life in the 1950s. The title itself is rich with symbolism and irony. "Revolutionary Road" refers to the street where the main characters, Frank and April Wheeler, live. The name of the road evokes the American Revolution and the ideals of freedom, change, and progress that were central to the founding of the United States.

However, in the context of the novel, the "revolutionary" spirit of 1776 has not led to the fulfillment of the American Dream for the Wheelers and their neighbors. Instead, it has culminated in a stifling, conformist suburban existence that is far removed from the ideals of independence and self-determination. The Wheelers find themselves trapped in a cycle of dissatisfaction, infidelity, and unfulfilled potential, which is emblematic of a broader societal malaise.

Yates uses the title to highlight the disparity between the revolutionary ideals that America was founded upon and the reality of post-war American life, where many people felt disillusioned and disconnected from those very ideals. The "dead end" that the title implies is both literal, in the sense that Revolutionary Road is a cul-de-sac, and metaphorical, representing the dead-end lives of the characters who are unable to break free from societal expectations and their own self-imposed limitations.

In essence, Yates is commenting on the way the revolutionary spirit of innovation, change, and personal freedom has been suffocated by the conformity and materialism of the 1950s, leaving the characters, and by extension American society, at a profound impasse.
56 True ['medulla oblongata'] The lowest part of the brain stem is known as the medulla oblongata. It is a cone-shaped structure that is continuous with the spinal cord and is responsible for controlling autonomic functions such as breathing, heart rate, and blood pressure. The medulla oblongata is an essential part of the brain for maintaining basic life functions, and it also plays a role in relaying sensory and motor information between the brain and the spinal cord. Other parts of the brain stem include the midbrain (mesencephalon) and the pons, which are located above the medulla oblongata.
57 True ['Kool Herc'] 2023 marks the 50th anniversary of hip-hop, with the culture's birth often being traced back to a party on August 11, 1973, in the Bronx, New York. This party was DJed by Clive Campbell, who is better known by his stage name Kool Herc. The name "Kool Herc" is derived from the nickname "Hercules," after the mythological Greek hero known for his incredible strength. Kool Herc's innovative DJ techniques, including the use of two turntables to extend the breakbeats in songs, are credited with helping to lay the foundation for what would become the global phenomenon of hip-hop music and culture.
58 False ['Cuspidor'] Let's break down the anagram challenge:

We are looking for an anagram of "Crisp Duo" that would mean "a perfect receptacle."

The word "receptacle" has 10 letters, and "Crisp Duo" also has 10 letters, which is a good sign that an anagram might be possible.

Now, let's rearrange the letters of "Crisp Duo" to see if we can form a word or phrase that fits the description of "a perfect receptacle."

After playing with the letters, we can come up with the word "cupsido," which is not a standard English word. However, if we consider the possibility of a typo or a play on words, we might be looking for "Cupid," which is a well-known figure often associated with love and romance.

While "Cupid" itself does not mean "a perfect receptacle," it could be argued that in a metaphorical sense, Cupid could be seen as a "perfect receptacle" for love, as he is often depicted with a bow and arrow that inspire love in those who are struck.

However, if we are strictly looking for a word that means "a perfect receptacle," and considering that "Spittingly" is an adverb that means "with spitting," it seems we might be looking for a play on words or a less common interpretation.

If we take "Crisp Duo" and rearrange the letters without considering "Spittingly," we could potentially come up with "Cupid's Orp," where "Orp" is not a recognized English word. But if we consider "Cupid's" as a possessive form of Cupid, we might be looking for something that Cupid possesses or represents, which could be related to love or desire.

Unfortunately, without additional context or clues, it's challenging to provide a definitive answer to this anagram puzzle. It's possible that the intended answer requires a deeper knowledge of specific jargon, cultural references, or is a non-standard use of language. If there is a specific answer you're looking for, please provide more context or hints, and I'll be happy to help further!
59 True ['Giraffe'] Okapis (Okapia johnstoni) have a unique walk known as an amble, which is a lateral sequence walk. This means that the legs on the same side of the body move almost simultaneously. When an okapi moves at slow speeds, it uses this gait, which is energy-efficient and allows for a smooth and stable movement through dense forest habitats.

The relatives of okapis that also use a similar walk are other even-toed ungulates (Artiodactyla), particularly those within the family Giraffidae, which includes giraffes (Giraffa camelopardalis). Like okapis, giraffes also have a lateral sequence gait at slow speeds, where the legs on the same side of the body move together. This is in contrast to the diagonal sequence gait used by many other mammals, where the legs move in a diagonal pattern (e.g., front right and rear left, followed by front left and rear right).

The amble is particularly advantageous for large-bodied animals with long legs, as it provides stability and allows them to navigate their environment effectively while conserving energy. Both okapis and giraffes are well-adapted to their respective habitats with this type of locomotion.
60 True ['Wesley'] The John who founded Methodism and has an American university named for him is John Wesley. However, it's important to note that while John Wesley is the founder of Methodism, the university named after him is actually in the United Kingdom, not the United States. The university is called Wesleyan University, and it was established in 1834 in Middletown, Connecticut, USA. It is not directly named after John Wesley, but rather after the Methodist movement he founded.

In the UK, there is a university named after John Wesley's brother, Charles Wesley, who was also instrumental in the Methodist movement. This is Wesley College in Bristol, which merged with the University of the West of England.

There might be some confusion with other universities that have Methodist affiliations or were founded by Methodists in the United States, such as Emory University, which was founded by the Methodist Episcopal Church and named after Bishop John Emory, or Duke University, which was founded by Methodists and Quakers. However, there is no university in the United States named directly after John Wesley.
61 True ['Perdition'] On film, Tom Hanks was on the "Road to Perdition" in the 2002 movie of the same name. The term "Perdition" is often used to refer to a state of spiritual loss or damnation, and in the context of the film, it symbolizes the moral and existential downfall of the characters, particularly the protagonist, Michael Sullivan (played by Hanks), as he navigates a path of vengeance and redemption. The film is a crime drama set during the Great Depression, and it explores themes of sin, guilt, and the complex relationships between fathers and sons.
62 True ['Muir'] The national monument in Marin County, California, known for its old-growth redwoods is named after William Kent. It is called Muir Woods National Monument, named in honor of the naturalist and conservationist John Muir. William Kent and his wife, Elizabeth Thacher Kent, donated the land to the federal government in 1908, and it was President Theodore Roosevelt who declared it a national monument later that year. The Kents suggested naming the area after John Muir to honor his dedication to the conservation of America's wild places, particularly the Sierra Nevada mountains and the establishment of national parks like Yosemite and Sequoia.
63 True ['Jack Aubrey'] 2003 saw the release of the film "Master and Commander: The Far Side of the World," which was directed by Peter Weir and starred Russell Crowe as Captain Jack Aubrey. This film is based on the Aubrey-Maturin series of novels by Patrick O'Brian. While the film primarily draws from the events of the tenth book in the series, "The Far Side of the World," it also incorporates elements from other books in the series to create a unique storyline that captures the essence of O'Brian's work.

Captain Jack Aubrey is a Royal Navy officer during the Napoleonic Wars, and his close friend and ship's surgeon, Stephen Maturin, is a naturalist and spy. Their adventures at sea and the intricate details of life aboard a British man-of-war are central to the series, which is highly regarded for its well-researched depiction of early 19th-century naval warfare and its rich characters. Russell Crowe's portrayal of Jack Aubrey brought the character to life on the big screen, earning the film critical acclaim and a strong following among fans of both the novels and historical naval fiction.
64 True ['bluebonnet'] In springtime, you might want to hit the Texas trail named for the state flower, which is the bluebonnet. The bluebonnet is not only the state flower of Texas but also a popular subject for photographs and family outings during the spring when the fields are filled with these beautiful blooms. There are several scenic drives and trails throughout Texas, such as the Bluebonnet Trail in Ennis, Texas, which is known for its spectacular displays of bluebonnets and other wildflowers. The Ennis Bluebonnet Trails Festival is an annual event that celebrates the arrival of these flowers with tours, arts and crafts, and live entertainment.
65 True ['Norway'] In 2008, Jens Stoltenberg, who was then the Prime Minister of Norway, placed rice as the inaugural deposit in the Svalbard Global Seed Vault. The Svalbard Global Seed Vault, often referred to as the "Doomsday Vault," is a secure seed bank located on the Norwegian island of Spitsbergen in the remote Arctic Svalbard archipelago. Its purpose is to store duplicates of seeds held in gene banks worldwide to ensure crop diversity and food security against natural or human-made disasters. The vault has the capacity to store 4.5 million seed samples, which are kept at a constant temperature of -18°C (-0.4°F) to preserve their viability for centuries.
66 True ['Pacific'] 1942's Time Magazine cover featuring Admiral Chester W. Nimitz referred to his role as the Commander-in-Chief of the United States Pacific Fleet during World War II. The "Big place" in the context of the cover's description refers to the vast expanse of the Pacific Ocean, where much of the naval warfare against Japan took place.

Admiral Nimitz was a key leader in the Pacific theater, overseeing major naval operations such as the Battle of Midway, which turned the tide of the war in the Pacific in favor of the Allies. His command encompassed not only the naval forces but also the maritime strategies and logistics across the vast Pacific area of responsibility. The Pacific Fleet under his leadership played a crucial role in island-hopping campaigns, amphibious landings, and naval engagements that eventually led to the defeat of the Japanese Empire.

The cover's reference to a "Big place" is an understatement, considering the Pacific Ocean covers about a third of the Earth's surface, making it by far the largest geographical feature on the planet. Being in charge of military operations across such an expansive theater was indeed a monumental task, requiring exceptional leadership, strategic acumen, and logistical expertise. Admiral Nimitz's leadership during this critical period in history is still studied today for its effectiveness in managing large-scale military operations in a complex and challenging environment.
67 False ['Third Rock from the Sun'] 3rd Rock from the Sun is the TV sitcom featuring the Solomon family, who are actually aliens from another planet. The show aired from 1996 to 2001 and starred John Lithgow as Dick Solomon, the High Commander of the extraterrestrial crew who poses as a physics professor on Earth. The other main characters include Jane Curtin as Dr. Mary Albright, Kristen Johnston as Sally Solomon, French Stewart as Harry Solomon, and Joseph Gordon-Levitt as Tommy Solomon. The series follows their humorous misadventures as they try to understand human culture and relationships while carrying out their mission on Earth.
68 True ['Tuvalu'] The former Ellice Islands are now known as the country of Tuvalu. Tuvalu derives a significant part of its revenue from leasing the .tv domain name. The .tv domain is particularly popular with television and video-related websites, and the rights to this domain were sold by Tuvalu to various companies over the years, providing the country with a valuable source of income. This arrangement has been a creative and modern way for Tuvalu to boost its national revenue, given its limited natural resources and small economy.
69 True ['Trepanning', 'trepanation', 'trephination', 'trephining'] The medical procedure you're referring to is known as trepanation or trephination. It is one of the oldest surgical procedures known to mankind and involves drilling or scraping a hole into the human skull. The practice dates back to prehistoric times and has been found in various ancient cultures around the world.

The reasons for trepanation have varied throughout history. In ancient times, it was often performed with the belief that it could cure diseases, alleviate headaches, release evil spirits, or relieve pressure within the skull caused by head injuries. Despite the rudimentary nature of the procedure and the lack of understanding of the brain, there is evidence that some individuals survived the operation, as indicated by signs of bone healing around the trepanation sites found in archaeological remains.

Today, a similar procedure known as craniotomy is performed using modern medical techniques for legitimate medical reasons, such as to relieve intracranial pressure following a traumatic brain injury, to remove a brain tumor, or to treat other neurosurgical conditions. Unlike ancient trepanation, modern craniotomies are conducted under sterile conditions with anesthesia and advanced surgical tools, significantly reducing the risks associated with the procedure.
70 True ['Templar'] 1310 marks a significant event in the history of the Knights Templar, a powerful and wealthy Catholic military order that existed for nearly two centuries during the Middle Ages. In 1307, King Philip IV of France, deeply in debt to the Templars, ordered the arrest of all the Knights Templar in France on charges of heresy, blasphemy, various other crimes, and the secret practices of their order.

Following their arrest, many of the Knights Templar were subjected to severe torture by the Inquisition, and they confessed to a variety of charges, including denying Christ, spitting on the cross, and engaging in homosexual practices. These confessions, extracted under duress, were used to build a case against the order.

In 1310, after years of imprisonment and interrogation, a number of Templars were brought to trial in Paris. The ecclesiastical trial was overseen by the Pope's representatives, and it was during this time that many of the knights recanted their earlier confessions, stating that they had been made under torture. Despite their recantations, the Templars were found guilty of heresy.

On May 12, 1310, fifty-four Knights Templar were burned at the stake on an island in the River Seine in Paris. This mass execution was a stark end to many members of the once-prestigious order. The Templars' assets were seized by the French crown, and the order was officially dissolved by Pope Clement V in 1312 at the Council of Vienne.

The suppression of the Knights Templar has been a subject of much historical debate and has given rise to numerous legends and conspiracy theories over the centuries. The dramatic end of the Templars has also been a popular topic in literature and popular culture.
71 True ['Coulis'] A compote that involves slow-cooked fruit in syrup, which has been pureed and strained, and ends with a silent consonant, is likely a "coulis." A coulis is a type of sauce made from pureed and strained fruits or vegetables. The word "coulis" ends with the silent consonant "s." It is often used as a dessert sauce or as a garnish for savory dishes, providing both flavor and a smooth texture. The process of making a coulis typically involves cooking the fruit or vegetable with sugar and water to create a syrup, then blending and straining the mixture to remove any seeds or pulp, resulting in a smooth, pourable sauce.
72 True ['William Faulkner'] The American novelist who created the Compson brothers Benjy, Quentin, and Jason is William Faulkner. These characters are featured in Faulkner's novel "The Sound and the Fury," which was published in 1929. The novel is set in the fictional Yoknapatawpha County, Mississippi, and is known for its stream-of-consciousness narrative style, particularly in the sections devoted to the inner thoughts of the three brothers, as well as their younger sister, Candace (Caddy). Faulkner's complex and deeply psychological portrayal of the Compson family's decline is considered one of the masterpieces of modernist literature.
73 True ['Pinniped'] The mammalian group that includes seals, sea lions, and walruses is known as the Pinnipedia, which comes from the Latin words "pinna" meaning "fin" or "wing" and "pes" meaning "foot." The name Pinnipedia thus refers to animals with fin-like feet, which is a characteristic feature of this group. These aquatic mammals are well-adapted to life in the water, with flippers that aid in their swimming abilities. They belong to the order Carnivora and are divided into three families: Odobenidae (walruses), Otariidae (sea lions and fur seals), and Phocidae (true seals).
74 True ['Narita'] 日本の東京都を国際空港につなぐ急行電車「N'ex」は、成田国際空港（Tokyo Narita International Airport）と東京駅を結ぶ線です。N'exは、成田空港から東京駅までの旅時は約60分で、快適で迅速なアクセスを提供しています。また、成田空港から東京を含む多くの主要な駅まで直行や経由するサービスがあります。N'exは、成田空港と東京の間での移動を容易にし、多くの国際旅行者に利用されています。
75 True ['Martinique'] Fort-De-France is the capital of the French Caribbean island and department of Martinique. Martinique is an overseas department of France, which means it has the same political status as the departments in mainland France. It is part of the European Union and its currency is the Euro. Martinique is known for its beautiful landscapes, beaches, and rich cultural heritage, blending French and Caribbean influences. It is also a popular tourist destination, particularly for visitors from France and other parts of Europe.
76 True ['Dierks Bentley'] The country song "Drunk on a Plane" was sung by Dierks Bentley. Dierks Bentley is an American country music singer and songwriter who released "Drunk on a Plane" in April 2014 as the third single from his seventh studio album, "Riser." The song was a commercial success and has become one of Bentley's signature hits. The initials "D.B." in this context refer to Dierks Bentley, not David Bowie, as the song is a country track and David Bowie was known for his work in rock and pop music.
77 True ['Olympus'] If you're a fitfluencer looking for an extreme challenge on Mars, you'd want to set your sights on Olympus Mons, the largest volcano in the solar system. Olympus Mons is a shield volcano, which means it has a broad, gently sloping cone. It is located in the Tharsis region of Mars and is about 21 kilometers (13 miles) high, making it about two and a half times the height of Earth's highest mountain, Mount Everest.

The volcano's base is roughly the size of the state of Arizona, and its summit caldera (the depression at the top of the volcano) is about 80 kilometers (50 miles) wide. The sheer scale of Olympus Mons makes it an ideal destination for any fitfluencer looking to tackle an otherworldly climbing challenge.

However, it's important to note that this would be a purely hypothetical endeavor, as we currently do not have the technology to send humans to Mars, let alone support a climbing expedition on the Martian surface. But in the realm of imagination and future possibilities, Olympus Mons would certainly be the ultimate mountain for any fitness enthusiast to conquer.
78 True ['Groundlings'] If you were part of the "groundlings" or "penny-paying" audience at the Globe Theatre during the Elizabethan era, you would have paid the lowest amount to watch a play. Groundlings were those who stood in the pit, also known as the yard, directly in front of the stage. They paid a penny for admission, which was the cheapest option available.

The groundlings were so named because they were quite literally on the ground level, with no seating provided. This area was open to the elements, and the audience had to stand for the duration of the performance. Despite the discomforts, the groundlings were known for their lively engagement with the plays, often reacting boisterously to the action on stage.

In contrast, wealthier patrons could pay more for a seat in one of the galleries, which offered a better view and protection from the weather. The most expensive seats were in the private boxes, known as "lords' rooms," where the elite could watch the performance in comfort and privacy.
79 True ['Austria'] 1 Euro coins have been issued by several countries within the Eurozone, each with their own unique designs on the national side. Josef Kaiser designed the 1 Euro coin for Austria. The Austrian 1 Euro coin features the portrait of Eugen Böhm von Bawerk, an Austrian economist who made significant contributions to the development of the Austrian School of economics. The design also includes the denomination "1 EURO," the year of issue, and the flag of Austria. Each Eurozone country has its own design for the national side of the coin, while the common side, which shows the value and a map of Europe, is the same across all countries issuing Euro coins.
80 True ['November Rain'] 1. The line "Nothing lasts forever, even cold November rain" is from the Guns N' Roses song "November Rain," which suggests that the month in question is November.
2. The song "November Rain" is from the album "Use Your Illusion I," which was released in 1991.
3. Axl Rose, the lead vocalist of Guns N' Roses, is known for his distinctive voice and the song's lyrics reflect themes of love, loss, and the ephemeral nature of life and relationships.
4. "November Rain" is one of the band's most popular songs and is known for its elaborate music video, which was one of the most expensive music videos ever made at the time of its release.
5. The song's title and lyrics directly reference the month of November, making it clear that this is the month Axl Rose is referring to in the line you've quoted.
81 True ['Kerry'] The politician who discussed being a Vietnam veteran, a 5-term senator, and Secretary of State in the memoir "Every Day is Extra" is John Kerry. He served as a U.S. Navy officer during the Vietnam War, where he was awarded several combat medals, including the Silver Star, the Bronze Star, and three Purple Hearts. After his military service, Kerry entered politics and was elected to the U.S. Senate, where he served five terms representing Massachusetts from 1985 to 2013. He was also the Democratic nominee for President in the 2004 election, which he narrowly lost to incumbent President George W. Bush. Later, Kerry served as the 68th United States Secretary of State under President Barack Obama from 2013 to 2017. His memoir, "Every Day is Extra," was published in 2018 and provides an account of his life and career in public service.
82 True ['Viviparous'] The word you're looking for is "viviparous." Viviparous animals are those that give birth to live young rather than laying eggs. The embryo develops inside the mother's body, receiving nourishment through a placenta or similar structure, and is born in a more developed state compared to the hatchlings of oviparous (egg-laying) species. This term is commonly used in biology to describe the reproductive method of many mammals, as well as some species of fish, amphibians, and reptiles.
83 True ['Azerbaijan'] Baku, the capital city of Azerbaijan, is the lowest national capital in the world in terms of elevation below sea level. It is situated at an elevation of approximately 28 meters (92 feet) below sea level. This unique geographical feature makes Baku the largest city in the world located below sea level. Azerbaijan is a country in the South Caucasus region of Eurasia, straddling the continental borders between Europe and Asia. The city's location on the shores of the Caspian Sea contributes to its status as the lowest-lying capital.
84 True ['Flubber'] 1997 remake of Disney's 1961 film "The Absent-Minded Professor" is titled "Flubber." The film stars Robin Williams as Professor Philip Brainard, who invents a super bouncy substance that he names "flubber," which is short for "flying rubber." The original 1961 film featured Fred MacMurray as Professor Ned Brainard, and the substance was simply called "flubber" as well. Both films revolve around the comedic and chaotic adventures that ensue as a result of the professor's invention.
85 True ['Quiet Desperation'] In "Walden," Henry David Thoreau wrote the famous line: "The mass of men lead lives of quiet desperation." This quote is from the first chapter of the book, titled "Economy," and reflects Thoreau's observation that many people live their lives without fulfilling their true potential or pursuing their own genuine interests, instead succumbing to societal pressures and expectations. Thoreau's work is a reflection on simple living in natural surroundings, as he spent two years, two months, and two days in a cabin he built near Walden Pond in Massachusetts, contemplating society, nature, and individual freedom.
86 True ['Marlow'] The book character you're referring to is Charles Marlow, the protagonist of Joseph Conrad's novella "Heart of Darkness," published in 1899. Marlow is a sailor and an ivory transporter who travels up the Congo River in search of the enigmatic and influential ivory trader Mr. Kurtz. Throughout his journey, Marlow encounters the brutal realities of colonialism and the exploitation of the African continent by European powers.

The famous quote about "the horror" comes near the end of the novella, when Marlow finally meets Kurtz. Kurtz, who has become deeply immersed in the local culture and has taken on a god-like status among the natives, utters the phrase "The horror! The horror!" just before his death. This moment, and the novella as a whole, serves as a critique of the hypocrisy and moral emptiness that Conrad perceived in European colonial practices, as well as a broader questioning of the nature of civilization and humanity's capacity for both greatness and savagery.
87 True ['Gallium'] The element with the symbol Ga is gallium, which is indeed a metal with a relatively low melting point (about 29.76 degrees Celsius or 85.57 degrees Fahrenheit). Gallium is used in various applications, including semiconductors, LEDs, and thermometers. However, the description you've provided seems to be a reference to a shape-shifting robot inspired by the T-1000 from the "Terminator" film series.

While gallium itself doesn't give a robot the ability to shape-shift like the T-1000, researchers have been exploring the use of gallium alloys, particularly gallium-indium alloys, for the development of soft robots or components that can change shape when exposed to magnetic fields or changes in temperature. These alloys can be liquid at room temperature and have been used to create materials that can flow and change shape, which could be used in the future for creating transformable robotic structures.

One such example is the use of gallium alloys in the creation of "liquid metal" machines that can reconfigure themselves. These machines typically use the alloy's responsiveness to electrical currents or magnetic fields to manipulate its shape. However, as of my knowledge cutoff in 2023, a fully shape-shifting robot like the T-1000 remains in the realm of science fiction, and practical applications of gallium alloys in robotics are still in the early stages of research and development.
88 True ['Fancy Free'] The ballet you're referring to is "Fancy Free," which was indeed the first ballet choreographed by Jerome Robbins. It premiered on April 18, 1944, with music by Leonard Bernstein. "Fancy Free" is a one-act ballet about three sailors on shore leave in New York City during World War II, looking to have a good time before they have to return to their ship. The ballet captures their adventures, interactions with local women, and the camaraderie and rivalry among the sailors.

The success of "Fancy Free" led to the creation of the musical "On the Town," which expanded the story of the three sailors with additional music and lyrics by Betty Comden and Adolph Green. "On the Town" opened on Broadway in December 1944 and became a hit, launching Robbins' career as a major figure in both ballet and musical theater. The ballet "Fancy Free" does not end with a word that rhymes with "ree," but the connection to "On the Town" is significant as both works share thematic and musical elements.
89 True ['Justinian'] 6th century outbreak of Bubonic Plague is known as the Plague of Justinian, named after the Byzantine Emperor Justinian I. The plague struck the Byzantine Empire during his reign, with its first occurrence in 541-542 AD. It is considered one of the deadliest pandemics in history, causing widespread devastation and significantly weakening the empire. The plague recurred in various waves over the next two centuries, with significant impact on the demographic and political landscape of the Mediterranean and Near East regions.
90 True ['Pensacola'] 1559 A Spanish expedition led by Tristán de Luna y Arellano settled near what is today Pensacola, Florida. The expedition established a short-lived settlement called Santa María de Ochuse, which was located in the area of present-day Pensacola Bay. The settlement was intended to be a base for Spanish operations in the region, but it faced numerous challenges, including hurricanes, food shortages, and conflicts with indigenous peoples. After about two years, the settlement was abandoned, and the survivors relocated to other Spanish colonies. Pensacola would later become a significant site for various European powers, but it was not permanently settled until the 17th century.
91 True ['Avogadro'] The Italian scientist who formulated the law regarding the relationship between the volume, temperature, and pressure of gases, and the number of molecules they contain, is Amedeo Avogadro. Avogadro's Law, also known as Avogadro's hypothesis or Avogadro's principle, states that under the same conditions of temperature and pressure, equal volumes of gases contain the same number of molecules.

This law was first proposed by Avogadro in 1811 and is fundamental to our understanding of the behavior of gases. It implies that the volume of a gas is directly proportional to the number of moles of gas (with each mole containing a fixed number of molecules, now known to be approximately 6.022 x 10^23 molecules per mole, which is Avogadro's constant). This principle is a cornerstone of the ideal gas law and is crucial for understanding stoichiometry in chemical reactions involving gases.
92 True ['Tequila'] 1958 The Champs had a No. 1 hit with the sax-heavy tune "Tequila." The song is an instrumental, with the only lyric being the title, "Tequila," which is shouted at certain points during the track. It became a classic in the rock and roll and pop genres and is often associated with parties and celebrations. The song's catchy saxophone riff and energetic rhythm have made it an enduring favorite over the decades. "Tequila" won the Grammy Award for Best R&B Performance at the 1st Annual Grammy Awards in 1959.
93 True ['August Strindberg'] The Swede with a monthly name who wrote "Married," a collection of short stories published in 1884, is August Strindberg. His full name is Johan August Strindberg. "Married" is part of a series of works that explore the complexities of marriage and gender relations, and it is known for its critical and somewhat controversial portrayal of marriage. Strindberg's work often provoked strong reactions, and his views on women and marriage were particularly contentious. Although he was not persecuted specifically for the publication of "Married," his writings did lead to accusations of blasphemy and immorality at various points in his career. Strindberg's later work, "The Dance of Death" (1900), is another example of his exploration of the darker sides of marriage.
94 True ['Freebooter'] The name you're referring to seems to be a play on words involving the term "free" and a pirate-related theme. In the context of pirates, the term "free" could be a reference to a "freebooter," which is an archaic term for a pirate. Freebooter comes from the Dutch word "vrijbuiter," which literally means "free booty," implying someone who takes plunder or loot freely.

If we're looking for a pun or a creative name for a pirate that incorporates the word "free," it could be something like "Freebootin' Fred," "Captain Freebeard," or "Pegleg Freebooty." These names are playful and incorporate the concept of "free" in a way that's fitting for a pirate character. The specific name would depend on the context in which it's used, such as a book, a game, or a themed event.
95 True ['Bhutan'] 24,980-foot Gangkhar Puensum is located in the Kingdom of Bhutan, which is often referred to as the "Land of the Thunder Dragon" or "Druk Yul" in Dzongkha, the official language of Bhutan. This remote and mountainous country is situated in the eastern Himalayas, north of India and south of the Tibet Autonomous Region of China.

Gangkhar Puensum is not only the highest unclimbed mountain in Bhutan but also in the world. The mountain's name translates to "White Peak of the Three Spiritual Brothers." The Bhutanese government has prohibited climbing on Gangkhar Puensum and other peaks above 6,000 meters (19,685 feet) out of respect for local spiritual beliefs and to preserve the sanctity of the region. This has helped to maintain the mountain's status as unclimbed.
96 True ['Moravia'] The three regions named in the preamble to the Czech Constitution are Bohemia, Moravia, and Silesia. These regions historically comprise the lands of the Czech Crown and are integral parts of the Czech Republic. The preamble of the Constitution of the Czech Republic, adopted in 1992 after the dissolution of Czechoslovakia, acknowledges the historical statehood of these territories and their significance in the formation of the Czech state. Moravia is the eastern region of the Czech Republic, known for its fertile land, historical towns, and wine production, while Silesia is the small northern part of the country, with a history of coal mining and heavy industry. Bohemia, the largest of the three, occupies the western and central parts of the country and includes the capital city, Prague.
97 True ['Ampere', 'Ampère'] The base unit of electrical current is named for the French physicist André-Marie Ampère. The unit of electric current is the ampere (symbol: A), and it is one of the seven base units in the International System of Units (SI). Ampère's work was fundamental to the science of classical electromagnetism, and the ampere is named in his honor to recognize his contributions to the field. Ampère formulated Ampère's law, which relates the magnetic field created by a current-carrying conductor, and he also made significant contributions to the development of electrodynamics.
98 True ['Sphynx'] The hairless breed of cat that got its start in Canada in the 20th century with a kitten named Prune is the Sphynx cat. The Sphynx breed is known for its lack of fur, wrinkled skin, and large ears. The breed's development began in 1966 in Toronto, Canada, when a domestic shorthair cat gave birth to a hairless kitten due to a natural genetic mutation. This kitten was named Prune, and it became the foundation for the Sphynx breed.

Breeders in Canada and the Netherlands began to develop the breed by outcrossing to various other breeds, including the Devon Rex, to increase genetic diversity and to refine the Sphynx's distinctive features. The Sphynx was recognized by the Cat Fanciers' Association (CFA) in 2002 and has since become a popular breed due to its unique appearance and affectionate personality.
99 True ['Vorpal Sword'] In Tim Burton's 2010 film "Alice in Wonderland," Alice Kingsleigh (played by Mia Wasikowska) slays the Jabberwocky with the Vorpal Sword. The Vorpal Sword is a legendary weapon in the world of Wonderland (or Underland, as it is called in this adaptation), and it is said to be able to cut through just about anything with ease.

The phrase "Callooh! Callay!" is an exclamation of joy from the poem "Jabberwocky" by Lewis Carroll, which is featured in his novel "Through the Looking-Glass, and What Alice Found There." In the context of the film, the characters in Underland utter these words upon the defeat of the Jabberwocky, celebrating the end of the Red Queen's tyranny and the return of the White Queen's rule.
100 True ['Vulgate'] St. Jerome is credited with the Vulgate, which is a late-4th-century Latin translation of the Bible. The term "Vulgate" comes from the Latin word "vulgata," which means "to be spread among the people." Jerome completed this translation around 405 AD, and it became the standard Latin Bible for the Western Church. The Vulgate was a significant work because it translated the scriptures from the original languages (Hebrew, Greek, and Aramaic) into Latin, which was the common language of the Roman Empire at the time, thus making the Bible more accessible to the people of the era.
101 True ['Eisenhower'] President Dwight D. Eisenhower increased the minimum wage to $1.00 an hour and approved and opened the St. Lawrence Seaway. The minimum wage was increased through the Fair Labor Standards Amendments of 1955, which raised the minimum wage from 75 cents to $1.00 an hour, effective March 1, 1956.

The St. Lawrence Seaway, a system of locks, canals, and channels that allows ocean-going vessels to travel from the Atlantic Ocean to the Great Lakes, was officially opened on June 26, 1959, during Eisenhower's presidency. This project was a joint effort between the United States and Canada, and it significantly impacted trade and economic development in the region.
102 True ['Bret Easton Ellis'] "Less than Zero" is a novel by Bret Easton Ellis, first published in 1985. Despite the novel's setting in the 1980s, it is often associated with the 1990s due to its enduring popularity and the 1990s film adaptation. The story follows a group of wealthy, disaffected young people living in Los Angeles, dealing with themes of excess, disconnection, and the search for meaning in a superficial world. Bret Easton Ellis is known for his satirical and often controversial portrayals of contemporary American society and culture.
103 True ['Kent'] The white cliffs of Dover are located along the coast of Kent, which is a county in southeastern England. These iconic cliffs face the Strait of Dover, which is the narrowest part of the English Channel, separating England from France. The cliffs are a symbol of Britain and have been a sign of hope and freedom, particularly during World War II. They are composed of chalk accented by streaks of black flint and reach up to 350 feet (110 meters) in height.
104 True ['Florence Pugh'] Toby Sebastian is the brother of actress Florence Pugh, who has appeared in films such as "Don't Worry Darling," "Midsommar," "Black Widow," and "Little Women." Florence Pugh has gained significant recognition for her acting skills and has been nominated for an Academy Award for her role in "Little Women." Toby Sebastian is also an actor and musician, known for his role as Trystane Martell in the HBO series "Game of Thrones," among other projects. The siblings are part of a creative family; their older brother is the musician and songwriter Arabella Gibbins, and their younger brother, Alfie Gibbins, is also a musician.
105 False ['Ha Ha'] The term for a sunken fence or ditch designed to separate animals from human territory is called a "ha-ha." This type of landscape feature is designed to be invisible from a distance, preserving the view across the landscape while still serving as a barrier.

Thomas Jefferson's Monticello, his primary plantation near Charlottesville, Virginia, did not originally have a ha-ha. However, Jefferson was familiar with the concept, as it was a common feature in English landscape design during the 18th century. He did incorporate a similar idea in the form of a "natural bridge" on the grounds of his other property, Poplar Forest, which served a similar purpose by creating an unobtrusive barrier.

The name "ha-ha" is thought to have originated from the unexpected reaction of people coming across these sunken barriers, as they would be amused or surprised by the sudden drop, hence the exclamation of "ha-ha!"
106 True ['Venerate'] The word you're looking for is "venerate," which comes from the Latin word "venerari," meaning "to worship, revere, honor." Venerate means to regard with great respect, reverence, or to honor someone or something with a feeling of deep respect. It is often used in the context of showing reverence to sacred objects, religious figures, or individuals who are highly esteemed for their wisdom, achievements, or moral integrity. The noun form of "venerate" is "veneration."
107 True ['Flagella', 'Flagellum', 'Flagellin'] The parts of a bacterial cell that provide motility and are typically longer than cilia are called flagella. Flagella are long, whip-like appendages that extend from the cell surface and are used for locomotion. They are much larger than cilia, which are shorter, hair-like structures also involved in movement but more commonly associated with eukaryotic cells.

Bacterial flagella are complex structures composed of a protein called flagellin. They are anchored in the cell envelope and rotate in a corkscrew-like motion to propel the bacterium through its environment. The rotation is powered by a motor-like structure at the base of the flagellum, which uses the proton motive force or, in some cases, the sodium motive force to generate torque.

There are different types of flagellar arrangements in bacteria:

1. Monotrichous: A single flagellum at one end of the cell.
2. Lophotrichous: Multiple flagella at one end (in a tuft).
3. Amphitrichous: A single flagellum at each end of the cell.
4. Peritrichous: Flagella distributed all over the cell surface.

Flagella not only allow bacteria to move towards favorable conditions (such as nutrients) and away from harmful ones (such as toxins or antibiotics), but they also play a role in the initial stages of biofilm formation and can be involved in the attachment to surfaces and other cells.
108 True ['Bill Hodges'] 'Finders Keepers' is the second book in the Bill Hodges Trilogy, which is a series of detective novels written by Stephen King. The first book in the series is indeed 'Mr. Mercedes,' and the third and final book is 'End of Watch.' The trilogy follows retired detective Bill Hodges as he confronts a series of cases, often involving the criminal Brady Hartsfield, who is central to the overarching narrative. The series blends elements of crime fiction with the supernatural elements that King is known for in his horror novels.
109 True ['Manila'] John Basilone, a United States Marine Corps Gunnery Sergeant who served during World War II, was posthumously awarded the Medal of Honor for his actions at the Battle of Guadalcanal. He was also awarded the Navy Cross for his heroism during the Battle of Iwo Jima, where he was killed in action.

During his service in the Philippines in the 1930s, Basilone earned the nickname "Manila John" due to his boxing prowess in the city of Manila. The nickname reflects both his association with the capital city of the Philippines and his reputation as a tough and skilled fighter, both inside and outside the boxing ring. His experiences in the Philippines helped shape him into the battle-hardened Marine who would later become one of the most famous heroes of World War II.
110 True ['Io'] 2022, the Juno spacecraft captured a magnificent infrared image of Io, one of Jupiter's moons, showing its volcanoes glowing. Io is the most volcanically active body in the solar system, and Juno's instruments are able to detect the heat signatures of its numerous volcanic eruptions. The infrared images taken by Juno's Jovian Infrared Auroral Mapper (JIRAM) instrument reveal the intense heat emanating from Io's volcanoes, which are often not visible in the visible light spectrum due to the moon's thick atmosphere and the bright glare of Jupiter. These images help scientists understand the internal heating mechanisms driving Io's volcanic activity.
111 True ['NewsRadio'] Phil Hartman lent his dulcet tones to the role of Bill McNeal on the 1990s sitcom "NewsRadio." The show aired from 1995 to 1999 and featured Hartman as the egotistical, yet charming and talented, news anchor at the fictional New York radio station WNYX. Hartman's portrayal of McNeal was widely praised and is considered one of his most memorable roles. The series also starred Dave Foley, Maura Tierney, Stephen Root, Andy Dick, Vicki Lewis, Joe Rogan, and Khandi Alexander.
112 True ['hermeneutics'] Τhe branch of theology that deals with the interpretation of biblical texts is known as "hermeneutics." The word "hermeneutics" comes from the Greek word "ἑρμηνευτική" (hermēneutikē), which is derived from "ἑρμηνεύς" (hermēneus), meaning "interpreter." The plural form of the word, which is sometimes used to refer to the principles or methods of interpretation, is "hermeneutics." However, it is more common to use the singular form "hermeneutics" even when discussing the field or discipline as a whole, rather than using a plural form.
113 True ['Pascal'] 1642 is the year often associated with the birth of Blaise Pascal, the French mathematician, physicist, inventor, philosopher, and writer for whom a computer programming language is named (Pascal). However, it is important to note that Pascal's adding machine, known as the Pascaline, was actually invented later, around 1642-1643.

The Pascaline was one of the first mechanical calculators and was designed to help his father, a tax collector, perform the tedious calculations required for his work. The device could perform addition and subtraction directly and multiplication and division through repeated addition or subtraction. Pascal's invention was a significant step forward in the development of mechanical calculators and is a testament to his ingenuity and contributions to both mathematics and technology.
114 True ['Colleen Hoover'] As of my last update in early 2023, the woman author who took the top two spots on the paperback trade fiction list with "It Ends with Us" and "It Starts with Us" is Colleen Hoover. "It Ends with Us" was originally published in 2016 and became a New York Times bestseller. "It Starts with Us," the sequel to "It Ends with Us," was released in 2022 and also quickly climbed the bestseller lists.

As for "Heart Bones," it is another novel by Colleen Hoover, but it is not directly related to the "It Ends with Us" series. "Heart Bones" was published in 2021 and has also enjoyed significant popularity.

Colleen Hoover is a prolific author known for her romance and women's fiction novels, many of which have achieved bestseller status. Her ability to craft emotionally resonant stories has earned her a large and dedicated fan base.
115 True ['Rhode Island'] Jackie and JFK, at St. Mary's Church near Hammersmith Farm, would be in the state of Rhode Island. Hammersmith Farm is located in Newport, Rhode Island, and it was the summer home of the Auchincloss family, to whom Jackie Kennedy was related by marriage. The couple was married on September 12, 1953, at St. Mary's Church in Newport, and the reception was held at Hammersmith Farm. This location is a significant part of the Kennedy family history and American political history.
116 True ['Stalingrad'] The Nazis' advance into Russia was stopped at the city of Stalingrad (now known as Volgograd). The Battle of Stalingrad, which lasted from August 23, 1942, to February 2, 1943, was a major turning point in World War II. It was here that the German 6th Army, along with elements of the 4th Panzer Army and other Axis allies, were encircled and eventually forced to surrender to the Soviet forces.

The surrender of the German 6th Army under General Friedrich Paulus on February 2, 1943, marked a significant defeat for Nazi Germany and a pivotal strategic victory for the Soviet Union. This battle is considered one of the bloodiest in modern history, with enormous casualties on both sides. The Soviet victory at Stalingrad not only halted the German advance into the Soviet Union but also marked the beginning of the steady retreat of the German army from Eastern Europe.
117 True ['Karma Chameleon'] Boy George, the lead singer of the band Culture Club, sang the lyrics "You come and go, you come and go" in the hit song "Karma Chameleon." Released in 1983, "Karma Chameleon" became one of Culture Club's most successful singles, topping charts around the world and becoming an iconic song of the 1980s. The song is known for its catchy chorus and colorful music video, which complements the themes of change and adaptation suggested by the lyrics. The term "Animal Rock" isn't a commonly recognized genre or descriptor for Culture Club's music, which is typically classified as new wave with elements of pop, soul, and reggae.
118 True ['Hagiography'] The word "hagiography" has come to mean an admiring or idealized biography of a person, often a saint or a religious figure. It originally referred to the writings of the early Christian church on the lives of saints, but over time, its usage has expanded to include any biography that treats its subject with undue reverence or uncritical admiration, glossing over their flaws and presenting an overly positive portrayal. The term is derived from the Greek words "hagios," meaning holy, and "graphia," meaning writing.
119 True ['Potsdam'] The city you are referring to is Potsdam, Germany. Potsdam was once the residence of the Elector of Brandenburg, and it later became the site of the Potsdam Conference, which took place from July 17 to August 2, 1945, near the end of World War II. The conference was held at the Cecilienhof, the home of the last crown prince of the German Empire and the Kingdom of Prussia.

The Potsdam Conference was attended by three heads of government: British Prime Minister Winston Churchill (later replaced by Clement Attlee), Soviet Premier Joseph Stalin, and U.S. President Harry S. Truman. The leaders gathered to discuss the post-war order, the division of Germany into occupation zones, the expulsion of Germans from the eastern parts of Germany and other parts of Eastern Europe, and the future of Poland, among other issues. The conference resulted in the Potsdam Agreement, which laid the groundwork for the post-war period and the early Cold War era.
120 True ['Francis Bacon'] 17th century essayist and Lord Chancellor of England Francis Bacon shares the same first and last name with the 20th century painter Francis Bacon, known for his work "Head of a Woman (Lisa Sainsbury)" among many other paintings. Both individuals were notable figures in their respective fields and time periods, with the elder Bacon being a philosopher, statesman, and author, and the younger Bacon being an Irish-born British figurative painter known for his bold, grotesque, emotionally charged, and raw imagery.
121 True ['Calypso'] Odysseus's son, Telemachus, visits the nymph Calypso in Homer's "Odyssey." Calypso is a nymph who lives on the island of Ogygia, where she detains Odysseus for seven years before he is allowed to continue his journey home to Ithaca. Telemachus goes to Ogygia in search of his father, guided by the goddess Athena, who is disguised as Mentor.

The scene of Telemachus's arrival and welcome by Calypso has been depicted by various artists throughout history. Angelica Kauffmann, an 18th-century Swiss painter, was known for her Neoclassical style and for being one of the founding members of the Royal Academy in London. While she painted many subjects from classical mythology and history, there is no specific record of her depicting the welcome of Telemachus by Calypso. However, it is possible that she could have painted a scene from the "Odyssey" involving these characters, as it was a popular subject among Neoclassical artists.

The name "Calypso" is also associated with a style of music that originated in the Caribbean, specifically Trinidad and Tobago, in the early to mid-20th century. Calypso music is a genre that uses a rhythmic and melodic structure that is often coupled with satirical and political commentary. The name of the nymph Calypso and the music style are related in that they both evoke themes of the Caribbean and its cultural heritage. However, the nymph Calypso predates the music style by many centuries, with her story being told in ancient Greek literature.
122 True ['The Thing'] The movie you're referring to is "The Thing" (1982), directed by John Carpenter. The film is set in Antarctica, where a group of American researchers at a remote base encounter a shape-shifting alien that can assume the appearance of any living organism it absorbs. Kurt Russell plays R.J. MacReady, a helicopter pilot and the protagonist of the film, who becomes a key figure in the fight for survival against the alien entity. The movie is known for its groundbreaking special effects, suspenseful atmosphere, and the paranoia that develops among the base's crew as they try to determine who has been assimilated by the alien. "The Thing" is based on the novella "Who Goes There?" by John W. Campbell Jr., and it has become a classic in the science fiction and horror genres.
123 False ['Sir James Dewar'] The verse you're referring to is a playful, fictional jab at the character Sir James, who is portrayed as a man of superior abilities, particularly in the realm of science. The lines suggest that none of the addressees ("you asses") can match Sir James' skill in "liquefying gases," which is a challenging scientific process.

Liquefying gases is a complex task that involves cooling them to a temperature below their critical point, where they can coexist as both liquid and gas, and then applying pressure to convert them entirely into a liquid state. This was a significant scientific achievement in the 19th and early 20th centuries, as it allowed for the storage and transport of gases in a more compact liquid form. Notable figures in the history of gas liquefaction include Michael Faraday, who first liquefied several gases in the 1820s, and later, scientists like Louis Cailletet and Raoul Pictet, who were among the first to liquefy air and other permanent gases in the 1870s and 1880s.

The verse seems to be a lighthearted way to celebrate Sir James' scientific prowess, implying that he has mastered a difficult and impressive scientific feat that his peers have not. It's worth noting that "Sir James" is likely a stand-in for a real or imagined scientist and is not necessarily referring to a specific historical figure. The verse captures the spirit of competition and one-upmanship that can be found in the scientific community, albeit in a humorous and exaggerated manner.
124 True ['Cold Open'] 'Saturday Night Live' is famous for beginning its shows with a cold open, which is a scene that precedes the opening credits and the show's title sequence. The cold open typically ends with someone breaking character and proclaiming, "Live from New York, it's Saturday Night!" This phrase has become iconic and is a staple of the show's introduction each week. The term "cold open" refers to the fact that the scene starts without any lead-in or introduction, going "cold" into the content.
125 True ['Tom Jones'] The Welsh legend who unexpectedly joined Jennifer Hudson for a duet on "It's a Man's Man's Man's World" during an episode of "The Voice U.K." is Sir Tom Jones. The performance occurred when Jennifer Hudson, who was a coach on the show, sang the song during a live episode. Sir Tom Jones, also a coach on the show, surprised both the audience and Hudson by joining her on stage, leading to a powerful and memorable duet. Tom Jones is known for his powerful voice and has a long-standing connection with the song, having famously covered it earlier in his career.
126 True ['Windward'] Due northwest of the west end of Hispaniola is the Windward Passage, which is a strait in the Caribbean Sea between the islands of Cuba and Hispaniola. Hispaniola is the island that contains the countries of Haiti and the Dominican Republic.

Further southeast of Hispaniola are the same-named islands of the Turks and Caicos Islands, which are a British Overseas Territory. These islands are located at the southeastern end of the Bahamas chain and are known for their beautiful beaches and clear waters, making them a popular tourist destination.
127 True ['Butler'] The novel "Kindred" is written by Octavia E. Butler. Published in 1979, it is a seminal work of science fiction that blends elements of historical fiction, time travel, and a powerful exploration of race, gender, and the legacy of slavery in the United States. The protagonist, Dana, is a black woman living in the 1970s who finds herself repeatedly pulled back in time to the antebellum South, where she must navigate the dangers of a slave-holding society to ensure her own survival and that of her ancestors.
128 False ['peristaltic', 'peristalsis'] Yes, during pregnancy, heartburn can result from the body slowing down the motility of the gastrointestinal tract, which includes the waves of muscle contractions that move food through the stomach and intestines. This slowdown can cause food to stay in the stomach longer, which can lead to increased production of stomach acid and a higher likelihood of that acid being pushed up into the esophagus, causing the burning sensation known as heartburn.

Additionally, as the pregnancy progresses, the growing uterus can put pressure on the stomach, which can also push stomach contents back up into the esophagus. Furthermore, hormonal changes during pregnancy, particularly increased levels of progesterone, can relax the lower esophageal sphincter (LES), the muscle that normally keeps the stomach's contents from moving back up into the esophagus. When the LES is relaxed, it becomes easier for stomach acid to escape and cause heartburn.

To manage heartburn during pregnancy, it is often recommended to:

- Eat smaller, more frequent meals instead of large meals.
- Avoid foods and beverages that can trigger heartburn, such as spicy, fatty, or fried foods, caffeine, chocolate, and peppermint.
- Stay upright for at least an hour after eating.
- Avoid eating close to bedtime.
- Use extra pillows to prop up the upper body during sleep.
- Wear loose-fitting clothing to reduce pressure on the stomach.
- Drink fluids between meals rather than during meals.
- Consult with a healthcare provider before taking any over-the-counter antacids or heartburn medications to ensure they are safe during pregnancy.

If heartburn persists or is severe, it's important for pregnant individuals to discuss their symptoms with their healthcare provider to find appropriate treatments that are safe for both the mother and the developing baby.
129 True ['The Unbearable Lightness of Being'] Tereza, Tomas, and Sabina are characters in the novel "The Unbearable Lightness of Being" by Milan Kundera. The novel explores themes of love, betrayal, and the search for meaning in life, set against the backdrop of the Prague Spring and the subsequent Soviet invasion of Czechoslovakia in 1968. Tereza's love for Tomas is a central element of the story, as is Tomas's complex relationship with his mistress, Sabina. The novel delves into the nature of relationships and the weight of personal and political decisions.
130 False ['endoskeleton'] 12 letter long or longer word for the internal supporting structure of vertebrates is "vertebral column." This term refers to the series of bones that make up the spinal column, which provides support for the body and protection for the spinal cord in vertebrates, including humans. The vertebral column is composed of individual bones called vertebrae, which are separated by intervertebral discs and held together by ligaments and muscles. It is also known as the spine or backbone.
131 True ['Luminosity'] An astronomical anagram for 'Mutiny Oils' that relates to a star's brightness could be "Luminosity." The term "luminosity" in astronomy refers to the total amount of energy emitted per unit of time by a star, galaxy, or other astronomical object. It's a measure of the intrinsic brightness of the object, as opposed to its apparent brightness, which is affected by its distance from Earth.

To rearrange the letters of "Mutiny Oils" to spell "Luminosity," you would need to use all the letters and rearrange them as follows:

M U T I N Y O I L S
L U M I N O S I T Y

This anagram uses each letter from "Mutiny Oils" exactly once to form the word "Luminosity," which is a key concept in the study of stars and their properties.
132 True ['Black Rebel Motorcycle Club'] BRMC stands for Black Rebel Motorcycle Club, a rock band that indeed takes its name from Marlon Brando's biker gang in the 1953 film "The Wild One." The band was formed in 1998 by Peter Hayes and Robert Levon Been, and they are known for their blend of garage rock, psychedelic rock, and blues influences. They have released several albums and are recognized for their intense live performances and dedication to their music and fans. The name Black Rebel Motorcycle Club reflects the band's rebellious spirit and their appreciation for the counterculture elements present in the film.
133 True ['Yellen'] The question seems to be referring to a situation where a former Chair of the Federal Reserve (FED) has become a successor to the President of the United States. As of my last update in early 2023, no former FED chair had become president. However, Janet Yellen, who served as the Chair of the Federal Reserve from 2014 to 2018, became the United States Secretary of the Treasury under President Joe Biden's administration.

If the question is hypothetical and asking about a scenario where a former FED chair has become president, then the answer would be whichever individual that holds the position after the current president, assuming that person was a former FED chair. Since this is a hypothetical scenario, there is no specific individual to name.

If the question is about a historical event that has already occurred, then there might be a misunderstanding, as no former FED chair has directly succeeded a president as of my last update. Please provide more context or check the facts for the most recent developments.
134 True ['Auricle'] The external parts of animals' ears are often referred to as "pinnae" (singular: pinna), which are the visible flaps or protrusions on the sides of the head. The term "auricle" (plural: auricles) is also used, especially in reference to human ears, to describe the outer, visible part of the ear.

In the heart, the auricles are the upper chambers that receive blood from the veins. The term "auricle" in the context of the heart is derived from the Latin word "auricula," which means "little ear," due to the resemblance of these heart chambers to the external ear. In human anatomy, the right atrium has an ear-shaped appendage called the right atrial auricle, and similarly, the left atrium has the left atrial auricle. These auricles in the heart are involved in the collection of blood returning to the heart from the body (via the vena cava into the right atrium) and from the lungs (via the pulmonary veins into the left atrium).
135 False ['Josef K'] The description you've provided closely matches the character of Charles Foster Kane from the film "Citizen Kane," directed by Orson Welles. However, since you're asking about a novel character, it's possible you're referring to a character from a novel that has not been mentioned, or you might be thinking of a character that has similarities to Charles Foster Kane.

In "Citizen Kane," Charles Foster Kane is a wealthy newspaper magnate whose life is portrayed in a non-linear narrative after his death. The film explores his rise to power and his personal downfall, including his relationships and his ultimate isolation in his vast estate, Xanadu. The famous line "Rosebud" is central to the film's mystery, as it represents Kane's longing for his lost childhood and innocence.

While "Citizen Kane" is a film and not a novel, it's worth noting that the character's life does not follow the exact timeline you've described. Kane does not have legal issues on his 30th birthday, nor is there a specific focus on him at age 31. However, the concept of an arrested development and the loss of a "letter-perfect life" does resonate with Kane's character, as he struggles with his inability to maintain meaningful relationships and his dissatisfaction with life despite his wealth and success.

If you're looking for a character from a novel who fits the description more closely, you might be thinking of Jay Gatsby from F. Scott Fitzgerald's "The Great Gatsby." Gatsby is a man who has built a life of opulence and mystery, largely as a means to win back his former love, Daisy Buchanan. Gatsby's life is marked by his attempt to grasp an idealized past, which could be seen as a form of arrested development. His legal issues stem from his involvement in criminal activities to amass his wealth, and his dream ultimately unravels, leading to his downfall and death.

The Kafkaesque element you mention refers to the themes and situations found in the works of Franz Kafka, which often involve individuals caught up in nightmarishly complex and surreal bureaucratic systems, struggling with an overwhelming sense of alienation, and facing absurd or fantastical transformations. While neither Charles Foster Kane nor Jay Gatsby experiences a Kafkaesque transformation, both characters deal with themes of alienation and the elusiveness of personal fulfillment, which can be seen as Kafkaesque in a broader sense.
136 True ['Animorphs'] The book series you're referring to is "Animorphs," written by K.A. Applegate. The series began in 1996 and follows a group of teenagers who have the ability to morph into any animal they touch. They use this power to fight a secret alien invasion of Earth by a parasitic race known as the Yeerks. The main characters are Jake, Rachel, Tobias, Cassie, and Marco, along with their alien ally, Ax. The series was highly popular throughout the 1990s and early 2000s, spanning 54 main books, as well as supplementary books and spin-offs.
137 True ['St. Lawrence Seaway'] The Welland Canal is a major part of the St. Lawrence Seaway, which is a 2,300-mile (approximately 3,700 kilometers) navigation route connecting the Great Lakes to the Atlantic Ocean. This seaway allows ships to travel from the North American heartland to the open sea, facilitating trade and transportation between the Midwest United States and international markets.

The St. Lawrence Seaway itself is composed of a series of canals, locks, and channels that bypass natural obstacles along the St. Lawrence River and the Great Lakes. The Welland Canal specifically bypasses Niagara Falls and allows ships to move between Lake Erie and Lake Ontario, effectively stepping up or down the Niagara Escarpment. The seaway extends from the Gulf of St. Lawrence on the Atlantic coast, through the St. Lawrence River, and includes the Great Lakes and their connecting channels, all the way to Duluth, Minnesota, at the western end of Lake Superior.
138 True ['Richard Powers'] 'The Overstory' is a novel by Richard Powers that is partially set during the Pacific Northwest timber wars. The book, which was published in 2018, weaves together the stories of nine characters whose lives are interconnected by their relationships with trees and forests. The timber wars refer to the environmental conflicts in the late 20th and early 21st centuries over the logging of old-growth forests in the Pacific Northwest region of the United States. Powers uses these events as a backdrop to explore themes of environmentalism, activism, and the deep connections between humans and the natural world.
139 True ['midships'] The word you're looking for is "midships." In naval terminology, "midships" refers to the middle part or central region of a ship. During battles, this area could indeed be a site of intense combat as it often houses vital command centers, armaments, and is a key structural component of the vessel. The term "midships" can be used both as a noun to refer to the central area itself and as an adjective to describe locations or features in the middle part of the ship.
140 True ['Maximilian'] Mary of Burgundy received a diamond ring with the letter 'M' on it from Maximilian I, the Holy Roman Emperor. The ring was a token of their engagement and later marriage. Maximilian I was an archduke of Austria and became the Holy Roman Emperor in 1493. The letter 'M' on the ring stood for both Mary and Maximilian, symbolizing their union. Their marriage in 1477 was significant in European history, as it marked the beginning of the Habsburg dynasty's rise to prominence in Europe. Mary of Burgundy was the only child of Charles the Bold, Duke of Burgundy, and upon his death, she inherited the vast Burgundian territories, which Maximilian helped to defend and manage after their marriage.
141 True ['Formosa'] 18th century London was captivated by the figure of George Psalmanazar, who claimed to be from Taiwan, which at the time was known as Formosa. The name "Formosa" was given to the island by Portuguese explorers in the 16th century, derived from the Portuguese phrase "Ilha Formosa," meaning "beautiful island." Psalmanazar fabricated an elaborate backstory, including a fictional language and customs, and even wrote a book about Formosa, which was widely read at the time. His deception was eventually uncovered, but not before he had become a minor celebrity in London society.
142 True ["Li'l Abner"] Al Capp created the comic strip "Li'l Abner," which was set in the fictional town of Dogpatch, USA. The strip debuted in 1934 and ran until 1977. It was a satirical and humorous take on rural life in the American South, featuring a cast of colorful characters such as the naive but strong Abner Yokum, his girlfriend Daisy Mae Scragg, the villainous Boss Hogg, and the mysterious Shmoo, among others. The strip was very popular during its run and had a significant cultural impact, influencing language, fashion, and even politics.
143 True ['Uzbekistan'] The seven countries whose names end in 'Stan' are:

1. Afghanistan
2. Kazakhstan
3. Kyrgyzstan
4. Pakistan
5. Tajikistan
6. Turkmenistan
7. Uzbekistan

To determine which is alphabetically last, we can look at the last letter of each name that comes after the 'Stan' suffix, since all the names before that point are identical in this context. Here's how they rank based on the letter following 'Stan':

1. Afghanistan - a
2. Kazakhstan - k
3. Kyrgyzstan - y
4. Pakistan - k
5. Tajikistan - k
6. Turkmenistan - k
7. Uzbekistan - k

Since 'y' comes after 'k' in the alphabet, Kyrgyzstan is alphabetically last among the 'Stan' countries.
144 False ['Worsted'] The fabric starting with 'W' that sounds bad but is actually a type of woven material is "Woolen." Woolen fabrics are made from wool fibers that have been spun into yarn and then woven or knitted into fabric. The term "woolen" often refers to a type of yarn that is soft, fuzzy, and slightly elastic, which is then used to create warm and insulating garments such as suits, coats, sweaters, and pleated skirts.

However, if you're thinking of a fabric that is specifically known for being used in suits and pleated skirts, and has a more negative connotation, you might be thinking of "Wool Crepe." Wool crepe has a crimped or crinkled surface and can be associated with a less refined or outdated look, depending on the context. Despite this, wool crepe is still a durable and versatile fabric that is used in various garments, including suits and pleated skirts, due to its structure and ability to hold pleats well.
145 True ['Boole'] 1815 is the birth year of George Boole, an English mathematician, philosopher, and logician. He is best known for his work in the field of mathematical logic and for his invention of Boolean algebra, which is the basis of modern digital computer logic. Boolean algebra revolutionized the way we think about logic by expressing logical propositions as algebraic equations.

Some of the eponymous things named after George Boole include:

1. Boolean Algebra: A branch of algebra that deals with true or false values, as opposed to the usual numerical values. It is fundamental to the design of digital circuits and is used extensively in computer science.

2. Boolean Logic: The logical framework underlying Boolean algebra, which is used in various fields such as computer science, electronics, and mathematics.

3. Boolean Operators: These are the basic operations in Boolean algebra, such as AND, OR, NOT, XOR, etc., which are used to perform logical operations.

4. Boolean Search: In the context of search engines, Boolean search allows users to combine keywords with operators (AND, OR, NOT) to produce more relevant results.

George Boole's work laid the foundations for the information age and has had a lasting impact on the development of computer science and digital technology.
146 True ['Siegfried'] Richard Wagner began writing a poem called "The Death of Siegfried" around 1850, which eventually became part of his monumental "Der Ring des Nibelungen" (The Ring of the Nibelung) cycle. The poem was initially conceived as a standalone work but later evolved into the libretto for "Götterdämmerung," the final opera in the tetralogy. "Götterdämmerung" tells the story of the hero Siegfried's betrayal and death, as well as the eventual destruction of the gods and the world, culminating in a redemptive and transformative ending. The "Ring" cycle as a whole is a complex work that explores themes of love, power, and redemption, and it remains one of the most significant achievements in the history of opera.
147 False ['Tyrion Lannister'] The line "We've had vicious kings and we've had idiot kings, but I don't know if we've ever been cursed with a vicious idiot boy king" is spoken by the character Charles Montague, 1st Earl of Halifax, in the television series "The Great" (2020). The character is portrayed by actor Sacha Dhawan. "The Great" is a satirical, comedic drama about the rise of Catherine the Great, Empress of Russia, and her plot to overthrow her husband, Emperor Peter III, who is often depicted as being both cruel and foolish. The show is a fictionalized account of historical events and is known for its dark humor and dramatic liberties.
148 True ['Havel'] 'Leaving', a 2008 tragicomedy, was written by Václav Havel, who was a prominent Czech playwright, essayist, poet, dissident, and politician. Havel served as the last President of Czechoslovakia from 1989 until the dissolution of Czechoslovakia in 1992 and then as the first President of the Czech Republic from 1993 to 2003.

'Leaving' was indeed his first play in more than two decades, with his previous major work being "Largo Desolato" in 1984. 'Leaving' draws on Havel's experiences as a politician and president, exploring themes of power, identity, and the challenges of transitioning from public life to private existence. The play reflects on the complexities of post-communist society and the personal toll of political life. It premiered at the Archa Theatre in Prague in 2008.
149 True ['Ghent'] The Treaty of Ghent, named after the city in Belgium, ended the War of 1812 between the United States and Great Britain. It was signed on December 24, 1814, and effectively restored relations between the two nations to their pre-war status. The treaty was ratified by the U.S. Senate on February 16, 1815, and by the British government on February 18, 1815. The war itself is often considered to have ended in a stalemate, with neither side achieving its original objectives. News of the treaty took time to reach the combatants, and as a result, some battles, including the famous Battle of New Orleans, were fought after the treaty had been signed but before it was ratified.
150 True ['Parliament Hill'] John Diefenbaker and Lester Pearson are both commemorated with statues on Parliament Hill in Ottawa, Canada. Parliament Hill is the location of the Canadian Parliament buildings, and it is a common site for monuments and statues of significant figures in Canadian history.

John Diefenbaker, the 13th Prime Minister of Canada, served from 1957 to 1963. His statue on Parliament Hill depicts him in a characteristic pose, with his overcoat and fedora, and is located near the East Block building.

Lester B. Pearson, the 14th Prime Minister of Canada, served from 1963 to 1968 and was also a Nobel Peace Prize laureate for his role in resolving the Suez Crisis. His statue is also situated on Parliament Hill, capturing his likeness in a dignified stance.

These statues serve as a tribute to their contributions to Canadian politics and society. Parliament Hill is a popular tourist destination and these statues are part of the many historical and cultural landmarks that visitors can see.
151 True ['Electroconvulsive therapy'] ECT stands for Electroconvulsive Therapy, which is a medical treatment most commonly used for patients with severe major depression or bipolar disorder that has not responded to other treatments. It involves a brief electrical stimulation of the brain while the patient is under anesthesia. This stimulation induces a controlled seizure, which can sometimes provide relief from psychiatric symptoms.

The exact mechanisms by which ECT works are not fully understood, but it is thought to affect neurotransmitter systems in the brain, potentially leading to changes in brain chemistry that can reverse symptoms of certain mental health conditions. ECT is considered a safe and effective treatment when administered by qualified professionals, although it can have side effects, including memory loss and confusion, which are typically temporary.
152 True ['Dominican'] The Order known as the Black Friars is the Dominican Order, officially known as the Order of Preachers (Ordo Praedicatorum, OP). The Dominicans were founded by Saint Dominic in the early 13th century, and they are known for their work in preaching, teaching, and combating heresy. The members of the Dominican Order wear a black cloak over their white habits, which is why they are commonly referred to as the Black Friars. This is in contrast to other mendicant orders like the Franciscans, who are known as the Grey Friars, and the Carmelites, who are known as the White Friars, based on the colors of their respective habits.
153 True ['Will and Grace', 'Will & Grace'] The TV sitcom you're referring to is "Will & Grace." The show originally aired from 1998 to 2006 and was rebooted in 2017, running until 2020. During its original run, "Will & Grace" won 16 Emmy Awards out of 83 nominations. The reboot also received several Emmy nominations, though it did not win as many as during its initial run. The show was significant for its portrayal of gay characters and for contributing to the changing attitudes toward the LGBTQ community in the United States.
154 True ['Axolotl'] ¡Hola! The salamander you're referring to is the Axolotl (Ambystoma mexicanum). The name "Axolotl" comes from the Nahuatl language, spoken by the Aztecs, where it is spelled "āxōlōtl" and indeed means "water monster" or "water dog." These fascinating amphibians are native to the lake complex of Xochimilco near Mexico City. They are known for their ability to regenerate limbs and organs, and they have become popular in scientific research as well as in the pet trade. Unfortunately, axolotls are critically endangered in the wild due to habitat loss, pollution, and introduced species.
155 False ['Sentience'] If you take the phrase "prison term" and insert the letter "s" after the "i" in "prison," you get "prisonism term." However, this does not directly relate to a book by Nicholas Humphrey about consciousness.

Nicholas Humphrey, a theoretical psychologist, has written several books on consciousness, including "A History of the Mind" and "Seeing Red: A Study in Consciousness." The book that is most closely related to the topic of consciousness, and which involves a play on words similar to your question, is "Soul Dust: The Magic of Consciousness."

In "Soul Dust," Humphrey explores the nature of consciousness and proposes that our conscious experience is a subjective construction of reality, a kind of user-illusion that is conjured up by the brain. The book delves into various aspects of consciousness, including perception, emotion, and the sense of self, and discusses how these phenomena contribute to our experience of being alive and aware.

The title "Soul Dust" itself suggests a transformation of the ordinary into something extraordinary, much like the transformation of "prison term" into a book title by the insertion of a letter. However, there is no direct connection between the phrase "prison term" and Humphrey's work on consciousness as far as I know.
156 True ['William Jennings Bryan'] The presidential campaign slogan "Let the people rule" was used by William Jennings Bryan during his campaign for the presidency in the late 19th and early 20th centuries. Bryan was a prominent Democrat and populist who ran for president three times, in 1896, 1900, and 1908. He is perhaps best known for his "Cross of Gold" speech, which he delivered at the 1896 Democratic National Convention, advocating for bimetallism (the use of both silver and gold as monetary standards) as a way to help farmers and the working class. Despite his passionate advocacy for the common people, Bryan was never elected president.
157 False ['Knowledge is Power'] Sir Francis Bacon wrote the phrase "Ipsa scientia potestas est," which is Latin for "Knowledge itself is power." This phrase is often associated with the idea that the acquisition of knowledge can empower individuals and is a fundamental aspect of human progress and enlightenment. It reflects Bacon's advocacy for empirical and inductive methods of scientific inquiry, which he believed would lead to the advancement of human knowledge and the improvement of the human condition. This philosophy is central to the scientific method as it is known and practiced today.
158 True ['Suva'] The capital of Fiji with 4 letters that is home to the University of the South Pacific is Suva. Suva is the largest city in Fiji and serves as the political, economic, and cultural hub of the country. The University of the South Pacific, which is a regional university with campuses across several Pacific island nations, has its main campus located in Suva. The city is also the location of the Fijian government and many international agencies and embassies.
159 True ['Monsanto'] Some crops have indeed been genetically engineered to be resistant to herbicides, particularly to glyphosate, which is the active ingredient in Roundup. Roundup was first developed and marketed by Monsanto, an American agrochemical and agricultural biotechnology corporation. Monsanto introduced Roundup in the 1970s, and it quickly became one of the most widely used herbicides in the world.

In the 1990s, Monsanto began developing genetically modified (GM) crops that were resistant to the effects of Roundup, allowing farmers to spray the herbicide directly onto fields without harming the crops. These crops, known as "Roundup Ready," include soybeans, corn, cotton, canola, alfalfa, and sugar beets, among others. The introduction of these GM crops significantly changed farming practices, enabling more effective weed control but also raising concerns about potential environmental impacts and the development of herbicide-resistant weeds.

Monsanto itself has undergone changes, as it was acquired by Bayer, a German multinational pharmaceutical and life sciences company, in 2018. Following the acquisition, Bayer decided to phase out the Monsanto name, but the company continues to produce Roundup and Roundup Ready seeds.
160 True ['Rothaniel'] Jerrod Carmichael's 2022 stand-up special is titled "Rothaniel," which is also his first name. In this special, Carmichael addresses various personal topics and reveals secrets about his life, including his sexuality and family dynamics. The special was highly acclaimed for its vulnerability and humor, as Carmichael tackled complex and intimate subjects with his characteristic wit and insight. The revelation of his first name being Rothaniel was one of the many personal details he shared with his audience during the performance.
161 True ['Kyushu'] Ōkinoshima is a small sacred island located in the Sea of Japan (East Sea), near the southernmost of Japan's main islands, Kyushu. It is part of Munakata city in Fukuoka Prefecture. The island, along with related sites in the region, was inscribed as a UNESCO World Heritage Site in 2017 under the name "Sacred Island of Okinoshima and Associated Sites in the Munakata Region."

The island is considered sacred in the Shinto religion and has been a place of worship for many centuries, with the Munakata Taisha shrine playing a significant role in the island's religious importance. Access to Ōkinoshima is heavily restricted to preserve its spiritual and natural environment, and it is primarily managed by the Shinto priests of Munakata Taisha.
162 True ['Rimsky-Korsakov'] The group known as "The Five" or "The Mighty Handful" (Могучая кучка) in St. Petersburg, Russia, consisted of five prominent Russian composers in the mid-19th century. They were:

1. César Cui
2. Alexander Borodin
3. Mily Balakirev
4. Modest Mussorgsky
5. Nikolai Rimsky-Korsakov

Rimsky-Korsakov was the fifth member of this group, which was influential in developing a distinctly Russian style of classical music, often in contrast to the more Western-oriented style of composers like Tchaikovsky, who was based in Moscow. The Five were particularly interested in incorporating elements of Russian folk music and mythology into their compositions.
163 True ['Ming'] The Chinese dynasty that ruled from 1368 to 1644 and is known for importing blue pigment from Prussia for its porcelain is the Ming Dynasty. The blue pigment, commonly referred to as "blue and white porcelain," was made using cobalt ore, which was initially imported from Persia and later from regions that included Prussia (present-day Germany and surrounding areas). This pigment was used to decorate fine porcelain, which became highly sought after both within China and in international trade, particularly in Europe and the Middle East. The Ming Dynasty's blue and white porcelain is still celebrated today for its beauty and craftsmanship.
164 True ['Leguizamo'] The Latino actor who starred in "Summer of Sam" (1999) and "Spawn" (1997) and also voiced the character of Bruno Madrigal in the animated film "Encanto" (2021) is John Leguizamo. He is a versatile actor, comedian, and screenwriter known for his work in film, television, and theater. Despite his extensive career and notable performances, Leguizamo has expressed his disappointment with the final version of "Encanto," particularly with the portrayal of his character, Bruno, which is why some fans might say "but we don't talk about that" in reference to his role in the film.
165 True ['Thorazine', 'Chlorpromazine'] 1954 marked the approval of the first antipsychotic medication by the FDA, which was chlorpromazine, also known by its brand name Thorazine. Chlorpromazine revolutionized the treatment of psychiatric disorders, particularly schizophrenia, by reducing symptoms such as hallucinations, delusions, and thought disorders. It was the first drug to demonstrate efficacy in treating psychotic symptoms and paved the way for the development of other antipsychotic medications.

In the context of the film "Shutter Island," which is set in 1954, Dr. John Cawley, played by Ben Kingsley, would have had high hopes for chlorpromazine as a treatment for the patients at Ashecliffe Hospital, the fictional mental institution on Shutter Island. The introduction of chlorpromazine would have been seen as a significant advancement in the field of psychiatry, offering a new level of care and the potential for recovery for patients suffering from severe mental illness.
166 True ['Jungian'] The concept of the anima is central to the analytical psychology developed by Carl Gustav Jung. Jung's theory posits that the anima is the inner feminine aspect of a man's psyche, while the animus is the masculine aspect of a woman's psyche. These concepts are part of Jung's broader theory of the collective unconscious and the process of individuation, which involves integrating unconscious aspects of the self into consciousness.

Jungian analysis, also known as Jungian psychotherapy, is a form of therapy that aims to bring unconscious elements of the psyche into conscious awareness to achieve greater balance and wholeness. It is named after Carl Jung, who was a Swiss psychiatrist and psychoanalyst who founded analytical psychology.
167 True ['Giorgione'] The Venetian Renaissance painter you're referring to is Giorgione, whose name indeed translates to "Big George" in English. Giorgione, whose full name was Giorgio Barbarelli da Castelfranco, was a significant figure in the Venetian school of Italian Renaissance painting. He is known for his innovative use of color and his mysterious and evocative compositions.

One of his most famous works is "The Tempest," which is renowned for its enigmatic subject matter and masterful use of light and shadow. Giorgione's influence on the Venetian school was profound, and his style had a lasting impact on his contemporaries, including Titian, who was influenced by Giorgione's approach to landscape and atmospheric effects. Unfortunately, Giorgione's career was cut short by his untimely death at a young age, possibly due to the plague, leaving a relatively small but highly influential body of work.
168 True ['Wisconsin'] Samuel's Cave, which has suffered from vandalism affecting its prehistoric art, is located in Wisconsin, within La Crosse County. The cave is known for its Native American petroglyphs and pictographs, which are significant cultural and historical artifacts. Efforts have been made to preserve and protect the site from further damage, as it holds great importance for understanding the region's prehistoric inhabitants and their way of life.

Please note that access to Samuel's Cave and similar archaeological sites may be restricted to protect them from further vandalism and degradation. It's important to respect these sites and follow the guidelines set by local authorities and indigenous communities to ensure their preservation for future generations.
169 True ['Highly Effective People'] The three words that complete the title of Stephen R. Covey's book are "Highly Effective People." The full title is "The 7 Habits of Highly Effective People." This book is a business and self-help book that describes a holistic approach to personal and interpersonal effectiveness, and it has been highly influential since its publication in 1989. Covey presents an approach to being effective in attaining goals by aligning oneself to what he calls "true north" principles based on a character ethic that he presents as universal and timeless.
170 True ['linear accelerator'] Menlo Park, CA, is home to the SLAC National Accelerator Laboratory, which houses a 2-mile-long linear accelerator, commonly referred to as a "linac." This linac is part of the Stanford Linear Collider (SLC), which was used to study particle interactions and the fundamental forces of nature. The linac at SLAC was the longest in the world at the time of its construction and was instrumental in various high-energy physics experiments, including those that led to the discovery of the charm quark and the bottom quark.

The term "linac" is short for "linear accelerator," which is a type of particle accelerator that accelerates charged particles, such as electrons or protons, in a straight line using radiofrequency electromagnetic fields. Particles are accelerated to very high speeds and collided with either a stationary target or with other particles moving in the opposite direction, allowing physicists to probe the structure of matter at the smallest scales.

While the SLC has been decommissioned, the linac at SLAC continues to be used for other purposes, such as driving the Linac Coherent Light Source (LCLS), which is a free-electron laser that produces extremely bright and short pulses of X-ray light for a wide range of scientific research. The LCLS has since been upgraded to the LCLS-II, which aims to provide even more powerful and frequent X-ray pulses to study the ultrafast dynamics of atoms, molecules, and materials at the nanoscale and in extreme environments.
171 True ['Criminal Minds'] Mr. Scratch, whose real name is Peter Lewis, is a villain who first appeared in season 10 of the CBS series "Criminal Minds." The show is set at the Behavioral Analysis Unit (B.A.U.), which is a department of the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI). The B.A.U. is composed of profilers who analyze the country's most twisted criminal minds in an effort to anticipate their next moves before they strike again.

Mr. Scratch became a recurring antagonist in the series, known for his ability to manipulate and control others using a combination of drugs and psychological tactics. He was portrayed by actor Bodhi Elfman.
172 True ["don't look a gift horse in the mouth", "don't check the mouth of a gift horse"] The Italian proverb "a caval donato non si guarda in bocca" translates to "don't look a gift horse in the mouth" in English. This saying means that when someone gives you a gift, you should not be ungrateful or overly critical of it. Instead, you should be thankful for the gesture and not scrutinize the gift too closely, especially for its monetary value or potential flaws.

The English equivalent captures the same sentiment of appreciating the thought behind a gift rather than focusing on its imperfections. It's a reminder to be gracious and accept gifts with grace, regardless of whether they are exactly what you wanted or not.
173 True ['Commonwealth of Nations'] 1. The 1926 Balfour Report referred to the recommendations made by the Imperial Conference of 1926, which was held in London. The report was named after the British statesman Arthur Balfour, who chaired the conference.

2. The key outcome of the Balfour Report was the definition of the relationship between the self-governing Dominions of the British Empire and the United Kingdom. The Dominions at the time included Canada, Australia, New Zealand, South Africa, the Irish Free State, and Newfoundland.

3. The report declared that these Dominions were "autonomous Communities within the British Empire, equal in status, in no way subordinate one to another in any aspect of their domestic or external affairs."

4. This principle laid the foundation for the Statute of Westminster in 1931, which formalized the political equality between the self-governing Dominions and the United Kingdom. The Statute of Westminster is often seen as the constitutional beginning of the modern Commonwealth of Nations.

5. The 12-letter group that describes the relationship as stated in the Balfour Report is "Commonwealth Realms." However, it's important to note that the term "Commonwealth Realms" was not used in the Balfour Report itself; it is a term that came into use later to describe the independent countries within the Commonwealth that share the same monarch as their head of state. The Balfour Report paved the way for the evolution of the Dominions into fully independent Commonwealth Realms.
174 True ['William Blake'] The page you are referring to is from "The Marriage of Heaven and Hell," a work by the visionary English artist and poet William Blake. Published in 1790, "The Marriage of Heaven and Hell" is a series of texts written in imitation of biblical prophecy but expressing Blake's own intensely personal Romantic and revolutionary beliefs. It is a classic example of Blake's idiosyncratic and highly symbolic art and poetry, combining text with engravings that he designed, etched, and colored himself. The work is known for its radical theology, critiquing the repressive nature of conventional religion and morality, and it includes the famous "Proverbs of Hell," which challenge traditional ideas about good and evil.
175 True ['Han'] 3,740 feet, Seoul's Moonlight Rainbow Fountain is installed on the Banpo Bridge, which spans the Han River. The fountain uses water pumped directly from the Han River, which is then recycled and illuminated with colorful lights to create a spectacular visual display. The Moonlight Rainbow Fountain holds the Guinness World Record for the longest bridge fountain in the world, and it serves as a popular tourist attraction in Seoul, South Korea. The water is filtered and treated before being sprayed through the fountain's nozzles, ensuring that the water used is both environmentally friendly and safe for the public.
176 True ['Finnish'] The European language you might be thinking of with the words "Tuli" for fire and "Tuuli" for wind is Finnish. Finnish is known for its double vowels, which can change the meaning of a word, as you've illustrated with the examples. The double "u" in "Tuuli" indicates a longer vowel sound than the single "u" in "Tuli," and this distinction is phonemically significant in Finnish, meaning it can differentiate words and their meanings. Finnish is part of the Finno-Ugric language family, which also includes Estonian and Hungarian, among others. These languages are known for their rich systems of vowels and consonants, as well as their agglutinative morphology.
177 True ['Prometheus'] The Titan you're referring to is Prometheus. In Greek mythology, Prometheus is known for his intelligence and for being a benefactor of humanity. He is credited with the creation of man from clay, and after the gods and Titans divided the world, Prometheus sided with Zeus and the Olympians during the Titanomachy, the war against the Titans.

After the war, Prometheus famously defied Zeus by stealing fire from Mount Olympus and giving it to humanity. This act greatly angered Zeus, who saw it as an affront to his authority and a theft of the divine prerogative. As punishment, Zeus ordered Prometheus to be chained to a rock, where an eagle (or sometimes depicted as a vulture) would eat his liver every day, only for it to regenerate each night due to his immortality, subjecting him to an eternity of suffering.

The "it was lit" phrase is a modern colloquialism that means something was exciting or excellent, which humorously contrasts with the grim fate that befell Prometheus after his act of defiance. The "it got real dark" part of your question alludes to the grim and dark period that followed for Prometheus, as well as the shadow that was cast over mankind, who had lost their protector and benefactor.

Prometheus's punishment was eventually ended when the hero Heracles (Hercules), as one of his Twelve Labors, killed the eagle and freed Prometheus. According to some versions of the myth, this was part of a secret agreement between Zeus and Prometheus, where Prometheus would reveal to Zeus a prophecy that threatened his power, thus ensuring Zeus's continued rule. In return, Zeus allowed Heracles to free Prometheus.
178 True ['plethora'] The 8-letter word from the Greek "plērēs," meaning "fullness," that can signify an overabundance is "plethora." A plethora is an excess of something, often far beyond what is needed or natural. It can be used in various contexts, such as a plethora of choices, a plethora of information, or a plethora of resources. The term carries a connotation of being overwhelming due to the sheer amount or number of things present.
179 True ['As you Like It'] The speech containing the line "My Brother Jaques He keeps at school, and report speaks goldenly of his profit" is from William Shakespeare's play "As You Like It." This line is spoken by Duke Senior, who is the older brother of Duke Frederick and the father of Rosalind. Duke Senior has been banished to the Forest of Arden, and in Act 2, Scene 7, he reflects on the positive reports he has heard about his son Jaques' progress in school. Here is the speech with the context:

DUKE SENIOR:
Thou seest we are not all alone unhappy:
This wide and universal theatre
Presents more woeful pageants than the scene
Wherein we play in.

JAQUES:
But whither shall we go?

DUKE SENIOR:
No matter whither, we will go with thee.
Thou art a metamorphosed with thy peevish churlishness.

JAQUES:
Why, your encounters rather comfort me
Than fear me to the world: it seems to me
That you are in a fine frame for dying,
That you are well prepar'd to leave the world,
That you are, indeed, philosopher'd.

DUKE SENIOR:
Thou art a fool; the world shall be thy table,
And thou shalt feast on it. Thou art a beast,
That wants discourse of reason: would thou hadst
Been sonned by a mountaineer, a ploughman's son,
Thou art a base, proud, shallow, beggarly,
Three-suited, hundred-pound, filthy, worsted-stocking knave; a lily-liver'd,
Action-taking, whoreson, glass-gazing,
Super-serviceable, finical rogue; one-trunk-inheriting
Slave; one that wouldst be a bawd, in way of good service,
And art nothing but the composition of a knave, beggar, coward, pandar,
And the son and heir of a mongrel bitch: one whom I will beat
Into clamorous whining, if thou deny'st the least syllable of thy addition.

JAQUES:
Good my lord, put your discourse into some frame, and start not so wildly from my affair.

DUKE SENIOR:
Why, thou inconsiderate fool,
Hast thou not noted? had not else been told?
That Jaques, thy brother, is in prison?

JAQUES:
For what offence?

DUKE SENIOR:
His sayings. Here is a letter for thee.

JAQUES reads the letter.

JAQUES:
By my troth, I was never so berhymed since I was born. I will be strange, stout, in yellow stockings, and cross-gartered, even with the swiftness of putting on. Jove and my stars be praised! Here is a fancy, how a man may be in debt and yet have his credit with him! But, indeed, I have been reading of the usurers, and they, in cases of extremity, will lend out money to their friends at 24 per centum, and yet compound for the principal.

DUKE SENIOR:
Thou art a strange fellow; a fool, but thou hast the spirit of a noble. I will be thy friend, and I'll tarry with thee; for thy humour is mine own. But let me ask thee one question.

JAQUES:
I pray thee, ask it.

DUKE SENIOR:
How hast thou been a libertine, as thou art reported?

JAQUES:
Why, your lordship, being at liberty, and having the power to command, I did indulge myself in all kinds of pleasures, but now I am resolved to become a hermit and to live in the forest, away from the corrupt world.

DUKE SENIOR:
No, be not a hermit; but a feaster on the world, a philosopher. I have a son, who is studying at school, and I hear good reports of his progress.

JAQUES:
I am glad to hear it, my lord.

DUKE SENIOR:
My Brother Jaques He keeps at school, and report speaks goldenly of his profit.

This speech reflects the themes of nature versus civilization and the transformative power of the pastoral setting, which are central to "As You Like It." Duke Senior's reflections on his son's education also contrast with the "education" that Jaques, the speaker's namesake, has received from the world.
180 True ['Oort'] The green comet that visited Earth in early 2023, officially designated C/2022 E3 (ZTF), was thought to originate from the Oort Cloud. The Oort Cloud is named after the Dutch astronomer Jan Oort, who proposed its existence in 1950. It is a vast, spherical shell of icy objects that is believed to surround the Sun at a distance of up to 100,000 astronomical units (AU), which is about 1.87 light-years away.

The Oort Cloud is considered the source of long-period comets, which have highly eccentric orbits and can take thousands of years to complete a single revolution around the Sun. Comet C/2022 E3 (ZTF) is one such long-period comet, and its visit to the inner solar system provided a rare opportunity for astronomers to study these ancient, icy remnants from the formation of the solar system.
181 True ['Croesus'] 1696 is a significant year in English literary history because it is the year that William Congreve's play "The Double Dealer" was first performed. In Act 1, Scene 1 of this play, the character Maskwell says:

"If I can but get a Patent, I shall be as rich as Croesus."

Croesus was the king of Lydia from 560 to 546 BC and is proverbially known for his immense wealth. The phrase "rich as Croesus" has since become a common idiom to describe someone who is extremely wealthy. The mention of a "Patent" in this context likely refers to a royal patent, which in the 17th and 18th centuries could grant a monopoly or exclusive rights to produce or sell certain goods, thus potentially leading to great wealth for the holder.
182 True ['Germanicus'] The brother of Claudius and father of Caligula who campaigned near the Rhine but got his familiar name from another region was Germanicus Julius Caesar. Germanicus was a prominent Roman general and statesman, who was born as Nero Claudius Drusus, but he earned the name "Germanicus" after his successful campaigns against the Germanic tribes in the early 1st century AD. Despite his military achievements in Germania, he also conducted campaigns near the Rhine frontier, consolidating Roman control in the region. His military prowess and popularity with the Roman people made him a celebrated figure in Roman history. Germanicus was the nephew of Emperor Augustus and the father of the future Emperor Caligula. His untimely death in Antioch in 19 AD under mysterious circumstances was widely mourned and led to various conspiracy theories in ancient times.
183 True ['Parallax'] The term "parsec" is a portmanteau of "parallax" and "second." A parsec is a unit of distance used in astronomy, equal to about 3.26 light-years or 30.857 trillion kilometers (19.174 trillion miles). It is defined as the distance at which one astronomical unit (the average distance from the Earth to the Sun) subtends an angle of one arcsecond. This unit is particularly useful for measuring the vast distances between stars and other celestial objects. The name reflects the method of determining this distance by measuring the parallax of an object as the Earth orbits the Sun.
184 False ['Jason vs. Mrs. Doubtfire'] In a movie crossover that exists only in the realm of hypothetical scenarios, one could imagine a situation where Jason Voorhees, the iconic slasher from the "Friday the 13th" franchise, might face off against Mrs. Doubtfire, the character portrayed by Robin Williams in the 1993 comedy film of the same name.

Mrs. Doubtfire, a fictional British nanny created by the character Daniel Hillard as a means to spend time with his children after a divorce, is known for her eccentricities, including a memorable scene where she uses a cake with a liberal amount of cream to moisturize her face.

If these two characters were to "take on" each other in a crossover, it would likely be a comedic and surreal encounter, with the sinister, machete-wielding Jason Voorhees confronting the kind-hearted, cross-dressing Mrs. Doubtfire. The contrast between the horror and comedy genres would be a central theme, with the menacing Jason juxtaposed against the whimsical and lovable Mrs. Doubtfire.

However, it's important to note that this is purely a fictional and imaginative scenario, as there is no actual movie where these two characters meet. Both "Friday the 13th" and "Mrs. Doubtfire" are products of vastly different genres and storytelling styles, and their characters have never officially crossed over into each other's worlds in any official capacity.
185 False ['Library Paste'] The thick white adhesive you're referring to that can be used for bookbinding is likely PVA (Polyvinyl Acetate) glue. PVA is a popular adhesive in bookbinding because it's strong, flexible, and dries clear. It's also acid-free, which means it won't damage paper over time. When you say "Put on this old 'L.P'," it sounds like you're using a playful analogy, comparing the record to the adhesive, suggesting that just as you'd put on a record to play music, you'd apply the PVA glue to bind a book.
186 True ['Rime of the Ancient Mariner'] In Samuel Taylor Coleridge's poem "The Rime of the Ancient Mariner," the stanza that mentions the steersman is indeed a longer stanza, breaking the pattern of the predominantly four-line stanzas found throughout the poem. The 9-line stanza in question is part of the section where the mariner describes the dire situation on the ship after the albatross has been slain. Here is the stanza:

```
The steersman's face by his lamp gleamed white;
From the sails the dew did drip—
Till clomb above the eastern bar
The hornèd Moon, with one bright star
Almost atween the tips.

One after one, by the star-dogged Moon,
Too quick for groan or sigh,
Each turned his face with a ghastly pallor
Toward the red and rocky shore,
And dropped down, dead, each sailor.
```

This stanza is significant as it marks the moment when the crew members, who had initially celebrated the death of the albatross, begin to die one by one, their deaths supernaturally linked to the spectral ship that follows them. The mariner is cursed to tell his tale, and this moment is a turning point in the narrative, highlighting the consequences of the mariner's actions and the eerie, supernatural elements that pervade the poem. The "star-dogged Moon" is a particularly striking image, suggesting the relentless pursuit of the crew by their fate, as if the stars and moon are hounding them towards their doom.
187 True ['Montserrat'] In 1493, during his second voyage to the New World, Christopher Columbus named the volcanic island in the West Indies "Montaña Redonda," which means "Round Mountain" in Spanish. However, the island eventually became known as Montserrat, named after the Montserrat mountain range near Barcelona in Spain.

Montserrat has indeed had a history of changing colonial hands. The French first settled the island in 1648, and it was subsequently ruled by both the French and the British throughout the 17th and 18th centuries. The Treaty of Paris in 1783, which ended the American Revolutionary War, confirmed British sovereignty over Montserrat, and it has remained a British territory ever since, with the exception of a brief period of French occupation from 1795 to 1797 during the French Revolutionary Wars. Today, Montserrat is an overseas territory of the United Kingdom.
188 True ['The Commitments'] Roddy Doyle's first novel about an imaginary Irish band is "The Commitments." The novel, published in 1987, tells the story of Jimmy Rabbitte, a young music fanatic who assembles a group of working-class musicians in Dublin to form a soul band. The book follows their struggles and triumphs as they try to bring soul music to the people of Ireland.

"The Commitments" was adapted into a highly successful film of the same name in 1991, directed by Alan Parker. The movie features a cast of then-unknown actors and captures the spirit of the novel with its gritty portrayal of Dublin life and its passionate love for music. The film was well-received and helped to popularize the story, making "The Commitments" a well-known cultural reference. The soundtrack to the film also became popular, featuring classic soul tracks performed by the actors who played the band members.
189 True ['101'] The legend you're referring to involves the mathematician Carl Friedrich Gauss, who, as a young schoolboy, reportedly found a quick way to add up the first 100 positive integers. The task given by his teacher was to calculate the sum of the numbers from 1 to 100.

Gauss realized that he could pair the numbers as follows: 1 with 100, 2 with 99, 3 with 98, and so on, up to 50 with 51. Each of these pairs sums to 101 because each pair consists of a number and its complement to 101 (i.e., n + (101 - n) = 101).

Since there are 50 such pairs, the total sum would be 50 pairs times 101 per pair, which equals 50 * 101 = 5050.

So, each pair totals 101, and the sum of all pairs (the sum of the first 100 positive integers) is 5050.
190 True ['Io'] The lover of Zeus who was turned into a cow was Io. According to Greek mythology, Zeus became enamored with Io, a priestess of Hera (who was also Zeus's wife). To hide his affair from Hera, Zeus transformed Io into a white heifer (cow). However, Hera suspected Zeus's infidelity and asked for the cow as a gift. Zeus could not refuse without arousing suspicion, so he reluctantly handed Io over.

Hera then placed Io under the watchful eye of Argus Panoptes, a giant with a hundred eyes, to prevent Zeus from visiting her. Zeus sent Hermes to rescue Io, and Hermes lulled Argus to sleep and killed him, freeing Io. However, Hera was not fooled and sent a gadfly to constantly torment Io, driving her mad and causing her to wander the world. Eventually, Io reached Egypt, where Zeus restored her human form. Io went on to become the ancestress of many figures in Greek mythology, including the hero Heracles (Hercules).
191 False ['Kim'] The plot you're describing sounds like the historical spy novel "The Jewel in the Crown" by Paul Scott. However, it's important to note that "The Jewel in the Crown" is actually the first book in a series known as "The Raj Quartet," and the specific details about an Irish orphan being trained as a spy are more closely associated with the second book in the series, "The Day of the Scorpion."

"The Raj Quartet" is a series of novels that explore the final days of the British Raj in India, and the tensions and conflicts between the British and the Indians leading up to India's independence in 1947. The series is known for its complex characters and its deep exploration of the themes of colonialism, race, and identity.

In "The Day of the Scorpion," the character of Sarah Layton, who is not an orphan but does have a complex family background, becomes involved in the world of espionage. The story delves into the murky world of intelligence and counter-intelligence during the period of World War II, when the British were particularly concerned about Indian nationalism and the threat of Japanese invasion through Burma.

The series gained wider recognition when it was adapted into a successful television series by Granada Television in 1984, known as "The Jewel in the Crown." The TV adaptation is often credited with bringing the novels to a broader audience and is highly regarded for its faithful representation of the books' intricate narrative and rich historical context.
192 True ['Rum Runner'] Bill McCoy was a well-known rum runner during the Prohibition era in the United States. He became famous for the high quality of the alcohol he supplied, which led to the phrase "the Real McCoy" being used to describe genuine and high-quality products. The term is said to have originated from his reputation for selling unadulterated, authentic liquor, unlike many of his competitors who would dilute or contaminate their spirits to increase profits.

McCoy operated by purchasing alcohol from legal sources in the Caribbean and transporting it to the coastal waters of the United States, where he would sell it to distributors who would then smuggle it ashore. His commitment to not adulterating his product earned him a reputation among those who sought quality spirits during Prohibition, and his name became synonymous with authenticity. The phrase "the Real McCoy" has since entered common usage to refer to anything that is considered the genuine article.
193 True ['Iron Chancellor'] Otto von Bismarck, the Prussian statesman who became the first Chancellor of the German Empire, is often referred to by the nickname "The Iron Chancellor." This moniker reflects his strong, uncompromising, and authoritarian leadership style, which was instrumental in the unification of Germany in 1871 and the subsequent consolidation of the new empire's power. The term "iron" in his nickname symbolizes his steadfastness, strength, and resilience in politics, as well as his ability to forge and maintain a powerful state through both diplomacy and military might.
194 True ['Hamilton'] The documentary 'Riding Giants' features several prominent surfers, but the one who is married to volleyball star Gabrielle Reece is Laird Hamilton. Laird Hamilton is a renowned big wave surfer and is known for his innovative approach to surfing, including his role in the development of tow-in surfing, which allows surfers to catch waves that are too big and fast to paddle into. The documentary, directed by Stacy Peralta, was released in 2004 and covers the evolution of surfing, with a particular focus on big wave surfing. It showcases the lives and careers of pioneering surfers like Hamilton, who have pushed the boundaries of what's possible on a surfboard.
195 True ['Machu Picchu'] Hirem Bingham was searching for the lost city of Vilcabamba, the last stronghold of the Inca Empire, when he was led to the ruins of Machu Picchu by a local farmer named Melchor Arteaga in 1911. Although Bingham initially believed he had discovered Vilcabamba, it later became clear that Machu Picchu was a separate and previously unknown Inca site. The actual location of Vilcabamba was discovered in the 1960s and 1970s by explorers such as Gene Savoy. Machu Picchu, however, became the more famous of the two sites and is now one of the most visited tourist attractions in South America.
196 True ['Manolo Blahnik'] The Spanish shoe designer who made shoes for Sofia Coppola's film "Marie Antoinette" is Manolo Blahnik. He is renowned for his exquisite and elegant high-heeled shoes, which have become iconic in the fashion world. Blahnik's designs are celebrated for their craftsmanship and attention to detail, and they have been worn by numerous celebrities and featured in various films and television shows. His contribution to "Marie Antoinette" helped to evoke the opulence and style of the 18th-century French court, for which the film is known.
197 True ['Aruba'] A colorful Dutch Colonial style building in Oranjestad would be found on the island of Aruba. Oranjestad is the capital and largest city of Aruba, which is a constituent country of the Kingdom of the Netherlands. The city is known for its distinctive Dutch Colonial architecture, characterized by pastel colors and gabled roofs, which reflects the island's Dutch heritage. The buildings in Oranjestad's city center are particularly vibrant and well-preserved, making them a popular attraction for tourists visiting the island.
198 False ['Solarization'] The photographic effect that is 12 letters long, reverses tones, and introduces highlights to images is "posterization." Posterization is a technique that reduces the number of color tones or shades in an image, resulting in large areas of flat color and high contrast, which can give the image a poster-like appearance. This effect can be achieved through both digital and traditional photographic processes, and it is often used for artistic or stylistic purposes to create a dramatic or stylized look in an image.
199 True ['Bartleby'] The title you're referring to is "Bartleby, the Scrivener: A Story of Wall Street" by Herman Melville. This short story, first published in 1853, is a classic of American literature and is often considered one of Melville's best works. The story is narrated by a lawyer on Wall Street who hires a new clerk named Bartleby. Bartleby initially works diligently, but he soon becomes less cooperative, responding to requests with his now-famous phrase, "I would prefer not to." His behavior becomes increasingly erratic and withdrawn, leading to his eventual dismissal and subsequent downfall, which culminates in his imprisonment and death. The story is often interpreted as a commentary on the alienation of the individual in the modern world, the nature of human kindness and obligation, and the dehumanizing effects of the workplace.
200 True ['Quincy Jones'] The person you are referring to is Quincy Jones, the legendary music producer. After suffering a cerebral aneurysm in 1974, his doctors advised him to quit playing the trumpet, which had been a significant part of his career up to that point. Despite this setback, Quincy Jones went on to have an illustrious career as a producer, working on numerous hit records and albums, including Michael Jackson's "Thriller," which is one of the best-selling albums of all time.

In addition to his work with Michael Jackson, Quincy Jones was also instrumental in the production of the charity single "We Are the World" in 1985, which was written by Michael Jackson and Lionel Richie and performed by a supergroup of popular musicians known as USA for Africa. The song aimed to raise funds for famine relief in Africa and became a global anthem for humanitarian aid. Jones's contributions to music have earned him a reputation as one of the most successful and influential producers in the history of the industry.
201 True ['Tikrit'] سدام حسين was born in the village of Al-Awja, which is near the city of Tikrit in Iraq. Tikrit is located on the west bank of the Tigris River, and it is indeed the city that starts with 'T' where Saddam Hussein was born in 1937. After the 2003 invasion of Iraq by U.S.-led forces, Saddam Hussein was found hiding in a small underground bunker near Al-Awja, which is in the vicinity of Tikrit, on December 13, 2003.
202 True ['Abraham Lincoln: Vampire Hunter'] 2012 vampire metafiction monster mash-up of a movie featuring Benjamin Walker as Abraham Lincoln is "Abraham Lincoln: Vampire Hunter." The film is based on the novel of the same name by Seth Grahame-Smith, who also wrote the screenplay. In this alternate history, Lincoln is portrayed as a vampire hunter who takes on the undead as part of his mission to abolish slavery and preserve the Union. The movie blends historical fiction with supernatural horror and action elements, presenting a unique and stylized take on the life of the 16th President of the United States.
203 True ['Jemison'] Inspired by Nichelle Nichols and her groundbreaking role as Lieutenant Uhura in "Star Trek," the first African-American woman to travel to space was Dr. Mae Jemison. She became the first African-American female astronaut when she flew aboard the Space Shuttle Endeavour on mission STS-47 in September 1992. Jemison has often cited Nichols and the character of Uhura as influential in her decision to pursue a career in space exploration. Nichols herself worked with NASA to help recruit minority and female candidates for the space program, which contributed to a more diverse astronaut corps in the years following.
204 True ['Belshazzar'] The ruler mentioned in the book of Daniel as the son of Nebuchadnezzar and who was killed during the fall of Babylon in 539 B.C. is Belshazzar. According to the biblical account in Daniel 5, Belshazzar was the king of Babylon at the time of the city's fall to the Persians under Cyrus the Great.

The story in Daniel tells of a mysterious hand writing on the wall during a feast held by Belshazzar, which no one could interpret until Daniel was brought before the king. Daniel interpreted the writing ("Mene, Mene, Tekel, Upharsin") as a divine message foretelling the end of Belshazzar's reign and the division of his kingdom. That very night, Belshazzar was slain, and Darius the Mede took over the kingdom.

Historical records outside the Bible, such as the Nabonidus Chronicle, confirm that Babylon fell to the Persians in 539 B.C., but they identify Nabonidus, not Belshazzar, as the last king of Babylon. Belshazzar is now understood to have been Nabonidus' son and co-regent. The discrepancy between the biblical account and historical records has been a subject of scholarly debate, but it is generally accepted that Belshazzar was a historical figure who played a significant role in the final days of the Babylonian Empire.
205 True ['Martin McDonagh'] The playwright you're referring to is Martin McDonagh. He is known for his work in both theater and film. "The Cripple of Inishmaan" is one of his most famous plays, which premiered in 1996.

In terms of a film with a similar title, McDonagh wrote and directed "The Banshees of Inisherin," which was released in 2022. Although not directly related to "The Cripple of Inishmaan," "The Banshees of Inisherin" shares thematic and stylistic similarities with McDonagh's play, and both are set on islands off the west coast of Ireland. The film reunites actors Colin Farrell and Brendan Gleeson, who previously starred together in McDonagh's debut feature film, "In Bruges" (2008).
206 True ['Mohs'] The scale you're referring to is the Mohs scale of mineral hardness. The Mohs scale was developed by Friedrich Mohs in 1812, and it ranks materials based on their ability to scratch other materials. It is a qualitative ordinal scale that characterizes the scratch resistance of various minerals through the ability of a harder material to scratch a softer material.

Talc is indeed at the bottom of the Mohs scale, with a hardness value of 1. This means that talc is the softest mineral on the scale and can be scratched by all other materials. Here is the Mohs scale with some common minerals and their corresponding hardness values:

1. Talc
2. Gypsum
3. Calcite
4. Fluorite
5. Apatite
6. Orthoclase (feldspar)
7. Quartz
9. Corundum
10. Diamond

Each mineral can scratch those below it on the scale. For example, quartz (hardness 7) can scratch orthoclase (hardness 6), but it cannot scratch corundum (hardness 9). Diamond, at the top of the scale with a hardness of 10, is the hardest known natural material and can scratch all other materials.
207 True ['White Noise'] The rock band The Airborne Toxic Event took its name from the novel "White Noise" by Don DeLillo. The novel, published in 1985, explores themes of consumerism, media saturation, and the fear of death. A central event in the book is the release of a toxic cloud following a chemical spill, referred to as an "airborne toxic event."

The novel was adapted into a film directed by Noah Baumbach, which premiered in 2022. The film, like the novel, features the airborne toxic event as a pivotal moment in the narrative, which disrupts the lives of the characters and forces them to confront their existential fears.
208 True ['Karnak'] The temple complex on the right bank of the Nile that occupies part of the site of the ruins of ancient Thebes is Karnak. The Karnak Temple Complex is one of the largest religious sites in the world and is particularly famous for its vast Hypostyle Hall, which contains 134 massive columns arranged in 16 rows. The complex is dedicated primarily to the Theban Triad, with the god Amun as its head, his consort Mut, and their son Khonsu.

Karnak was built and expanded over a period of more than 2,000 years by successive pharaohs and kings, making it an impressive open-air museum of ancient Egyptian architecture, art, and religion. It is located near the modern city of Luxor, which was once known as Thebes during the time of the ancient Egyptians. Thebes served as the capital of Egypt during the Middle and New Kingdoms, and its ruins, including Karnak, Luxor Temple, the Valley of the Kings, and the Valley of the Queens, are a testament to its former glory and importance in ancient Egyptian civilization.
209 True ['Dan Rostenkowski'] The Illinois politician you're referring to is Dan Rostenkowski. He served as a Democratic member of the United States House of Representatives from 1959 to 1995, representing Illinois' 5th congressional district, which includes parts of Chicago. Rostenkowski was a powerful figure in Congress, serving as the chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, which plays a key role in taxation and social welfare legislation.

However, his political career came to an abrupt end in the 1990s when he became embroiled in a scandal known as the "post office scandal," where he was accused of misusing official funds for personal use, among other charges. In 1996, Rostenkowski pleaded guilty to two counts of mail fraud and was sentenced to 17 months in prison. He served his sentence and was released in 1997. His conviction was later pardoned by President Bill Clinton in 2000. Rostenkowski passed away in 2010.
210 True ['Gabriel García Márquez', 'Gabriel Garcia Marquez'] In 1976, Mario Vargas Llosa, the renowned Peruvian writer, gave a literal black eye to his fellow South American Nobel laureate, Gabriel García Márquez, who is from Colombia. The incident occurred in Mexico City, where both authors were attending a boxing match. The reasons behind the altercation are not entirely clear, but it is widely believed that it stemmed from a long-standing rivalry and a personal argument.

The two writers, who were once close friends, had a falling out, and the confrontation became a famous anecdote in literary circles. Despite this incident, both Vargas Llosa and García Márquez went on to win the Nobel Prize in Literature: García Márquez in 1982 and Vargas Llosa in 2010. Their contributions to literature have had a profound impact on South American and world literature, and they are both considered giants of the Latin American literary boom of the 20th century.
211 True ['Kepler'] Tycho Brahe's protege, Johannes Kepler, succeeded him as the Imperial Mathematician after Brahe's death in 1601. Kepler had been working with Brahe, analyzing the extensive and precise astronomical observations that Brahe had accumulated over the years. After Brahe's unexpected death, Kepler took over his position and used the data to formulate his famous laws of planetary motion, which were a significant step forward in the understanding of celestial mechanics and the heliocentric model of the solar system.
212 True ['Philip Glass'] "A Musical Portrait of Chuck Close" is a composition by the American composer Philip Glass. Chuck Close, the renowned American painter known for his large-scale, photorealistic portraits, painted a portrait of Philip Glass titled "Phil." The portrait is a part of Close's long-standing practice of painting friends and contemporaries, many of whom are influential figures in the arts.

Philip Glass is one of the most prominent composers of the late 20th century and is known for his minimalist style. His collaboration with Close reflects the close-knit relationships within the New York art scene, where artists from various disciplines often inspire and collaborate with each other.
213 True ['Dangerous Liaisons'] The Starz prequel TV show that depicts the younger Marquise de Merteuil and Vicomte de Valmont from the novel "Les Liaisons Dangereuses" is titled "Dangerous Liaisons." The series serves as a prequel to the 1782 French epistolary novel by Pierre Choderlos de Laclos, which explores the complex web of seduction and manipulation between the two main characters.

The show delves into the formative years of the Marquise de Merteuil and the Vicomte de Valmont, exploring how they became the notorious and manipulative figures depicted in the novel. The series aims to provide a deeper understanding of their motivations and the societal pressures that shaped their characters. As of my knowledge cutoff date in early 2023, the show had been announced, but its release date and further details were not yet available to the public.
214 True ['polyglot'] An 8-letter word starting with 'P' that means a speaker of many languages is "polyglot." A polyglot is someone who knows and is able to use several languages, often with a high level of proficiency. This term is commonly used to describe individuals who have a talent for learning languages or who have made a career out of language expertise, such as translators or interpreters. Polyglots may also be referred to as multilingual individuals.
215 True ['China'] 国际英语新闻:The Misty Poets, also known as the "Menglong" poets, were a group of Chinese poets who emerged in the late 1970s and early 1980s, during a period of relative cultural liberalization following the end of the Cultural Revolution. The term "Misty" refers to the obscure, allusive, and often introspective style of their poetry, which stood in stark contrast to the straightforward, didactic verse that was promoted during the Cultural Revolution.

The Misty Poets included figures such as Bei Dao, Gu Cheng, and Shu Ting, among others. Their work often dealt with themes of alienation, disillusionment, and a search for personal and artistic freedom. The movement was not only a literary one but also a response to the political and social climate of China at the time.

The Misty Poets were taking it to the cultural revolution by challenging the orthodoxy and offering a new, more nuanced and individualistic form of expression that was at odds with the prescriptive and ideological literature that had been dominant during the Cultural Revolution. Their poetry was part of a broader cultural shift in China that sought to re-evaluate the recent past and explore new ideas and aesthetics.

The Misty Poets' influence extended beyond poetry to impact other areas of the arts and intellectual discourse in China, and their work continues to be celebrated and studied both within China and internationally.
216 True ['Wings'] The first best picture Oscar was awarded to the 1927 film "Wings," directed by William A. Wellman. "Wings" is a silent film that tells the story of two young pilots who go to France during World War I and become rivals, both in love and in the air. The film is notable for its realistic and groundbreaking aerial dogfight sequences, as well as its portrayal of the camaraderie and sacrifice of wartime pilots.

The Academy Awards, also known as the Oscars, were first presented in 1929, with "Wings" receiving the top honor for the year 1927-1928. The award for Best Picture was then called "Outstanding Picture" and "Wings" shared the honor with the film "Sunrise: A Song of Two Humans," which won for "Unique and Artistic Production." However, "Wings" is generally recognized as the first film to receive the Best Picture Oscar as we understand it today.
217 True ['Bearer Bond', 'Bearer Bonds'] In banking and finance, "B.B." stands for "bearer bonds." Bearer bonds are a type of fixed-income security that is payable to the holder, or bearer, of the bond certificate. This means that the ownership of the bond is not registered with the issuer and whoever possesses the physical bond certificate is entitled to receive the interest payments and the principal amount upon maturity.

Bearer bonds are different from registered bonds, where the ownership is recorded by the issuer, and only the registered owner can receive the interest payments and principal. Because bearer bonds do not have a record of ownership, they can be transferred easily and anonymously, which historically made them popular for private transactions and for those wishing to maintain financial privacy.

However, the anonymous nature of bearer bonds also made them susceptible to being used for illegal activities such as tax evasion, money laundering, and funding illicit operations. As a result, many countries have restricted or eliminated the issuance of new bearer bonds to increase transparency and combat financial crimes. For example, in the United States, the Tax Equity and Fiscal Responsibility Act of 1982 (TEFRA) prohibited the issuance of new bearer bonds, although some older bearer bonds may still be outstanding.

Investors who hold bearer bonds must take special care to safeguard the physical certificates, as the loss or theft of a bearer bond can result in the loss of the entire investment, with no recourse to recover the securities from the issuer.
218 True ['Superannuated'] The synonym for 'obsolete' that comes from Latin and literally means 'over one year old' is "superannuated." The term "superannuated" is derived from the Latin "superannuatus," which is the past participle of "superannuare," meaning "to make too old, to pass the age for" or "to be too old." In English, "superannuated" is used to describe something or someone that is outdated or too old to be useful or to continue in active service. It can refer to equipment, practices, or people who are past their prime or no longer in use due to being outdated or replaced by something newer.
219 True ['V.S. Naipaul'] 2001 Nobel Prize in Literature was awarded to V.S. Naipaul, who was born in Chaguanas, Trinidad and Tobago. His full name was Sir Vidiadhar Surajprasad Naipaul. He is indeed the author of "A House for Mr. Biswas," which is considered one of his most important works. The novel, published in 1961, is based in part on the life of his father, and it explores themes of identity, colonialism, and the search for personal dignity. Naipaul's body of work includes numerous other novels, short stories, and travel writings that have been highly acclaimed for their insightful commentary on postcolonial societies and the human condition.
220 True ['Eris'] The dwarf planet you're referring to is Eris, named after the Greek goddess of strife and discord. Eris was discovered in 2005 by a team led by Mike Brown, Chad Trujillo, and David Rabinowitz. Its discovery played a significant role in the reclassification of Pluto as a dwarf planet because Eris is slightly larger than Pluto, challenging the previous definition of a planet. Both Eris and Pluto are now classified as dwarf planets by the International Astronomical Union (IAU). Eris orbits the Sun at an average distance of about 68 AU (astronomical units, with 1 AU being the average distance from Earth to the Sun), and it has one known moon named Dysnomia.
221 True ['Bismarck'] The Admiralty Islands, which were under German control from about 1885 to 1914, were part of German New Guinea. This territory was established by the German Empire in the late 19th century and included various islands in the southwest Pacific, such as the Bismarck Archipelago, the northern part of the Solomon Islands, and the northeastern part of New Guinea itself, in addition to the Admiralty Islands.

The sea surrounding these islands is known as the Bismarck Sea, which is part of the larger South Pacific Ocean. The Bismarck Sea is located to the northeast of the mainland of New Guinea and to the west of the Solomon Islands. The German colonial empire in the Pacific was relatively short-lived, as control of these islands was transferred to Australia following Germany's defeat in World War I, and they became the Territory of New Guinea under a League of Nations mandate.
222 True ['Samuel Beckett'] 1969 Nobel Prize in Literature was awarded to the Irish playwright Samuel Beckett. Beckett is well-known for his works in both English and French. He wrote a number of his most famous plays, such as "Waiting for Godot" (originally written in French as "En attendant Godot") and "Endgame" (originally "Fin de partie"), in both languages. His body of work, which includes novels, short stories, and poetry, in addition to his influential plays, is celebrated for its exploration of existential themes and its innovative use of language.
223 False ['Topkapi'] The fabled palace built by Sultan Mehmed II, also known as Mehmed the Conqueror, is the Topkapı Palace in Istanbul, Turkey. However, the name "Topkapı" does not mean "Cannon Gate." The name "Topkapı" comes from the Ottoman Turkish word "طوپقاپو" (topkapusu), which means "Cannon Gate," but this name was actually given to a palace gate, not the entire palace complex.

The palace itself was originally called the "New Palace" (Yeni Sarayı) to distinguish it from the Old Palace (Eski Sarayı), which was located in the Bayezid district of Istanbul. It was only after the 19th century that the palace became widely known as Topkapı Palace, due to the name of the impressive imperial gate that was adorned with rows of cannons.

Topkapı Palace served as the main residence and administrative headquarters of the Ottoman sultans for about 400 years. Today, it is one of the most visited museums in Turkey, showcasing Ottoman architecture, artifacts, and imperial treasures.
224 True ['Murmansk'] The Russian port with unrestricted access to the Atlantic that is the largest city north of the Arctic Circle is Murmansk. Murmansk is located on the Kola Bay, which is an inlet of the Barents Sea. The city has a population of around 300,000 people and is a key port for Russia because, due to the warm North Atlantic Current, it remains ice-free year-round, despite its high latitude.

Murmansk serves as an important naval base for the Russian Northern Fleet and is also a significant hub for commercial shipping, including exports of oil, gas, and other resources from the Arctic region. The city's strategic location has made it a focal point for military and economic activities in the Arctic.
225 True ['The Triplets of Belleville', 'Les Triplettes de Belleville'] The 2003 French film you are referring to is "Les Triplettes de Belleville" (The Triplets of Belleville). The story follows an elderly woman named Madame Souza who teams up with the Belleville Sisters, a famous trio of singers from the 1930s, to rescue her grandson, Champion, who has been kidnapped by the French mafia during a cycling race.

The Belleville Sisters, also known as the Triplets of Belleville, are not actually sisters by blood but are a musical trio with a strong bond. They are renowned for their musical talents and their ability to play a variety of instruments, including the double bass, violin, and musical saw. Their unique blend of music and their quirky personalities are central to the film's charm and success. The film is known for its distinctive animation style, its whimsical humor, and its heartwarming story of friendship and perseverance.
226 True ['Zanzibar'] 2-day reign of Sultan Khalid Bin Barghash refers to the brief period in 1896 when he declared himself the Sultan of Zanzibar following the death of his cousin, Sultan Hamad bin Thuwaini. Zanzibar, an island off the coast of present-day Tanzania, was at the time a protectorate of the British Empire.

The short war against the British Empire that ensued is known as the Anglo-Zanzibar War, which took place on August 27, 1896. It is often considered the shortest war in history, lasting between 38 and 45 minutes. The conflict began when Khalid Bin Barghash took control of the palace and the city of Stone Town, defying the British preference for another successor.

The British, who had significant economic and political interests in Zanzibar, demanded that Khalid stand down. When he refused, they assembled a fleet of warships and marines and issued an ultimatum, which Khalid ignored. As a result, the British began a bombardment of the palace and surrounding areas. The Sultan's forces were vastly outgunned and outnumbered, and the fighting was over within less than an hour.

Khalid Bin Barghash fled the palace and sought refuge in the German consulate, eventually living in exile. The British installed their preferred candidate, Hamoud bin Mohammed, as the new Sultan. The Anglo-Zanzibar War thus ended the short-lived reign of Khalid Bin Barghash and solidified British control over Zanzibar until the island gained independence in 1963.
227 True ['Luanda'] Angola's capital and chief seaport that starts with the letter 'L' is Luanda. Luanda is the largest city in Angola and serves as the administrative, cultural, and urban center of the country. It is located on the Atlantic coast of southern Africa and has a significant port that handles much of the country's import and export trade. Luanda is also the political hub of Angola, hosting the offices of the government and various international embassies. The city has a rich history, having been founded by Portuguese colonists in 1575, and it has grown rapidly in recent years due to Angola's oil boom.
228 True ['Oliver Cromwell'] The phrase "Cruel Necessity" is often attributed to Oliver Cromwell, who became the Lord Protector of the Commonwealth of England, Scotland, and Ireland after the execution of King Charles I. Cromwell was a leading figure in the English Civil War and played a key role in the trial and execution of Charles I in 1649.

The exact quote often cited is, "It is an act of justice, sir, for according to the law he has been judged, and according to the law he must die, and it is a cruel necessity." However, there is some debate among historians about whether Cromwell actually used these words or if they were later attributed to him.

The phrase encapsulates the sentiment that while the decision to execute the king was harsh and regrettable, it was deemed necessary to end the tyranny and political chaos that had been caused by Charles I's rule. Cromwell and other Parliamentarians believed that Charles I had abused his power, violated the rights of his subjects, and was incapable of ruling justly. The execution of Charles I was a pivotal moment in English history, leading to the period known as the English Interregnum, during which the monarchy was abolished and the country was governed as a republic known as the Commonwealth.
229 True ['Allocution'] The term "allocution" shares the same Latin root as "eloquent," which is "loquor," meaning "I speak." In the context of a courtroom, allocution refers to the defendant's opportunity to speak to the judge before sentencing. This is a formal part of many criminal proceedings where the defendant is given the chance to address the court directly, often to express remorse, provide context for their actions, or plead for leniency. Allocution allows the defendant to personally influence the judge's decision regarding the sentence, and it is considered an important right in many legal systems, including that of the United States.
230 True ['Lester Bangs'] The critic played by Philip Seymour Hoffman in the film "Almost Famous" is Lester Bangs, a renowned music journalist known for his passionate and often confrontational writing style. The book about Blondie that you're referring to is likely "Blondie: Parallel Lives," which was written by Dick Porter, not Lester Bangs.

However, the book "Let it Blurt: The Life and Times of Lester Bangs, America's Greatest Rock Critic" is indeed about Lester Bangs. It was written by Jim DeRogatis and published in 2000. DeRogatis's biography delves into the life and career of Bangs, who was a significant figure in rock journalism and is often considered one of the most influential music critics of all time. Bangs wrote for various publications, including Creem, Rolling Stone, and The Village Voice, and was known for his iconic pieces on artists like Lou Reed, The Clash, and Blondie, among others.
231 False ['Elmore Leonard Nimoy'] The Gritty 'Get Shorty' novelist you're referring to is Elmore Leonard. He was known for his crime fiction and the adaptation of his novel "Get Shorty" into a successful film. As for the person who asked folks to "Live Long and Prosper" on film, that would be Leonard Nimoy, most famous for his role as Mr. Spock in the "Star Trek" franchise.

Before the names of Elmore Leonard and Leonard Nimoy, we have "Leonard." After their names, we have "Nimoy." When you join these two names together, you get "Leonard Nimoy." So, the name joined with the Gritty 'Get Shorty' novelist Elmore Leonard and the actor who asked folks to "Live Long and Prosper" on film, Leonard Nimoy, is simply "Leonard Nimoy."
232 True ['Cyrus the Great'] Jews have a warm and appreciative historical memory of Cyrus the Great, the Persian king who is credited with releasing the Jewish exiles from captivity in Babylon and allowing them to return to their homeland in Jerusalem. This event is described in the Hebrew Bible, particularly in the Book of Ezra, and is also mentioned in the Book of Isaiah and the Book of 2 Chronicles.

Cyrus the Great, who founded the Achaemenid Empire, conquered Babylon in 539 BCE and issued a decree permitting the Jewish exiles to return to Jerusalem and rebuild the Temple, which had been destroyed by the Babylonians under Nebuchadnezzar II. This decree is often cited as an early example of religious tolerance and is unique in the context of ancient empires.

The Jewish exiles regarded Cyrus's actions as divinely inspired, and in the Book of Isaiah, Cyrus is even referred to as God's "anointed" (Messiah in Hebrew), a title usually reserved for Jewish kings. Isaiah 45:1 states: "Thus says the Lord to His anointed, to Cyrus, whose right hand I have held—to subdue nations before him and loose the armor of kings, to open before him the double doors, so that the gates will not be shut."

The positive view of Cyrus the Great is still present in Jewish tradition and history, and he is often celebrated for his role in the restoration of Jerusalem and the rebuilding of the Second Temple.
233 True ['Prince Albert'] The man you are referring to is His Serene Highness Prince Albert II of Monaco. He is the reigning monarch of the Principality of Monaco and head of the House of Grimaldi. Born on March 14, 1958, he is the son of Prince Rainier III and the American actress Grace Kelly.

Prince Albert II has held the title of Marquis of Baux since birth, which is one of the titles traditionally held by the heir apparent to the Monegasque throne. He is known for his involvement in environmental issues, particularly those concerning climate change and biodiversity, and he has established the Prince Albert II of Monaco Foundation to address these concerns.

As a "Man about Town" and "Dude with some pull," Prince Albert II is known for his social engagements, philanthropy, and influence both within Monaco and on the international stage. He is also known for his sporting interests, having competed in bobsleigh at five Winter Olympics for Monaco's national team.
234 True ['Aye-Aye'] The rare lemur you're referring to is the aye-aye (Daubentonia madagascariensis). The aye-aye is a unique species of lemur that is native to Madagascar. It has a distinctive appearance that has led to it being described in various colorful ways, including having the face of a possum, the teeth of a rat, and the ears of a bat.

The aye-aye is the world's largest nocturnal primate and is known for its unusual method of finding food. It uses a long, thin middle finger to tap on wood and listen for hollows, which indicates the presence of grubs beneath the bark. Once it locates the grubs, it chews a hole into the wood and uses its elongated finger to extract them.

The aye-aye's physical characteristics include large, sensitive ears that resemble those of a bat, which help it to detect wood-boring insects. Its incisors are continuously growing, similar to those of a rat, which allows it to gnaw through wood and hard shells. Its face has a somewhat possum-like appearance due to its pointed snout and large, expressive eyes.

The aye-aye is an endangered species, primarily due to habitat destruction and hunting, as it is sometimes considered a harbinger of bad luck in Malagasy culture. Conservation efforts are ongoing to protect this unique primate and its habitat.
235 False ['Downtrodden'] 1. Immigrants: The Statue of Liberty has long been a symbol of hope and freedom for immigrants coming to the United States. The poem "The New Colossus" by Emma Lazarus, which is inscribed on a plaque at the statue's base, speaks to this symbolism with the famous lines: "Give me your tired, your poor, Your huddled masses yearning to breathe free, The wretched refuse of your teeming shore. Send these, the homeless, tempest-tost to me, I lift my lamp beside the golden door!"

2. Refugees: The poem also extends a welcome to refugees, those fleeing persecution, war, or other dire circumstances in their homelands, seeking asylum and a new start in America.

3. Outcasts: The term "outcasts" can refer to those who have been rejected or ostracized by their societies for various reasons, such as their ethnicity, religion, political beliefs, or social status. "The New Colossus" offers a message of inclusivity and acceptance, suggesting that America is a place where those who have been marginalized elsewhere can find a home.

Paul Auster, while not the author of "The New Colossus," is an American writer who has often explored themes of identity, chance, and the search for meaning in modern life. His works sometimes touch on the experiences of immigrants and the idea of America as a place of refuge and opportunity, reflecting the sentiments expressed in Lazarus's poem.
236 False ['For Your Eyes Only'] The collection of short stories about James Bond that is subtitled "Five Secret Occasions in the Life of James Bond" is "Octopussy and The Living Daylights." This collection was written by Ian Fleming, the creator of the James Bond character, and was published posthumously in 1966. It contains the titular short stories "Octopussy" and "The Living Daylights," along with three other stories: "The Property of a Lady," "007 in New York," and "The Hildebrand Rarity." These stories provide additional insights into the world of James Bond and his adventures.
237 True ['Dawn Treader'] Lord Drinian is the captain of the title vessel in "The Voyage of the Dawn Treader," which is the third book in The Chronicles of Narnia series by C.S. Lewis. The Dawn Treader is a Narnian ship on which the main characters, including King Caspian, Edmund, Lucy, and their cousin Eustace, embark on an epic journey to find the seven lost Lords of Narnia and to reach the end of the world. Lord Drinian serves as the loyal and skilled captain of the ship throughout their perilous and adventurous voyage.
238 False ['Cats Cradle'] "Ice-Nine" and "Tutored by Bokonon" are chapters in the novel "Cat's Cradle" by Kurt Vonnegut. "Cat's Cradle" is a satirical postmodern novel first published in 1963. It explores themes of science, technology, and religion, as well as the arms race and the end of the world. The novel is centered around the fictional substance "ice-nine," a form of water that is solid at room temperature and has the potential to cause catastrophic consequences for the planet. Bokonon is a character in the book, a philosopher who has created a religion called Bokononism, which plays a significant role in the narrative.
239 True ['Coho'] The word "booze" contains the 4-letter word "silv" inside of it, which is an informal or slang term for silver salmon. The term "silv" is often used in the Pacific Northwest to refer to the Coho salmon (Oncorhynchus kisutch), which is known for its silver coloration when it lives in the ocean. When Coho salmon return to freshwater to spawn, they change color, with males developing a bright red color and females becoming darker. The term "silver salmon" can refer to various species of salmon that have a silver coloration when they are in the ocean phase of their life cycle, but "silv" specifically refers to the Coho salmon in many fishing communities.
240 False ['Calla'] 1. Daylily (Hemerocallis spp.)
2. Tiger lily (Lilium lancifolium, syn. Lilium tigrinum)

Both of these are types of flowers that are often referred to as lilies, although they belong to different genera. Daylilies belong to the genus Hemerocallis, while tiger lilies are true lilies, belonging to the genus Lilium. Despite their names, daylilies are not true lilies, but they are commonly grouped with them due to their similar appearance and growth habits. Both are known for their colorful blooms and are popular in gardens and landscapes. It's important to note that while daylilies and tiger lilies are non-toxic to humans, other types of true lilies (such as Easter lilies, tiger lilies, and Asiatic lilies) can be highly toxic to cats.
241 True ['Bubba Ho-Tep'] The dialogue "Just what are you getting at, Elvis?" and "I Think you know what I'm gettin' at Mr. President. We're gonna kill us a mummy" is from the movie "Bubba Ho-Tep." This 2002 comedy horror film was directed by Don Coscarelli and is based on the short story of the same name by Joe R. Lansdale. The film stars Bruce Campbell as Elvis Presley and Ossie Davis as John F. Kennedy. The plot revolves around the two aging icons, who now live in a retirement home, teaming up to battle an ancient Egyptian mummy who is feeding on the souls of the elderly residents.
242 True ['Isle of Wight'] Queen Victoria had a vacation residence on the Isle of Wight, which is an island off the south coast of England. Her residence there was Osborne House, which was built between 1845 and 1851 for Queen Victoria and Prince Albert as a summer home and rural retreat. Osborne House and its gardens are now open to the public as a museum, and the Isle of Wight is indeed its own administrative county, separate from the mainland of England. The island is known for its natural beauty, coastal scenery, and rich history, including its association with the British royal family.
243 True ['Formaldehyde'] The USA's thousands of uncapped oil wells can release a variety of pollutants, including greenhouse gases like methane and volatile organic compounds (VOCs). Among the VOCs emitted, benzene is a significant concern due to its carcinogenic properties. Benzene is a colorless and highly flammable liquid at room temperature, and it is a natural constituent of crude oil.

Benzene exposure is associated with a range of health issues, including an increased risk of cancer, particularly leukemia. It can also cause other health problems such as bone marrow suppression, anemia, and immune system damage.

In addition to benzene, other hydrocarbons and chemicals associated with oil and gas production can also be emitted from uncapped wells. These can include toluene, ethylbenzene, xylene, and other aromatic compounds, which also have health implications.

The embalming agent commonly associated with environmental and health concerns is formaldehyde, which is not typically emitted from oil wells. Formaldehyde is a gas at room temperature and is used in various industrial applications, including the production of resins and as a disinfectant and preservative in medical laboratories and mortuaries. While formaldehyde is not a direct emission from oil wells, the broader category of VOCs, including benzene from oil and gas operations, is a significant environmental and health concern.
244 False ['Berkshires'] Olympia Dukakis and Christopher Reeve indeed performed at the Williamstown Theater Festival, which is located in the Berkshire Hills of Massachusetts. The festival is a renowned summer theater event that has been a launching pad for many actors, directors, and playwrights. It was founded in 1955 and takes place on the campus of Williams College in Williamstown, Massachusetts. The festival is known for its high-quality productions and for attracting both established and emerging talent in the theater world.
245 False ['Ceres'] The only dwarf planet that orbits the Sun closer than Neptune is Pluto. Pluto was classified as a dwarf planet by the International Astronomical Union (IAU) in 2006, after the discovery of other similarly sized objects in the Kuiper Belt, such as Eris, which is slightly more massive than Pluto.

Pluto's orbit is highly eccentric, and for a portion of its orbit, it is actually closer to the Sun than Neptune. This occurs because Pluto's orbit crosses Neptune's, but due to the gravitational interactions and resonances within the solar system, the two bodies never collide. Pluto's average distance from the Sun is about 39.5 astronomical units (AU), while Neptune's average distance is about 30.1 AU. However, at its closest approach to the Sun (perihelion), Pluto is about 29.7 AU from the Sun, which is indeed closer than Neptune's average distance.

It's worth noting that there are other dwarf planet candidates and trans-Neptunian objects (TNOs) that orbit the Sun closer than Neptune at various times due to their own eccentric orbits, but Pluto is the most well-known and the first to be discovered.
246 True ['Arthur Ashe'] The quote you're referring to is from Arthur Ashe's autobiography "Days of Grace." In the book, Arthur Ashe recounts various moments from his life, including his experiences as a professional tennis player and his interactions with other tennis greats like Jimmy Connors. The summer of 1975 was significant for Ashe as it was the year he won Wimbledon, defeating Connors in the final. The mention of meeting Connors at Wimbledon and then sleeping soundly could be Ashe's way of expressing his composure and focus during that important time in his career.
247 True ['Rhone', 'Rhône'] The river that starts near Lake Geneva and flows about 500 miles to reach the Mediterranean near Marseilles is the Rhône River. It is one of the major rivers of Europe, originating in the Swiss Alps and flowing through Switzerland and France before emptying into the Mediterranean Sea. The Rhône River is an important waterway for transportation, irrigation, and hydroelectric power generation, and it has a significant role in the history and economy of the regions it traverses.
248 True ['todo el mundo'] ¡Todo el mundo!

In Spanish, "todo el mundo" is a phrase that means "everybody" or "everyone," but the literal translation is "all the world." It's commonly used to refer to people in general or to all individuals within a particular context. For example:

- "Todo el mundo fue al partido." (Everybody went to the game.)
- "Todo el mundo sabe que es importante estudiar." (Everyone knows that studying is important.)

This phrase is a good example of how expressions can have a figurative meaning in language that differs from their literal translation.
249 True ['John Singer Sargent'] The official White House portrait of Theodore Roosevelt was painted by the American artist John Singer Sargent. Roosevelt was quite pleased with the result, as indicated by his quote, "I like this picture immensely." Sargent was a highly regarded portraitist of his time, known for his ability to capture the character and personality of his subjects. The portrait of Roosevelt is considered one of the most striking presidential portraits in the White House collection.
250 True ['Pump and Dump', 'Pump Dump', 'Pumping and Dumping', 'Pumping Dumping', 'pump-and-dump'] The rhyming fraudulent investing scheme you're referring to is commonly known as a "pump and dump" scheme. In a pump and dump, fraudsters artificially inflate ("pump up") the price of a stock or asset through false and misleading statements or hype to manipulate investor interest and drive up the market price. Once the price has been driven up to a certain level, the perpetrators of the scheme sell off their own holdings ("dump") at the higher price, reaping profits.

After the fraudsters have sold their shares and stopped hyping the stock, the price typically falls dramatically, leaving other investors with worthless or significantly devalued shares. Pump and dump schemes often target micro- and small-cap stocks, which are generally less regulated and easier to manipulate due to their lower trading volumes and market capitalizations. These schemes are illegal and are considered a form of securities fraud. Regulatory bodies like the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) actively work to identify, investigate, and prosecute individuals and organizations involved in pump and dump activities.
251 True ['Dalí', 'Dali'] In "My Last Sigh" ("Mi último suspiro"), the autobiography of Spanish filmmaker Luis Buñuel, he recalls the surrealist artist Salvador Dalí engaging in a peculiar and provocative act. According to Buñuel, Dalí would seduce women by placing fried eggs on their shoulders. This anecdote is often cited to illustrate the eccentric and shocking behavior that Dalí, known for his flamboyant personality and bizarre antics, was famous for.

Buñuel and Dalí were friends and collaborators in the early stages of their careers, working together on the influential surrealist films "Un Chien Andalou" (1929) and "L'Âge d'Or" (1930). Their relationship was complex and sometimes contentious, but they remained significant figures in the surrealist movement and left an indelible mark on the art world. Buñuel's recollections of Dalí in "My Last Sigh" offer a personal and often humorous insight into the life and times of these avant-garde artists.
252 True ['baptism'] Jesus was about 30 years old when he underwent the ritual of baptism, as described in Luke 3:21-23. This event is also recounted in the other Synoptic Gospels—Matthew and Mark. According to the Gospel of Luke:

"Now when all the people were baptized, and when Jesus also had been baptized and was praying, the heaven was opened, and the Holy Spirit descended upon him in bodily form like a dove. And a voice came from heaven, 'You are my Son, the Beloved; with you I am well pleased.'" (Luke 3:21-22, NRSV)

The baptism of Jesus is a significant event in the New Testament because it marks the beginning of Jesus' public ministry and is one of the few events that appears in all four Gospels. It is also at this moment that the Holy Spirit descends upon Jesus, and God the Father affirms Jesus as His Son, which is a clear manifestation of the Trinity in the Christian faith. The baptism was performed by John the Baptist, who was preaching a baptism of repentance for the forgiveness of sins, although Jesus himself had no sin to repent of. Jesus' baptism is seen as a model for Christian baptism and a sign of his solidarity with humanity.
253 True ['factorial'] 3 * 2 * 1 can be expressed as 3!, and the exclamation point "!" refers to the factorial operation in mathematics. The factorial of a non-negative integer n, denoted by n!, is the product of all positive integers less than or equal to n.

So, 3! (read as "three factorial") is calculated as:

3! = 3 * 2 * 1 = 6

In general, for any non-negative integer n:

n! = n * (n - 1) * (n - 2) * ... * 2 * 1

By definition, 0! is equal to 1, and for any positive integer n, the factorial operation can be thought of as a way to count the number of different ways to arrange n distinct items into a sequence. Factorials are used in various areas of mathematics, including combinatorics, algebra, and calculus.
254 True ['Ullman'] The funny Brit who starred in her own sketch series and played Betty Friedan in the TV miniseries 'Mrs. America' is Tracey Ullman. Tracey Ullman is a well-known actress, comedian, and singer who has had a successful career in television, film, and on stage. She is particularly famous for her work on sketch comedy shows such as "The Tracey Ullman Show" and "Tracey Ullman's State of the Union." Her portrayal of Betty Friedan, the feminist activist and author, in the 2020 miniseries 'Mrs. America' was widely praised for its depth and accuracy.
255 True ['Niger'] The Songhai Empire was a dominant state in West Africa that flourished from the early 15th to the late 16th century. It was the largest and last of the three major empires that existed in the region, following the Ghana Empire and the Mali Empire. The Songhai Empire was centered in the area that is now the modern-day nations of Mali and Niger, with its capital at Gao.

The empire's reign ended in the 16th century when it was defeated by a Moroccan army armed with gunpowder weapons in the Battle of Tondibi in 1591. This defeat led to the disintegration of the Songhai Empire, which was then divided into smaller kingdoms and eventually came under the control of various European colonial powers in the 19th and 20th centuries. The legacy of the Songhai Empire, however, continues to be an important part of the cultural and historical heritage of the region, particularly in the countries of Mali, Niger, and other parts of West Africa.
256 True ['scallop'] Coquilles St. Jacques is a classic French dish traditionally made with scallops as the main ingredient. The name "Coquilles St. Jacques" translates to "Saint James' scallops," and it refers to the pilgrimage route to the Spanish city of Santiago de Compostela (St. James in English), where scallop shells are a symbol.

The dish typically involves scallops that are cooked in a white wine and cream-based sauce, often flavored with garlic, shallots, and sometimes mushrooms. The scallops are usually placed back into their shells or into individual gratin dishes, topped with a mixture of breadcrumbs and Gruyère or Parmesan cheese, and then browned under a broiler to create a golden crust.

While scallops are the star of Coquilles St. Jacques, the dish can also include other ingredients such as:

- White wine
- Heavy cream or crème fraîche
- Butter
- Shallots or onions
- Garlic
- Mushrooms (such as button or shiitake)
- Fresh herbs (like parsley or thyme)
- Breadcrumbs
- Cheese (such as Gruyère or Parmesan)
- Lemon juice or zest
- Salt and pepper

The exact recipe can vary, and some modern interpretations might include additional ingredients or substitutions to suit different tastes and dietary requirements.
257 True ['mitochondria', 'mitochondrion'] The 1957 Scientific American article referred to the mitochondrion as the 'Powerhouse of the Cell.' Mitochondria are indeed mighty organelles that play a crucial role in energy production within eukaryotic cells. They are responsible for converting the energy from nutrients into ATP (adenosine triphosphate), which is used as a source of chemical energy for various cellular processes. The phrase "Powerhouse of the Cell" has since become a common metaphor for mitochondria in textbooks and educational materials to convey their essential role in cellular energy metabolism.
258 True ['deadlocked'] 10-letter adjective describing a tie: "DEADLOCKED"

In the context of a sports match, if two teams are "deadlocked," it means they are tied and neither team has been able to gain an advantage over the other. This term is often used to describe a situation where the score is equal and neither team has managed to score further, resulting in a draw or a tie at the end of the match. The phrase "after a titanic struggle" suggests a hard-fought and intense competition where both teams have put in a significant effort, yet the result is still even, hence they remain "deadlocked."
259 True ['Quisling'] uring World War II, the Norwegian politician Vidkun Quisling became notorious for his collaboration with Nazi Germany after the occupation of Norway in 1940. Quisling's actions were considered an act of betrayal against his own country, and his name quickly became a byword for "traitor" in Norway and beyond.

On April 9, 1940, Germany invaded Norway. Quisling, who had been the Minister of Defense in the 1930s but was then leading the small, fascist Nasjonal Samling (National Unity) party, saw an opportunity to seize power. He declared himself Prime Minister of Norway after the German invasion, without the consent of the Norwegian government or King Haakon VII. His puppet government was installed by the Germans, and Quisling held various positions of power throughout the occupation, including serving as Minister President from 1942 to 1945.

After the war, Quisling was arrested, tried for high treason, murder, and embezzlement, and was executed by firing squad on October 24, 1945. His name has since become synonymous with treachery and collaboration with the enemy, and the term "quisling" is used in English and other languages to describe a person who betrays their country by collaborating with the enemy.
260 True ['Harder to Breathe'] Yes, the title of Maroon 5's debut single is "Harder to Breathe." It was released in July 2002 as the lead single from their debut album "Songs About Jane." The song was written by Adam Levine and Jesse Carmichael, and it helped to establish Maroon 5 as a prominent band in the early 2000s. The lyrics of the song reflect the pressure and struggles the band faced while recording their first album, with the title and chorus capturing the intensity of that experience.
261 True ['Orange'] The Ernest Oppenheimer Bridge connects South Africa and Namibia over the Orange River. The Orange River, known as the Gariep River in South Africa and the !Gariep River among the indigenous Nama people, is the longest river in South Africa and forms part of the international border between South Africa and Namibia. The river is notable for its striking orange hue, which is derived from the sediment it carries as it flows through the arid landscapes of the region. The Ernest Oppenheimer Bridge is an important link for transportation and trade between the two countries.
262 True ['Charley Pride'] Jimmy Allen's song "Down Home" from his 2020 album "Mercury Lane" includes a reference to Charley Pride, a trailblazing black country singer. Charley Pride was one of the few African American country musicians to have enjoyed considerable success in the genre, particularly during the 1960s and 1970s. He was a member of the Grand Ole Opry and had numerous hit songs, including "Kiss an Angel Good Mornin'" and "Is Anybody Goin' to San Antone." Charley Pride passed away on December 12, 2020, due to complications from COVID-19. His legacy as a pioneering artist in country music continues to influence many musicians, including Jimmie Allen.
263 True ['Minoan'] The Phaistos Disc was found in 1908 during the excavation of the Minoan palace of Phaistos on the island of Crete, Greece. The Minoan civilization, named after the legendary King Minos, was a Bronze Age civilization that flourished from approximately the 27th century BCE to the 15th century BCE. The Phaistos Disc is a fired clay disc, inscribed on both sides with a unique spiral of symbols that have been stamped into the soft clay. Despite numerous attempts, the script on the disc remains undeciphered, and its purpose and meaning continue to be a subject of debate among archaeologists and scholars.
264 True ['Foucault'] The French thinker who wrote a multi-volume history of sexuality that discusses power dynamics in society is Michel Foucault. His work, "The History of Sexuality" ("Histoire de la sexualité"), is a three-volume study published between 1976 and 1984. The volumes are titled:

1. "The Will to Knowledge" (originally published as "La Volonté de savoir" in 1976)
2. "The Use of Pleasure" ("L'Usage des plaisirs" in 1984)
3. "The Care of the Self" ("Le Souci de soi" in 1984)

In these works, Foucault explores the ways in which sexuality has been understood, controlled, and experienced in different historical periods, particularly in ancient Greek and Roman cultures, as well as in the modern West. He examines how societal power structures shape and regulate the discourse around sexuality, and how individuals internalize these norms, thus exercising power over themselves. Foucault's analysis extends beyond sexuality to encompass broader questions of power, knowledge, and the self in society.
265 True ['Walther'] The fan letter that prompted Ian Fleming to consider switching James Bond's sidearm from the Beretta to another type was from a firearms expert named Geoffrey Boothroyd. Boothroyd wrote to Fleming praising his work but criticizing the choice of the Beretta as Bond's weapon, calling it "a lady's gun." He suggested that Bond should carry a more powerful and manly weapon.

In response to this letter, Fleming decided to arm Bond with a Walther PPK, a German-made pistol. The Walther PPK, chambered in .32 ACP (Automatic Colt Pistol), became one of the most iconic elements of the James Bond character, featuring prominently in both the novels and the films. The switch from the Beretta to the Walther PPK occurred in the novel "Dr. No," which was published in 1958. The Walther PPK remained Bond's signature weapon throughout the rest of Fleming's novels and the subsequent film adaptations.
266 True ['ooze'] Globigerina is a genus of planktonic foraminifera, which are tiny, shelled protists that float in the ocean waters. When these organisms die, their shells sink to the ocean floor and accumulate over time, forming a type of sediment known as "globigerina ooze."

Globigerina ooze is a type of calcareous ooze, which is a form of biogenic sediment composed of the calcite (calcium carbonate) shells of small marine organisms. It is one of the two main types of calcareous ooze, the other being pteropod ooze, which is composed of the shells of pteropods (a type of pelagic snail).

The term "gooey mud" might not be the most accurate description of globigerina ooze, as it can give the impression of a more viscous or sticky substance. In reality, globigerina ooze is a fine-grained, soft sediment that can feel somewhat powdery due to the tiny calcareous shells. It is typically found in the deep ocean, particularly in areas where the rate of accumulation of these microorganism shells exceeds the rate of dissolution of calcium carbonate, which can occur in deeper waters where the pressure and lower temperatures increase the solubility of calcite.
267 True ['Brave New World'] The quote 'What you need is a gramme of Soma. All the advantages of Christianity and Alcohol - none of their defects' is from the 1932 novel "Brave New World" by Aldous Huxley. In the novel, Soma is a fictional drug that is used by the World State to control the population, providing an escape from any discomfort or unhappiness without the negative side effects associated with traditional drugs or religion. It is a central theme in the book, which explores a dystopian future where society is meticulously engineered for harmony and stability at the cost of individual freedom and genuine human connection.
268 True ['Murray'] 1500 miles (approximately 2414 kilometers) is a bit of an overestimate for the length of the Murray River, which is actually around 2375 kilometers (1476 miles) long. The Murray River is part of the Murray-Darling river system, which is the largest in Australia. The two major tributaries of the Murray River that you mentioned are indeed The Darling and The Murrumbidgee.

The Murray River forms part of the border between the states of New South Wales and Victoria, as well as a small section of the border between Victoria and South Australia. It rises in the Australian Alps and flows westwards across the inland plains, emptying into the Southern Ocean via Lake Alexandrina and the Murray Mouth.

The Darling River, which is about 1472 kilometers (915 miles) long, is the longest tributary of the Murray River. It rises in northern New South Wales and flows south-west across the state, joining the Murray near Wentworth.

The Murrumbidgee River, approximately 1690 kilometers (1050 miles) in length, is another significant tributary of the Murray River. It also rises in the Australian Alps and flows through the Australian Capital Territory (including Canberra, the nation's capital) and New South Wales before joining the Murray River near Balranald.

Together, these rivers and their tributaries form a vast river system that is crucial for the water supply, irrigation, and ecosystems of southeastern Australia. The Murray-Darling Basin is also an important agricultural region, supporting a wide range of crops and livestock.
269 True ['ACL', 'anterior cruciate'] Recovery times for knee surgery can vary significantly depending on the specific procedure performed and the individual's overall health and compliance with rehabilitation protocols. When it comes to ligament surgery, the most common procedure is the anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) reconstruction. The ACL is one of the major ligaments providing stability to the knee joint.

For ACL reconstruction, the typical recovery time can indeed take up to a year or more for a full return to sports and high-impact activities. This extended recovery period is necessary to allow the new graft to incorporate into the bone, for the knee to regain full range of motion, and for the muscles around the knee to strengthen.

Dissolving stitches, also known as absorbable sutures, are commonly used in surgical procedures, including knee surgery. These stitches are designed to break down and be absorbed by the body over time. The absorption time can vary depending on the material used for the sutures, but most absorbable sutures are designed to be fully absorbed within 60 to 90 days (approximately 2 to 3 months). However, the healing process of the deeper tissues, including the ligament graft and surrounding structures, continues well beyond the time it takes for the sutures to dissolve.

It's important to follow the surgeon's postoperative instructions closely, including attending physical therapy sessions and gradually increasing activity levels as recommended. The surgeon will typically monitor the healing process and provide guidance on when it is safe to resume various activities.

Keep in mind that while the dissolving stitches may be gone within three weeks, this does not mean the knee is fully healed. It's crucial to continue with the prescribed rehabilitation program to ensure the best possible outcome and to avoid re-injury.
270 True ['Morris'] 19th century designer William Morris is the key figure associated with the Arts and Crafts Movement, known for his intricate wallpaper designs, including patterns featuring roses and other floral motifs. His work in textile and wallpaper design, as well as furniture, stained glass, and tapestry, had a profound influence on the decorative arts of his time and continues to be celebrated for its beauty and craftsmanship.

Morris's approach to design was rooted in a philosophy that emphasized handcraftsmanship and simplicity, a reaction against the industrialization of the period. His designs often drew inspiration from nature, featuring elaborate floral patterns and organic forms. Some of his most famous wallpaper designs include "Strawberry Thief," "Trellis," and "Willow Boughs," which showcase his signature style of intertwining natural elements with a sense of harmony and balance.

While Morris's name might not be as glamorous as those typically associated with Hollywood agents, his legacy in the world of design is both enduring and influential, making his name just as memorable in the realm of art and aesthetics.
271 True ['Addams Family Values'] Wednesday and Pugsley are sent to summer camp in the 1993 movie sequel "Addams Family Values." The title is a play on the original "The Addams Family" and the concept of family values, making it a before-and-after style title. The film is the second installment in the Addams Family film series, following the 1991 movie "The Addams Family." In "Addams Family Values," the children are sent to a summer camp where they encounter a very different set of values from their own unique upbringing.
272 False ['Done', 'Dun'] 1. Finished and Finest
2. Drab and Drab (Note: "Drab" is a less common word that means dull or cheerless, similar in meaning to "drab.")

"Finished" and "finest" are homophones that sound the same but have different meanings. "Finished" means completed or ended, while "finest" means of the highest quality or best.

"Drab" is both a color term referring to a dull, light brown color and an adjective meaning dull or lacking brightness or interest. "Drab" as a homophone is less commonly recognized, as it is a rare word that is not widely used in modern English. It can mean the same as "drab" in the sense of being dull or lifeless. However, "drab" is the more commonly used term of the two.
273 True ['Zworykin'] 1923, Vladimir Zworykin, a Russian immigrant to the United States, filed a patent for the Iconoscope, which was the first television transmission tube. The Iconoscope was a significant development in the history of television, as it was an early form of a video camera tube that helped lay the groundwork for modern television technology. Zworykin's work on the Iconoscope and his subsequent development of the Kinescope (a cathode-ray tube for television reception) were foundational to the field of electronic television. However, it's worth noting that the actual patent for the Iconoscope was granted in 1933, a decade after the initial filing, due to the time required to develop and prove the technology. Zworykin's contributions to television were made while he was working for Westinghouse Electric and later at the Radio Corporation of America (RCA).
274 False ['Sharp Objects and Gone Girl', 'Sharp Objects Gone Girl'] As of my last update in early 2023, "Sharp Girl" is not a recognized compilation or collection of books by a single author that I can reference. It's possible that you might be referring to a specific edition, box set, or a promotional bundle that includes two books by the same author, but without more context or a more specific reference, I cannot provide an accurate answer.

However, if "Sharp Girl" refers to a two-book set by an author, it could be a pairing of two novels that feature a strong, intelligent, or "sharp" female protagonist. Without a specific author or more details, it's challenging to identify the books in question.

If "Sharp Girl" is a title of a collection or a series by a particular author, you might be looking for two books within that series. For example, if you're referring to a series by an author known for strong female leads, such as Janet Evanovich's "Stephanie Plum" series, "Sharp Girl" could be a bundle containing two novels from that series, like "One for the Money" and "Two for the Dough."

To provide an accurate answer, I would need the name of the author or more context about the books included in "Sharp Girl." If you can provide additional details, I would be happy to help identify the two books contained within.
275 True ['Bayreuth'] The German music festival starting with 'B' that has been presenting the works of Richard Wagner since 1876 is the Bayreuth Festival (Bayreuther Festspiele). It is held annually in Bayreuth, Bavaria, Germany, and is dedicated exclusively to the performance of Wagner's operas. The festival was founded by Wagner himself, and its main venue is the Bayreuth Festspielhaus, which was built specifically for the performance of Wagner's works and is renowned for its unique acoustics and architectural design that supports the grandeur of Wagnerian opera. The Bayreuth Festival is one of the most prestigious and traditional music festivals in the world, attracting Wagner enthusiasts from all over the globe.
276 True ['Hoyle'] 18th century whist expert and author Edmond Hoyle is often invoked as a cards authority. The phrase "According to Hoyle" has become a part of the English language, used to indicate that the rules or practices being followed are in accordance with the highest authority or standard, even in contexts outside of card games. Hoyle wrote a number of texts on the rules and strategies of various card games, including whist, which was a precursor to modern bridge. His work was so influential that his name became synonymous with the correct way to play.
277 True ['Brooklyn Decker'] The actress and model who found a love match with Andy Roddick and married him in 2009 is Brooklyn Decker. Brooklyn Decker is known for her work in films like "Just Go with It" and "Battleship," as well as her appearances in various fashion magazines and the Sports Illustrated Swimsuit Issue. She and Andy Roddick, a former professional tennis player and U.S. Open champion, have been married since April 17, 2009. Together, they have two children. Brooklyn Decker has also pursued a television career, with roles in series such as "Grace and Frankie" and "Friends with Better Lives."
278 True ['Paddock'] The seven-letter word that describes the place where horses are saddled before a race and can also refer to an enclosed space where they are exercised is "paddock." A paddock is an enclosed area where horses are kept before and after races, and it's also where they are saddled and paraded before being led to the track. Additionally, paddocks can be used for training and exercising horses. In the context of horse racing, the paddock is an important location where horses are prepared and inspected by the jockeys and race officials prior to the start of a race.
279 True ['wasp'] New Mexico chose the tarantula hawk as its state insect. The tarantula hawk is a type of spider wasp, specifically in the genus Pepsis, known for its large size and the painful sting it can deliver. These wasps are solitary and are named for their hunting behavior, where the female tarantula hawk captures and paralyzes tarantulas as a food source for their larvae. After stinging and paralyzing a tarantula, the wasp will lay an egg on it, and the larva that hatches will feed on the still-living but immobilized spider, carefully avoiding vital organs to keep it fresh for as long as possible. Despite their fearsome reputation, tarantula hawks are not aggressive towards humans and will usually only sting if handled or threatened.
280 True ['Cronkite'] After Walter Cronkite, the longtime CBS News anchor, stepped down in 1981, Peter Mansbridge became the face of Canadian broadcasting, often referred to as the "Walter Cronkite of Canada." Mansbridge joined the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation (CBC) in 1968 and became the chief correspondent and anchor of The National, CBC's flagship nightly newscast, in 1988. He held that position until his retirement in 2017, making him one of the longest-serving anchors in North American television history.

Mansbridge's tenure and the trust he built with Canadian viewers over the years led to his being considered a national icon, much like Cronkite was in the United States. His calm demeanor, authoritative delivery, and the depth of his reporting earned him a reputation as a trusted source of news for Canadians, similar to the reputation Cronkite had established in the U.S. with his famous sign-off, "And that's the way it is." Mansbridge's influence and the comparison to Cronkite underscore his significance in Canadian journalism.
281 True ['Graham'] 1949 was a significant year for American evangelist Billy Graham. He gained national prominence during the Los Angeles Crusade, which was initially scheduled for three weeks but extended to eight weeks due to the overwhelming response. The meetings were held in a large tent, known as the "Canvas Cathedral," which was set up on the corner of Washington and Hill streets.

The Los Angeles Crusade attracted thousands of attendees each night, and the success of this event helped launch Billy Graham into the public eye as one of the most influential evangelists of the 20th century. The crusade was widely covered by the media, including newspapers and magazines, which contributed to his growing fame. It is estimated that during the eight weeks of the crusade, hundreds of thousands of people attended, with many making decisions for Christ, which was a significant factor in the growth of his ministry.
282 True ['Odenkirk'] The actor who traded the courtroom for the classroom by returning to AMC in the series "Lucky Hank" is Bob Odenkirk. After his acclaimed performance as shady lawyer Saul Goodman (later known as Jimmy McGill) in "Breaking Bad" and its spin-off "Better Call Saul," Odenkirk took on the role of Professor Hank Devereaux in "Lucky Hank." The show, which is based on the novel "Straight Man" by Richard Russo, features Odenkirk as an English department chairman dealing with the absurdities of academic life.
283 False ['lowkey'] The slang term "low" that can precede "goated when X is the vibe" is "clout." The phrase "clout low, goated when X is the vibe" is a variation of the original "down-low, goated when X is the vibe" meme. The term "clout" refers to influence or power, especially in social media or popular culture. When someone says "clout low," they are indicating that they are not seeking attention or recognition for their actions or opinions. The phrase "goated when X is the vibe" suggests that someone or something is considered the greatest or the best in a particular context or situation.

So, when combined, "clout low, goated when X is the vibe" means that the person is not concerned with gaining clout or recognition, but they acknowledge that they excel or are highly regarded in a specific area or under certain conditions. The "X" in the phrase is a placeholder for whatever the specific context or vibe might be.
284 True ['Cloisters'] Jenna Bush, in her role as a book club curator and reader, has recommended novels across various genres, including Gothic literature. While I don't have real-time access to her latest recommendations, a novel that fits the description of being "as Gothic as you can get" and is named for and set at a branch of the Met that is dedicated to art of the Middle Ages would likely be "The Maiden of the Metropolitan Library" by AnneMarie Martin. However, this is a hypothetical title as there isn't a well-known Gothic novel specifically named after a branch of the Metropolitan Museum of Art dedicated to medieval art.

The Metropolitan Museum of Art in New York City does have a renowned branch dedicated to medieval art, known as The Cloisters. The Cloisters is a museum and gardens that incorporates elements from medieval French cloisters into its design, and it houses a large collection of medieval European art and architecture.

If Jenna Bush were to recommend a Gothic novel set in a place like The Cloisters, it might be a work of historical fiction with a Gothic atmosphere, perhaps involving elements of mystery, romance, and the supernatural, all set against the backdrop of the Middle Ages. A book that captures the essence of the medieval period and the Gothic aesthetic could be "The Pillars of the Earth" by Ken Follett, which, while not specifically named after The Cloisters, is a historical novel that deals with the building of a cathedral in medieval England and has Gothic elements.

For a more direct connection to The Cloisters and the art of the Middle Ages, one might look for novels that are inspired by the Unicorn Tapestries, which are housed there. An example of such a novel is "The Lady and the Unicorn" by Tracy Chevalier, which is inspired by the famous series of tapestries and weaves a tale that could be considered to have Gothic elements.

It's important to note that recommendations can change, and for the most current book suggestions from Jenna Bush, one would need to check her latest book club selections or public statements.
285 True ['Punchbowl'] The national memorial cemetery of the Pacific, also known as the Punchbowl Cemetery due to its location within the Pu'owaina Crater, is situated in Honolulu, Hawaii. The crater is part of the Punchbowl volcano, an extinct tuff cone located just northwest of downtown Honolulu. The cemetery serves as a memorial to honor the men and women who served in the United States Armed Forces, and it is the final resting place for many who lost their lives in service to their country, particularly those who served in the Pacific during World War II, the Korean War, and the Vietnam War.
286 False ['Healall'] Robert Frost's poem "Design" features the flower known as the heal-all, whose scientific name is Prunella vulgaris. The heal-all is a small plant with dark purple flowers, and it has been traditionally used for its medicinal properties, hence its common name. In the poem, Frost contemplates the possible intentions behind the intricate design of the heal-all flower, as well as a spider and a moth that are also part of the scene he describes. The poem delves into themes of nature, design, and the potential presence of a divine designer. Here is the first stanza of the poem, which introduces the heal-all:

I found a dimpled spider, fat and white,
On a white heal-all, holding up a moth
Like a white piece of rigid satin cloth—
Assorted characters of death and blight
Mixed ready to begin the morning right,
Like the ingredients of a witches’ broth—
A snow-drop spider, a flower like a froth,
And dead wings carried like a paper kite.

The heal-all's presence in the poem is significant not only for its medicinal connotations but also for its contrast with the themes of death and decay that Frost explores.
287 True ['Gastroenteritis'] The Norovirus is a common cause of a 15-letter condition known as "gastroenteritis," which is an inflammation of the stomach lining and intestines. This condition often leads to symptoms such as diarrhea, vomiting, nausea, and stomach pain. Gastroenteritis can be caused by a variety of pathogens, including norovirus, which is highly contagious and can spread easily through contaminated food, water, or surfaces, as well as direct contact with an infected person. Norovirus is notorious for causing outbreaks in closed and crowded environments such as hospitals, nursing homes, schools, and cruise ships.
288 False ['The Good The Bad and The Ugly American', 'The Good The Bad & The Ugly American'] The movie you're referring to is "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly" (Italian: Il buono, il brutto, il cattivo), which is a 1966 spaghetti western film directed by Sergio Leone and starring Clint Eastwood as "the Good" (Blondie), Lee Van Cleef as "the Bad" (Angel Eyes), and Eli Wallach as "the Ugly" (Tuco). The film is the third and final installment in the Dollars Trilogy, following "A Fistful of Dollars" and "For a Few Dollars More."

The part about Marlon Brando giving Yanks a bad name overseas does not directly relate to "The Good, the Bad and the Ugly." Marlon Brando is known for many iconic roles, but one of his most famous roles around that time was in the 1957 film "Sayonara," where he played an American Air Force officer who falls in love with a Japanese woman, which was a significant departure from his previous roles and dealt with themes of interracial romance and cultural conflict. However, this doesn't quite fit the description of "giving Yanks a bad name overseas" as it was a critically acclaimed performance and film.

If the reference to Marlon Brando is about a different film where he portrays an American in a negative light overseas, it could be a number of films, but none that directly fit the context of the question. It's possible that the statement about Brando is a separate thought and not directly related to the movie title before and after provided. If there's a specific film in mind that fits this description, it's not widely recognized or directly associated with the aforementioned actors and film.
289 True ['Shinto'] Torii gates are a quintessential element of Shinto shrines in Japan. They mark the transition from the mundane to the sacred, signifying the entrance to a space where kami (gods or spirits) reside. Shinto, which translates to "the Way of the Gods," is the indigenous spirituality of Japan and is deeply interwoven with Japanese culture and history.

The presence of torii gates at Shinto shrines serves to demarcate the sacred ground of the shrine, which is considered to be the dwelling place of the kami. When one passes through a torii gate, it is customary to bow as a sign of respect before entering the sacred precincts.

Shinto is an animistic religion that emphasizes harmony with nature, ritual purity, and the veneration of ancestors and kami. It has no single founder, no single sacred scripture, and no fixed dogmas, but rather it consists of a set of practices, attitudes, and institutions that have evolved over many centuries. Shinto shrines, where torii gates are found, are places where these practices are carried out and where people come to worship, pray, and participate in seasonal festivals and rites of passage.
290 True ['Reposado'] ¡Salud! The type of tequila you're referring to is "Reposado," which in Spanish means "rested." Reposado tequila is aged in oak barrels for a minimum of two months, but less than a year. This aging process gives Reposado tequila its distinctive golden color and allows it to develop a smoother, more complex flavor profile compared to unaged "Blanco" or "Silver" tequila. The time spent in the barrels also imparts some of the wood's characteristics, such as vanilla or caramel notes, into the spirit. Reposado tequilas are versatile and can be enjoyed neat, on the rocks, or in a variety of cocktails.
291 True ['Stockholm'] August Strindberg, the renowned Swedish playwright, novelist, and poet, died in Stockholm, which is the capital city of Sweden. He passed away on May 14, 1912, leaving behind a significant legacy as one of the leading figures in the naturalistic and modernist movements in literature and drama. Strindberg's works, which include plays such as "Miss Julie" and "The Father," as well as novels and autobiographical writings, continue to be influential and widely studied. His death occurred in the same city where he was born and where he spent much of his life, making Stockholm an integral part of his life and work.
292 True ['Hagar'] When Sarah thought she was unable to give Abraham children, she gave him her Egyptian handmaid named Hagar. Hagar bore Abraham a son named Ishmael, as described in the Book of Genesis in the Hebrew Bible or Old Testament. This event is recounted in Genesis 16. Sarah's decision to offer Hagar to Abraham as a surrogate was based on the customs of the time, which allowed for a servant to bear children on behalf of a barren wife. However, this decision led to tension and conflict within the family, particularly after Sarah later gave birth to her own son, Isaac.
293 True ['Gluon'] Inside protons and neutrons, quarks are bound together by particles called "gluons." The name "gluon" is derived from the word "glue," reflecting their role in holding quarks together within the protons and neutrons, which are collectively known as hadrons.

Gluons are the force carriers of the strong nuclear force, which is one of the four fundamental forces of nature, alongside gravity, electromagnetism, and the weak nuclear force. The strong nuclear force is responsible for the binding of quarks into protons, neutrons, and other hadronic particles, as well as holding protons and neutrons together in atomic nuclei.

The strong force is mediated by gluons through the exchange of color charge, which is a property analogous to electric charge but specific to the strong force. Quarks come in six "flavors" (up, down, charm, strange, top, and bottom), and each flavor can have one of three "colors" (red, green, or blue). Gluons themselves also carry color charge, which allows them to interact with other gluons as well as with quarks. This complex interplay of color charges and the resulting gluon exchanges create the strong binding force that keeps quarks confined within hadrons.
294 True ['Tessera', 'Tessellation', 'tessellated'] The term that refers to a distinctive flooring pattern of small squares or tiles, often associated with mosaics, is "tessellated." Tessellated mosaics are created by arranging small pieces of stone, glass, ceramic, or other materials in a repeated pattern without gaps or overlaps. This creates a visually appealing and often intricate design.

In the context of flooring, the word "tessellated" can be used to describe a surface that is covered with tesserae—the small blocks used to create mosaics. The pattern can be geometric, floral, or any other design that interlocks in a repeating fashion across the surface. Tessellated floors were particularly popular in Roman and Byzantine architecture, and they continue to be a stylish choice for both indoor and outdoor flooring today.
295 True ['My So-Called Life', 'My So Called Life'] Claire Danes starred as Angela Chase in the television series "My So-Called Life," which aired in the mid-1990s. The show was critically acclaimed for its realistic portrayal of teenage life, including themes of adolescence, family, and friendship. Despite its short run, it has since become a cult classic and is remembered for its impact on the portrayal of teenagers in media. Danes won a Golden Globe for her performance in the series, and her portrayal of Angela Chase is often cited as one of the most authentic depictions of a teenage girl in television history.
296 True ['coati'] The raccoon cousins found in Arizona, New Mexico, and further south are known as "coatis" (plural of coatimundi). The scientific name for the species commonly found in these regions is Nasua narica, also known as the white-nosed coati. They are members of the Procyonidae family, which also includes raccoons, kinkajous, and olingos. Coatis are known for their long tails and pointed snouts, and they are often seen in groups, unlike their more solitary raccoon relatives. The word "coatimundi" is of Tupian origin from the South American Guarani language.
297 True ['Irene Cara'] "Flashdance...What a Feeling" was a hit song from the 1983 film "Flashdance," performed by Irene Cara. The song was a huge success, winning the Academy Award for Best Original Song as well as the Golden Globe Award for Best Original Song. Irene Cara, who co-wrote the song with Giorgio Moroder and Keith Forsey, also performed it at the 56th Academy Awards.

Irene Cara, unfortunately, passed away on November 25, 2022, at the age of 63. However, "Flashdance...What a Feeling" was selected for preservation in the National Recording Registry of the Library of Congress in 2022, before her death. Therefore, Irene Cara was still alive when her iconic song was recognized for its cultural and historical significance by being added to the registry, which is a great honor for any artist. The announcement was made on March 23, 2022, and Irene Cara was able to witness the song's continued legacy and impact on music history.
298 True ['JuJu', 'joujou', 'gris'] In Voodoo shops, as well as in other metaphysical or spiritual supply stores, you can often find a variety of charm bags, also known as mojo bags, gris-gris bags, or conjure bags. These bags are typically small pouches made of fabric, leather, or other materials, and they contain a combination of herbs, roots, minerals, oils, personal concerns (like hair or nail clippings), and other items that are chosen for their magical properties.

The ingredients in these bags are carefully selected based on the specific intention of the user. Here are some common types of charm bags and their purposes:

1. **Protection Bags**: These bags might include ingredients like angelica root, frankincense, myrrh, salt, or protective stones like black tourmaline or obsidian. They are designed to shield the wearer from negative energies, curses, or harmful intentions.

2. **Luck Bags**: Often containing items like lodestones, magnetic sand, High John the Conqueror root, or lucky herbs like four-leaf clover or basil, these bags are meant to attract good fortune and success.

3. **Love Bags**: These might have rose petals, lavender, orris root, as well as personal items from the one you wish to attract or keep the love of. They are used to draw love, enhance relationships, or increase passion.

4. **Money Bags**: Ingredients like cinnamon, nutmeg, chamomile, and pyrite are common in money-drawing bags, which are designed to attract wealth and prosperity.

5. **Health Bags**: These bags could include healing herbs like yarrow, comfrey, or echinacea, and are intended to promote physical well-being and recovery from illness.

6. **Court Case Bags**: These are used for legal matters and might contain herbs and curios like licorice root, slippery elm, and calendula, along with a petition paper stating the desired outcome of a legal proceeding.

7. **Bend Over Bags**: These are used to exert influence over others and might include commanding herbs like licorice root, calamus, or devil's shoestring, along with personal concerns of the target.

8. **Uncrossing Bags**: Designed to remove crossed conditions, jinxes, or bad luck, these bags might include hyssop, rue, salt, and other cleansing ingredients.

9. **Road Opener Bags**: These bags are meant to clear obstacles and provide opportunities. They often contain abre camino (a type of sea bean), lemongrass, and other ingredients that symbolize the removal of barriers.

When purchasing or creating a charm bag, it's important to consider the tradition and the specific needs of the individual. Many practitioners will create custom bags tailored to the user's unique situation. It's also common for the user to "feed" the bag with oils or other substances to keep the magic active and to carry the bag on their person or place it in a significant location.
299 True ['Shelley'] The description you've provided seems to allude to the English Romantic poet Percy Bysshe Shelley. Shelley was known for his passionate and idealistic verse, which often explored themes of love, nature, politics, and the human spirit.

Here's how the clues match up with Shelley:

1. "An unabashed romantic": Shelley was one of the key figures in the Romantic movement in literature, which emphasized emotion, individualism, and the glorification of the past and nature.

2. "Unbound effort": This could refer to Shelley's dedication to his craft and his revolutionary ideas, which he expressed freely in his poetry. He was known for his radical political views and his belief in free love and vegetarianism, among other ideals.

3. "Drowning, his sorrows": Shelley's life was marked by personal tragedy and he often wrote about loss and despair. His own death was also by drowning; he died in a boating accident off the coast of Italy in 1822.

One of Shelley's most famous works that reflects his romantic sensibilities and his personal sorrows is "Adonais," an elegy written on the death of John Keats, another prominent Romantic poet. Shelley's other notable works include "Ozymandias," "To a Skylark," "The Cloud," and "Prometheus Unbound," the latter being a lyrical drama that exemplifies his revolutionary and romantic ideals.
300 True ['Burundi'] The country you are referring to is Burundi. Burundi is a small country located in the Great Lakes region of East Africa, bordered by Rwanda to the north, Tanzania to the east and south, and the Democratic Republic of the Congo to the west. The population of Burundi is predominantly Hutu, but the Tutsi minority has historically held political and military power, which has been a source of ethnic tension and conflict in the country.

The Hutu and Tutsi are the two largest ethnic groups in both Burundi and neighboring Rwanda. The historical dominance of the Tutsi minority in Burundi has led to a series of conflicts, including civil wars and genocidal violence, particularly in the 20th century. Efforts to establish a more inclusive and representative government have been ongoing, with varying degrees of success. The Arusha Accords in 2000 marked a significant step towards peace and power-sharing among the ethnic groups, leading to a transition period and the drafting of a new constitution that aimed to balance power among the Hutu, Tutsi, and Twa (the smallest ethnic group in Burundi).
301 True ['Carillon'] The word that refers to a set of bells in a church, with at least 23 bells and potentially as many as 78, is a "carillon." A carillon is a musical instrument that is typically housed in the bell tower of a church or other public building. It consists of at least 23 cast bronze cup-shaped bells, which are played serially to produce a melody, or sounded together to play a chord. A carillonneur plays the instrument by striking a keyboard of baton-style keys and pedals. The bells are not rung by swinging but are fixed in place and sounded by the action of clappers connected to the keyboard. Carillons are found throughout the world, with a particularly high concentration in Belgium, the Netherlands, and the northern part of France, where the art of carillon-making and playing has a long tradition.
302 False ['Leslie Groves'] The hard-driving U.S. Army General who was described as the "indispensable man" of the Manhattan Project and oversaw the project from its inception to the successful testing and eventual wartime use of the atomic bomb was General Leslie Richard Groves. Groves was appointed to lead the Manhattan Project in September 1942, and his leadership, organizational skills, and determination were crucial in overcoming the numerous technical and logistical challenges faced by the project.

Groves was responsible for the construction of massive facilities, such as the production plants at Oak Ridge, Tennessee, and Hanford, Washington, as well as the scientific laboratory at Los Alamos, New Mexico, where the bomb was designed. He worked closely with the project's scientific director, J. Robert Oppenheimer, and managed to keep the project on track despite the immense pressures and complexities involved in developing the first nuclear weapons. Groves' role was instrumental in the project's success, which culminated in the atomic bombings of Hiroshima and Nagasaki in August 1945, contributing to the end of World War II.
303 True ['Chicago'] 1886 Haymarket Riot took place in Chicago's Haymarket Square. The riot was a culmination of labor unrest that began in the days prior, with workers striking for an eight-hour workday. On May 4, during a labor rally, someone threw a bomb at police officers who were trying to disperse the crowd, leading to the deaths of several officers and demonstrators. The subsequent trial of the accused anarchists involved in the incident became a cause célèbre among labor activists and is considered a pivotal moment in the history of labor relations and civil liberties in the United States.
304 True ['Typee'] Herman Melville's first novel, which provided a peep at Polynesian life, is titled "Typee: A Peep at Polynesian Life." Published in 1846, it is based on his experiences in the Marquesas Islands, where he lived among the Typee people for several weeks after deserting from the whaling ship he was serving on. The novel is a mix of adventure, ethnography, and romanticized portrayal of the Polynesian people and their culture. It was a commercial success and established Melville's reputation as a writer, leading to his subsequent works, including his most famous novel, "Moby-Dick."
305 True ['griot'] In the film "Night of the Kings" ("La Nuit des Rois"), directed by Philippe Lacôte, the prisoner who acts as a storyteller is known as a "Roman" (played by Bakary Koné). The term "Roman" is derived from the French word for "novel," and in the context of the film, it refers to a prisoner who holds the role of a griot, a traditional West African storyteller, historian, and musician.

The Roman is tasked with telling a story to the other inmates on the night of a red moon, which is a tradition within the MACA prison in Abidjan, Côte d'Ivoire. The storytelling serves as a way to maintain order among the prisoners and is a crucial part of the prison's culture. The Roman's role is to weave a tale that captivates his fellow inmates, and by doing so, he asserts his position and buys himself more time to stay alive within the prison's harsh environment. The film blends myth, reality, and the power of storytelling to explore themes of survival, power, and the oral tradition in a unique and compelling narrative.
306 True ['Eat, Pray, Love', 'Eat Pray Love'] Elizabeth Gilbert's title "Eat, Pray, Love: One Woman's Search for Everything Across Italy, India and Indonesia" spent 57 weeks as a No. 1 on the New York Times paperback nonfiction bestseller list. The book, which was published in 2006, chronicles Gilbert's journey of self-discovery and healing after a difficult divorce. It became a cultural phenomenon and was later adapted into a film starring Julia Roberts. The success of "Eat, Pray, Love" propelled Gilbert to international fame and established her as a prominent author in the memoir and self-help genres.
307 True ['Marcel'] The boy's first name and hairstyling term you're thinking of is likely "Marcel." Marcel was a common first name in France during the late 19th and early 20th centuries, but its popularity declined significantly after the 1920s. Additionally, "Marcel" is associated with a hairstyling technique, the Marcel wave, which was a popular way to curl hair in the early 20th century. The Marcel wave was created using a heated curling iron and was named after the French hairdresser François Marcel Woelfflé, who is credited with inventing the technique in the 1870s. The name Marcel, as well as the hairstyle, evokes a sense of vintage style and nostalgia.
308 True ['Livy'] The ancient scholar who wrote a monumental history of Rome, including accounts of the battles against Hannibal during the Second Punic War, was Titus Livius, known in English as Livy. His work, "Ab Urbe Condita" (From the Founding of the City), originally consisted of 142 books, although only 35 books have survived in full, with summaries (periochae) and fragments of the others.

Livy's history covered the period from the founding of Rome in 753 BCE up to his own times, concluding in the reign of Augustus. Books 21-30 specifically deal with the Second Punic War, including the famous battles of Cannae, Lake Trasimene, and Zama, where Scipio Africanus defeated Hannibal in 202 BCE. Livy's work is invaluable for understanding the history of Rome and its military conflicts, as well as the social and political life of the Republic.
309 False ['Westward Ho'] The title of the 1855 book you're referring to is "Two Years Before the Mast" by Richard Henry Dana Jr. However, the phrase commonly used to mean "Let's head in a certain direction" is actually derived from another nautical-themed book, "Moby-Dick" by Herman Melville, which was published in 1851.

The phrase "Call me Ishmael," which is the opening line of "Moby-Dick," has entered the English language as a way of introducing oneself in a storytelling context. It doesn't literally mean "Let's head in a certain direction," but it has become an iconic and recognizable way to begin a narrative.

If you're looking for a phrase from "Two Years Before the Mast" that implies setting a course or heading in a direction, the book itself doesn't provide a specific idiom that has entered common usage in the same way as "Call me Ishmael." "Two Years Before the Mast" is a non-fiction account of Dana's experiences as a common sailor on a voyage from Boston around Cape Horn to California. The book provides a detailed look at life at sea and the hardships sailors faced during the 19th century, but it does not contain a phrase that has come to symbolize setting a course in everyday language.
310 True ['Pangaea'] Millions of years ago, all of the continents were combined in a supercontinent called Pangaea. The name "Pangaea" or "Pangea" comes from the Ancient Greek words "pan" (πᾶν) meaning "all" or "entire," and "gaea" (Γαῖα) or "gaia" meaning "Earth" or "land." Pangaea existed approximately 300 to 180 million years ago, during the late Paleozoic and early Mesozoic eras, before the continents began to drift apart to their current positions due to plate tectonics.

Before Pangaea, there was another supercontinent called Pannotia, which existed approximately 600 to 540 million years ago during the late Neoproterozoic Era. After Pangaea broke apart, there were subsequent supercontinents such as Gondwana and Laurasia, which themselves eventually broke apart into the continents we recognize today.
311 True ['Black Sabbath'] "War Pigs" is a song by the British heavy metal band Black Sabbath. It appears on their 1970 album "Paranoid." The song's lyrics, written by bassist Geezer Butler, are a powerful anti-war statement that critique the horrors and futility of conflict. The term "war pigs" refers to the military and political leaders who send the young to fight and die in wars, often for selfish or misguided reasons.

The song suggests that the true evil of war is a form of Satanism, as it involves the suffering and death of countless innocent people. The famous opening lines of the song set this theme:

"Generals gathered in their masses
Just like witches at black masses"

By drawing a parallel between generals and witches at a Satanic ritual, Black Sabbath conveys the idea that war is the ultimate perversion and an act of true evil, akin to the darkest of occult practices. The song remains one of Black Sabbath's most popular and enduring tracks, and it has been widely interpreted as a powerful statement against the Vietnam War, which was ongoing at the time of the song's release.
312 True ['Cadillac Ranch'] The famous Texas attraction you're referring to is the Cadillac Ranch, located just west of Amarillo, Texas, off of Interstate 40. Created in 1974 by an art group called Ant Farm, the Cadillac Ranch features ten Cadillacs (from the 1949 Club Sedan to the 1963 Sedan de Ville) that are half-buried, nose-down in the ground, at an angle corresponding to that of the Great Pyramid of Giza.

Over the years, the cars have been covered in layers of graffiti, and visitors are encouraged to bring their own cans of spray paint to leave their mark on the vehicles. It's a popular roadside attraction and has become an iconic symbol of the quirky and artistic side of American road culture.
313 True ['Tycho Brahe'] 16th century Danish astronomer Tycho Brahe is known for his accurate and comprehensive astronomical observations. He was also known for his eccentric lifestyle and the fact that he wore a prosthetic nose, which was said to be made of gold or silver, after losing part of his nose in a duel.

In 2010, nearly 400 years after his death, Tycho Brahe's tomb was opened, and his remains were exhumed. During this process, researchers took the opportunity to analyze the composition of his prosthetic nose. Contrary to popular belief, the analysis suggested that the nose was not made of gold, but rather of brass, an alloy of copper and zinc. This discovery provided a new insight into the life of this renowned astronomer.
314 False ['Peccadillo'] The word you're looking for is "flaw." The term "flaw" comes from the Middle English word "flaw," which means a gust of wind or a sudden rush of water, and it originally meant a sudden rush or puff of wind. However, the connection to a minor fault or quirk is more closely related to the word's evolution over time to mean a defect or imperfection in something.

The connection to a Spanish word for sin is a bit more indirect. The Spanish word for sin is "pecado," which comes from the Latin "peccatum." The diminutive form of "pecado" would be "pecadillo," which means a small or minor sin. While "flaw" and "pecadillo" have different etymologies, they both can refer to a small defect or imperfection, whether in character or in an object. The connection is thematic rather than direct, as "flaw" does not directly derive from a Spanish word, but both English and Spanish have terms that describe minor faults or quirks.
315 True ['Xerxes'] 480 B.C. saw the Battle of Salamis, where the Greek navies took on the navies of the Persian ruler Xerxes I, who was indeed the son of Darius I. Xerxes I led the second Persian invasion of Greece, following in the footsteps of his father's campaign which had been halted at the Battle of Marathon a decade earlier. The Battle of Salamis was a pivotal naval engagement in the Greco-Persian Wars, where the greatly outnumbered Greek fleet, primarily led by the Athenian general Themistocles, managed to achieve a decisive victory against the Persian fleet, effectively ending the Persian threat to Greece.
316 False ['Air Force Quit'] The before and after phrase that combines "A nation's military planes get frozen" and "you have to hit a combination of keys on your mac or PC to exit them" is:

"Frozen fighter jets key command."

This phrase connects the concept of military aircraft (fighter jets) that are frozen (as in incapacitated or unable to function) with the idea of a key command (a combination of keys) that you would use to exit a program or application on a computer (mac or PC).
317 True ['Stevens'] In 2000, the Anchorage International Airport was renamed to honor Senator Ted Stevens, who had a long career serving the state of Alaska. The airport's official name became Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport in recognition of Stevens' significant contributions to the state, particularly in securing federal funding for numerous infrastructure projects, including those related to aviation.

Ted Stevens served as a U.S. Senator from Alaska from 1968 to 2009, making him one of the longest-serving Republican senators in history at the time. He was known for his ability to direct federal spending to his home state and for his advocacy for Alaska's interests in Washington, D.C.
318 True ['The Way Way Back'] The title of the 2013 film about a boy on summer vacation that refers to a place to sit in a station wagon (a 1970 Buick Estate) is "The Way Way Back." The film, directed by Nat Faxon and Jim Rash, features a shy teenager named Duncan (played by Liam James) who finds an unexpected friend in Owen (played by Sam Rockwell), the manager of the Water Wizz water park. The title "The Way Way Back" refers to the farthest back seat in a station wagon, which is where Duncan often finds himself both literally and figuratively during the film, as he navigates complex family dynamics and personal growth during his summer vacation.
319 True ['fenugreek'] Ghormeh sabzi, Iran's national dish, is a fragrant and hearty stew that is celebrated for its rich flavors and complex blend of herbs. The name "Ghormeh sabzi" translates to "stewed greens," indicating the importance of herbs in the dish. While there isn't a specific European leaf by name that is essential to Ghormeh sabzi, the dish traditionally includes a variety of fresh herbs, which are the key ingredients.

The herbs typically used in Ghormeh sabzi include:

1. Parsley (Persian: جعفری ja'fari)
2. Cilantro (Persian: گشنیز geshniz)
3. Green onions (Persian: پیازچه piyazche)
4. Fenugreek leaves (Persian: شنبلیله shanbalileh)
5. Spinach (Persian: اسفناج isfanaj)

These herbs are finely chopped and sautéed before being added to the stew, which also includes beans, dried limes (limoo amani), and typically lamb or beef. The combination of these greens gives Ghormeh sabzi its distinctive flavor and vibrant green color.

While none of these herbs bear a European nationality in their names, fenugreek leaves (shanbalileh) are sometimes referred to as "Caucasian parsley" or "Persian parsley," which might hint at a connection to the Caucasus region, but this does not imply a European nationality.

It's worth noting that the herbs used in Ghormeh sabzi are not exclusive to Iran and are widely used in various cuisines across the Middle East and parts of Asia. The dish's popularity and the specific blend of herbs make it unique to Iranian cuisine, despite the individual ingredients being common in many culinary traditions.
320 True ['Moldova'] 1991 was a significant year for many countries that were part of the Soviet Union, as it was the year the USSR dissolved. The Danube nation you're referring to is Moldova. Formerly known as the Moldavian Soviet Socialist Republic, Moldova declared its independence from the Soviet Union on August 27, 1991. The country made some modifications to its name, dropping the "Socialist" and "Soviet" from its official title, and became simply the Republic of Moldova. Moldova was admitted to the United Nations on March 2, 1992.
321 True ['Byrd'] 1930s American explorer Richard E. Byrd is well-known for his expeditions to Antarctica. In 1934, during his second Antarctic expedition, Byrd spent five months alone at a weather station named "Advance Base," which was about 120 miles south of Little America, his main base on the Ross Ice Shelf. His intention was to collect weather data during the Antarctic winter.

However, Byrd encountered severe difficulties, including equipment failures that led to carbon monoxide poisoning from a poorly ventilated stove. The situation became life-threatening, and he had to be rescued. His team managed to reach him just in time, saving his life. Byrd suffered from frostbite and other health issues as a result of his ordeal, but he eventually recovered and continued his exploration work. His experiences were chronicled in his book "Alone," published in 1938.
322 True ['Broca'] The area of the left front part of the brain that contains neurons involved in speech function is known as Broca's area. It is named after the French surgeon and anthropologist Paul Broca, who discovered its association with speech production in the mid-19th century. Broca's area is located in the inferior frontal gyrus of the dominant hemisphere for language, which is typically the left hemisphere for right-handed individuals and most left-handed individuals. Damage to Broca's area can result in Broca's aphasia, a type of aphasia characterized by difficulty in producing language, while comprehension remains relatively intact.
323 True ['Kim Philby'] Harry Lime, the character from Graham Greene's novella "The Third Man" and the subsequent film adaptation, is widely believed to have been inspired by the real-life British spy and Soviet double agent, Kim Philby. Philby was a high-ranking member of British intelligence who was part of the Cambridge Five, a group of spies who passed information to the Soviet Union during World War II and the early years of the Cold War.

Greene and Philby knew each other; they had worked together in the British Secret Intelligence Service (MI6) during World War II. Greene was stationed in Sierra Leone, and Philby was his superior. The character of Harry Lime, who is revealed to be a criminal profiting from the black market in post-war Vienna, shares certain characteristics with Philby, such as charm, intelligence, and a duplicitous nature. Philby's betrayal of his country by spying for the Soviets was not publicly known until after "The Third Man" was written, but Greene's experiences with Philby likely influenced the creation of Harry Lime.
324 True ['greenback'] 1870s U.S. political party that got its colorful name because it wanted to maintain or increase paper money circulation was known as the Greenback Party. The Greenback Party, also known as the Independent Party or the National Party in some states, was formed in the early 1870s. It was named after the green-colored paper money, known as "greenbacks," that had been issued by the Union government during the American Civil War.

The party's main platform was to advocate for the continued circulation of these greenbacks, which were not backed by gold or silver, to help farmers and workers by ensuring a flexible money supply. This was in contrast to the hard money policies favored by other parties at the time, which sought to limit the money supply to gold and silver-backed currency. The Greenback Party argued that such policies were deflationary and hurt debtors, including many farmers who had borrowed money.

The Greenback Party enjoyed some success in the 1870s and 1880s, particularly in agricultural regions, but it eventually declined as the debate over monetary policy evolved and other political issues came to the forefront.
325 True ['Nutmegger'] Some New Englanders who are not Connecticuters might be referred to as "Bay Staters," which is a term that refers to residents of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts. The name "Bay State" is derived from the early days of the colony when it was known for its thriving bay and coastal trade. The term does not directly mention a spice, but it is often associated with the state's official beverage, cranberry juice, which can be spiced for various recipes and is a significant crop in Massachusetts. However, if you're looking for a term that mentions a spice, "Nutmegger" is the nickname for residents of Connecticut, as the state was known for its once-thriving nutmeg industry.
326 True ['phlox'] Pink-colored flowers with names ending in "x" are not very common, but here are a few possibilities that might fit the description:

1. **Ixia** - While not all ixias are pink, this genus of South African flowering plants includes some species with pink flowers.

2. **Cyclamen** - Some species of cyclamen have pink flowers, and the name could be stylized to end with an "x" (Cyclamen -> Cyclamenx).

3. **Heliconia** - Some varieties of heliconia, also known as lobster-claws or false bird-of-paradise, have pinkish hues and could be informally referred to with an "x" at the end.

4. **Phlox** - Phlox flowers come in many colors, including pink, and the name could be playfully altered to end with an "x" (Phlox -> Phloxx).

5. **Aster** - Similar to phlox, asters have a variety of colors including pink, and one could creatively refer to them as "Asterx."

6. **Ranunculus** - These flowers also come in shades of pink, and while the name doesn't end in "x," it's possible to create a playful nickname like "Ranunculusx" for a bouquet.

7. **Anemone** - Some anemones have pink petals, and again, while the name doesn't end in "x," a cute nickname could be "Anemonx."

8. **Peony** - A stretch, but a playful or poetic name for a pink peony could be "Peonyx."

It's important to note that some of these names are a creative stretch, and the "x" is not a standard part of the botanical name. However, in the context of a gift or a poem, such playful alterations can add a personal and romantic touch. If you're looking for a flower that naturally ends in "x" and is pink, you might need to consider less common or hybrid varieties, or perhaps a reclassification or branding of a flower has given it a name ending in "x."
327 True ['Pictures at an Exhibition'] Modest Mussorgsky's work "Pictures at an Exhibition" is a suite of ten pieces composed for piano, and later orchestrated by several composers, most famously by Maurice Ravel. The suite was inspired by a visit to an art exhibition featuring the works of Viktor Hartmann, an artist and close friend of Mussorgsky's who had recently died. Each movement of "Pictures at an Exhibition" represents a different artwork by Hartmann, which Mussorgsky saw at a memorial exhibition in Saint Petersburg in 1874.

Here is a list of the movements and the corresponding artworks by Viktor Hartmann:

1. **Promenade** - Represents Mussorgsky himself walking through the exhibition and sets the scene for the musical depiction of the artworks.
2. **Gnomus** - Inspired by a drawing of a gnome, possibly running or dancing awkwardly.
3. **Promenade** - Another representation of Mussorgsky moving between the artworks.
4. **Il vecchio castello** - Based on a watercolor of an old castle from the Middle Ages, with a troubadour singing beneath its walls.
5. **Promenade** - A reprise of the opening theme, leading to the next picture.
6. **Tuileries (Children's Quarrel After Games)** - Inspired by a painting of the Tuileries Garden in Paris, depicting children playing and quarreling.
7. **Bydło** - Represents a drawing of a Polish ox-cart, moving slowly and heavily.
8. **Promenade** - A transition to the next set of pictures.
9. **Ballet of the Unhatched Chicks** - Based on a costume design for a ballet in which the dancers were dressed as canary chicks.
10. **Samuel Goldenberg and Schmuÿle** - Inspired by two separate portraits that Hartmann had made of a rich Jew and a poor Jew, respectively. Mussorgsky combined them into a conversation between the two.
11. **The Market at Limoges (The Great News)** - Depicts a bustling market scene in the French city of Limoges, with women arguing over gossip.
12. **Catacombae (Sepulchrum Romanum) and Con mortuis in lingua mortua (With the Dead in a Dead Language)** - Reflects Hartmann's own sketches of the Paris catacombs and a depiction of Hartmann himself among the dead, as Mussorgsky imagines a conversation with his deceased friend in the catacombs.
13. **The Hut on Fowl's Legs (Baba Yaga)** - Based on a design for a clock in the shape of the hut of Baba Yaga, a witch from Russian folklore who dwells in a hut that stands on chicken legs.
14. **The Great Gate of Kiev** - Inspired by Hartmann's design for a grand city gate in Kiev, Ukraine, to commemorate Tsar Alexander II's narrow escape from an assassination attempt.

The suite concludes with a final, triumphant statement of the "Promenade" theme, symbolizing Mussorgsky's departure from the exhibition. "Pictures at an Exhibition" remains one of Mussorgsky's most popular works and is a prime example of program music, which is music intended to evoke images or convey the impression of events.
328 True ['Dewey'] 5 years before Earl Warren became Chief Justice of the United States, he was the Republican nominee for Vice President in the 1948 election. His running mate was Thomas E. Dewey, who was the Governor of New York at the time. Dewey was the presidential nominee, and Warren was chosen as his vice-presidential running mate. However, they were defeated by the incumbent Democratic President Harry S. Truman and his running mate, Senator Alben W. Barkley.

Earl Warren went on to become the Chief Justice of the United States in 1953, appointed by President Dwight D. Eisenhower. He served in that position until 1969 and is known for presiding over significant cases that advanced civil rights and judicial reform, including Brown v. Board of Education, which declared segregation in public schools unconstitutional.
329 True ['phrenology'] Franz Joseph Gall developed the pseudoscience known as phrenology. Phrenology was a popular theory in the 19th century that attempted to determine an individual's personality traits and mental capacities based on the shape and size of various bumps and depressions on the skull. Gall proposed that the brain was composed of multiple organs, each responsible for a distinct personality trait or cognitive ability, and that the skull would take on a shape reflecting the development of these underlying brain areas.

According to phrenology, by feeling and measuring the skull, one could infer the strength and weaknesses of an individual's mental faculties and character. Despite its initial popularity, phrenology was eventually discredited as scientific understanding of the brain advanced, revealing that the theory lacked empirical support and was based on incorrect assumptions about brain function and anatomy.
330 True ['Czechoslovakia'] Milan Kundera's second novel, "Life is Elsewhere" (originally titled "Život je jinde" in Czech), was not allowed to be published in his home country of Czechoslovakia at the time of its completion in 1969. The novel was considered controversial by the communist regime due to its themes that were critical of the political climate and the Prague Spring of 1968. As a result, Kundera faced increasing censorship and political persecution in Czechoslovakia. It wasn't until after he emigrated to France in 1975 that the novel was published in Czech by a Czechoslovak emigré press in Toronto, Canada, in 1973. The book was later published in France in 1975, and it was not until the fall of communism in Czechoslovakia that it could be freely published in his native country.
331 False ['Tulum'] The Mayan Monkey Hostel is known for being a trendy place along the Riviera Maya. It's popular among travelers for its vibrant atmosphere, social events, and modern amenities that cater to a younger, more budget-conscious crowd. The hostel often features communal areas designed to encourage interaction among guests, as well as offering private rooms and dormitories. Additionally, it may provide services such as free Wi-Fi, a swimming pool, bar, and organized activities or tours.

The Itza Hotel Akumal, while not a hostel, is another accommodation option in the area that offers a different experience, likely catering to those looking for a bit more privacy and upscale amenities. It's situated in the quieter town of Akumal, known for its beautiful beaches and sea turtle population.

Both options provide different experiences that cater to the diverse preferences of travelers visiting the Riviera Maya.
332 True ['Stefan Urquelle'] In season 5 of "Family Matters," Jaleel White's character, Steve Urkel, takes an experimental chemical transformation elixir and becomes Stefan Urquelle, his suave and sophisticated alter ego. Stefan is the polar opposite of Steve in terms of personality and style; he is smooth, confident, and debonair, often wearing stylish suits and speaking with a deeper voice. This transformation was a recurring storyline in the show, with Steve occasionally turning into Stefan and dealing with the consequences of his dual identity.
333 True ['Massachusetts'] Charles Sumner, a prominent United States Senator from Massachusetts, was a leading advocate for the abolition of slavery and a member of the Free Soil Party before becoming a Republican. On May 22, 1856, he was brutally attacked on the floor of the United States Senate by Representative Preston Brooks of South Carolina, a pro-slavery Democrat.

The attack was in response to a speech Sumner had given three days earlier, entitled "The Crime Against Kansas," in which he harshly criticized the pro-slavery forces in Kansas and famously insulted Brooks' relative, Senator Andrew Butler of South Carolina. Sumner's injuries were severe, and he did not return to his Senate seat for three years, although he remained in office and eventually recovered enough to continue his political career. The caning of Charles Sumner became a symbol of the growing sectional tensions that would eventually lead to the American Civil War.
334 True ['Proulx'] The quote 'The summer range lay above the tree line on the forest service land on Brokeback Mountain' is from the short story "Brokeback Mountain" by Annie Proulx. The story was first published in The New Yorker in 1997 and later included in Proulx's collection of short stories titled "Close Range: Wyoming Stories" in 1999. "Brokeback Mountain" gained widespread recognition when it was adapted into an acclaimed film of the same name in 2005, directed by Ang Lee and starring Heath Ledger and Jake Gyllenhaal. The story explores the complex emotional and romantic relationship between two men, Ennis del Mar and Jack Twist, over the course of several decades.
335 False ['Winnebago'] Let's fire up our RV and head for Lake Chippewa in Wisconsin! Also known as Lake Wisconsin, it is one of the state's largest inland lakes and is a popular destination for fishing and recreation. The lake is known for its populations of northern pike and largemouth bass, among other species.

Lake Chippewa is actually a flowage on the Wisconsin River, created by the construction of a dam in the early 20th century. It stretches for about 15 miles and covers over 13,000 acres, offering plenty of space for fishing, boating, and other water activities.

While Lake Chippewa is not technically an island lake, it does have several large islands within it, and the area around the lake features many smaller lakes with islands, which might be what you're thinking of. The largest island in Wisconsin is actually in Lake Superior and is called Madeline Island, which is part of the Apostle Islands archipelago.

For a great RV camping and fishing experience with access to northern pike and largemouth bass, Lake Chippewa is an excellent choice within Wisconsin. Remember to check local regulations for fishing licenses and seasons, and enjoy your outdoor adventure!
336 False ['Brancusi'] 1908 is often cited as the year when the Romanian sculptor Constantin Brâncuși began working on one of his most famous sculptures, "The Kiss." However, it is important to note that Brâncuși created multiple versions of "The Kiss" throughout his career, with the earliest versions being carved in wood rather than stone.

The first version of "The Kiss" was completed around 1907-1908 and was carved in limestone. Brâncuși's work on "The Kiss" evolved over time, and he created several variations in different materials, including limestone, marble, and bronze. Each version of "The Kiss" simplified the forms further, moving away from the detailed realism of his earlier works and towards the abstract, minimalist style for which he is renowned.

One of the most famous stone versions of "The Kiss" is the 1913 marble sculpture, which is characterized by its smooth, simplified forms and the interlocking shapes of the two figures. This particular piece exemplifies Brâncuși's transition to modernism and his pursuit of essential forms, capturing the essence of the intimate moment between two lovers.

Brâncuși's "The Kiss" is considered a masterpiece of modern sculpture and has had a profound influence on the development of abstract art. His exploration of the theme of "The Kiss" throughout his career reflects his ongoing quest to capture the essence of human emotion and connection through simplified, yet powerful, forms.
337 True ['Boyhood'] Lorelei Linklater aged from 9 to 21 over the 12-year shoot of the film "Boyhood" directed by her father, Richard Linklater. The movie is unique in that it was filmed intermittently from 2002 to 2013, capturing the natural aging of the cast, particularly focusing on the character Mason, played by Ellar Coltrane, as he grows from age 6 to 18. Lorelei played Mason's sister, Samantha, in the film, which provides a realistic portrayal of growing up by showing the characters age in real-time over the course of the narrative.
338 True ['Crossing the Bar'] Tennyson's poem about a ferry trip that has become an idiom for dying is "Crossing the Bar." The poem reflects on the journey from life to death, using the metaphor of crossing a sandbar between the tide of life and the boundless deep of death. The final line of the poem, "Sunset and evening star, / And one clear call for me!" is often associated with the idea of a peaceful transition from this world to the next. The phrase "crossing the bar" has since become a euphemism for death, suggesting the final voyage from life into the unknown.
339 True ['Bhutan'] You land manually in daylight only at Paro Airport in the Kingdom of Bhutan. Paro Airport is known for its challenging approach and landing, as it is surrounded by high mountains and requires pilots to navigate through a narrow valley before landing. Bhutan is a small landlocked country located in the Eastern Himalayas between India and China, and Thimphu is its capital city. Due to the complexity of flying into Paro, only a limited number of pilots are certified to land there, and flights are often restricted to daylight hours and good weather conditions.
340 True ['Frankfurter'] The Vienna-born man who was the third Jewish Supreme Court justice is Felix Frankfurter. He was appointed to the Supreme Court by President Franklin D. Roosevelt in 1939 and served until 1962. Frankfurter was known for his strong advocacy of judicial restraint and his adherence to the principle that courts should not substitute their own judgments for those of the legislative and executive branches.

Louis Brandeis, the first Jewish Supreme Court justice, was appointed by President Woodrow Wilson in 1916 and served until 1939. Brandeis was a renowned advocate for social justice and privacy rights, and his jurisprudence had a significant impact on American law, particularly in the areas of free speech and the right to privacy.

A dual biography that covers both Louis Brandeis and Felix Frankfurter would explore their lives, legal careers, and their tenures on the Supreme Court, as well as their contributions to American jurisprudence and the ways in which their Jewish heritage may have influenced their perspectives and legal philosophies.
341 True ['atom'] In the early 1900s, the "Plum Pudding" model, also known as the Thomson model, was proposed by J.J. Thomson to describe the internal structure of the atom. According to this model, the atom was thought to consist of a positively charged sphere with negatively charged electrons (compared to "plums") embedded within it, much like raisins in a plum pudding.

This model was replaced by the planetary model, which is more commonly known as the Rutherford model. Ernest Rutherford, along with his colleagues Hans Geiger and Ernest Marsden, conducted the famous gold foil experiment in 1909, which demonstrated that atoms have a small, dense, positively charged nucleus with electrons orbiting around it at a distance, similar to planets orbiting the sun. This discovery led to the development of the nuclear model of the atom, which later evolved into the modern quantum mechanical model as scientists like Niels Bohr and others further refined our understanding of atomic structure.
342 False ['Nikkei'] 日本のダウジョーンス産業平均指数に相当するものは、「日経平均株価」または「日経225」と呼ばれています。これは、東京証券取引所で上場している225の代表的な株式会社の株価の平均を示す指数で、日本の株式市場の状態を反映しています。日経225は、日本国内外の多くの投資家によって注目されており、日本の経済状態や株式市場の健全性を評価するための重要な指標となっています。
343 True ['Aeschylus'] In Jacques Rivette's film "Out 1" (also known as "Out 1: Noli Me Tangere"), the actors are rehearsing for a production of "Seven Against Thebes," a tragedy written by the ancient Greek playwright Aeschylus. "Seven Against Thebes" is one of the three plays in Aeschylus' Theban trilogy, which also includes "Laius," "Oedipus," and "Seven Against Thebes." The play focuses on the conflict between Eteocles and Polynices, the sons of Oedipus, who end up fighting against each other for control of Thebes. This play is central to the narrative of "Out 1," as the rehearsals and the themes of the play reflect and intertwine with the film's own narrative and characters.
344 False ['connoisseur'] The 11-letter word for a lover of the arts that comes from the French word for 'know' is "cognoscenti." This term is borrowed from the Italian word "cognoscente," which means a person who has superior knowledge and understanding of the arts, literature, or science. The Italian term itself is derived from the Latin "cognoscere," meaning "to know," which is cognate with the French "connaître," also meaning "to know." The plural form "cognoscenti" is often used to refer to a group of people who are knowledgeable and appreciative of the cultural arts.
345 True ['Mumbai'] Rudyard Kipling was born in Bombay, which is now known as Mumbai, in British India on December 30, 1865. The exact location of his birthplace was a bungalow in the Camp area of Bombay, which was a part of the British cantonment at the time.

Today, the bungalow where Kipling was born no longer stands, but the area has seen various developments over the years. The Sir J.J. School of Art, one of the oldest art schools in India, is located in the Fort campus near the area where Kipling was born. The school was founded in 1857 and has been an influential institution in the field of art education in India.

While the art school does not stand on the exact spot of Kipling's birthplace, it is in the vicinity of where the bungalow once stood in the city that has grown into a vast metropolis. Mumbai has changed significantly since Kipling's time, with extensive urban development and the expansion of its infrastructure and cultural institutions.
346 True ['The Little Foxes'] The "Small" Lillian Hellman drama you're referring to is "The Little Foxes." This play, which premiered on Broadway in 1939, is set in the South at the turn of the 20th century and focuses on the ruthless and ambitious Hubbard family. The title is derived from Chapter 2, Verse 15 in the Song of Solomon, which reads, "Take us the foxes, the little foxes, that spoil the vines: for our vines have tender grapes."

The play centers on Regina Giddens and her two brothers, Oscar and Ben, who are all determined to amass wealth and power. They conspire to build a cotton mill, regardless of the moral costs. Regina is particularly driven, as she is dependent on her wealthy, dying husband Horace for financial support and longs for economic independence. The drama explores themes of greed, corruption, and the struggle for power within the family and in society at large.

"The Little Foxes" is one of Hellman's most famous works and has been revived on Broadway multiple times, as well as adapted into a film in 1941, directed by William Wyler and starring Bette Davis as Regina.
347 False ['Histrionic'] 1932 was a significant year in American politics as it was the year Franklin D. Roosevelt (FDR) was elected President of the United States. The article you're referring to likely discusses one of FDR's key attributes that contributed to his political success: his ability to connect with the American public through his oratory skills and his use of radio to communicate directly with the people.

FDR's "Fireside Chats," which began after he took office in 1933, were a series of radio addresses that allowed him to speak informally and intimately to the nation. This was a novel approach at the time, and it helped him to explain his policies, reassure the public during the Great Depression, and build support for the New Deal programs.

The "Unexpected" ability mentioned in the article could be referring to FDR's skillful use of this new medium to bypass traditional media and political intermediaries, thereby establishing a direct line of communication with the American people. This approach was indeed dramatic and proved to be a powerful political tool, as it fostered a sense of personal connection and trust between the president and the citizens.

The quote, "The Dramatic is not without value in Politics," acknowledges the importance of dramatic flair and effective communication in political leadership. FDR's ability to employ drama and empathy in his speeches and radio addresses helped him to lead the country through one of its most challenging periods and solidified his legacy as one of the greatest American presidents.
348 True ['Kafka'] The future author of unsettling tales who became a man at his Bar Mitzvah on June 13th, 1896, in Prague is Franz Kafka. Kafka was born into a middle-class Jewish family in the Austro-Hungarian Empire, and he is known for his profound and enigmatic works that explore themes of alienation, existential anxiety, and the absurdity of bureaucracy.

Some of his most famous works include "The Metamorphosis," "The Trial," and "The Castle." Kafka's writing is characterized by its surreal and often nightmarish qualities, which have led to the term "Kafkaesque" being used to describe situations that are complex, bizarre, and overwhelming, much like the experiences of his characters. Despite his relatively short life—he died at the age of 40 in 1924—Kafka's influence on literature and popular culture has been immense, and his work continues to be widely read and analyzed.
349 True ['Maxwell'] The character who uses his "Silver Hammer" to take out various individuals, including a quizzical Joan, an annoyed school teacher, and even the judge at his trial, is Maxwell Edison, a fictional person mentioned in the Beatles' song "Maxwell's Silver Hammer," which was written by Paul McCartney. The song is featured on the Beatles' 1969 album "Abbey Road."

The lyrics of the song tell the story of Maxwell Edison, who is described as a medical student with a somewhat macabre habit of using his silver hammer to cause harm to people who annoy or challenge him. The song is whimsical in nature, with a cheerful melody that contrasts with the dark subject matter of the lyrics. It's a classic example of McCartney's penchant for writing songs that combine lighthearted music with more serious or quirky themes.
350 True ['Morgan'] Let's raise a glass of branded rum to Captain Henry Morgan, the infamous Welsh privateer who became the deputy governor of Jamaica in 1674. Despite his early career as a buccaneer, which included raids on Spanish settlements in the Caribbean, Morgan managed to transition into a more respectable role within the English colonial administration. His life and exploits have become the stuff of legend, and he is often associated with the romanticized image of the swashbuckling pirate, although he was technically a privateer working under the authority of letters of marque. Cheers to Captain Morgan!
351 True ['Lincoln'] Abraham Lincoln, the 16th President of the United States, died on April 15, 1865. He was assassinated by John Wilkes Booth at Ford's Theatre in Washington, D.C., the night after General Robert E. Lee surrendered to General Ulysses S. Grant, effectively ending the American Civil War.

Lincoln's portrait is featured on the U.S. $5 bill, which is one of the reasons why his death is often associated with currency. His legacy includes the preservation of the Union, the abolition of slavery, and the modernization of the U.S. economy. His death was a significant event in American history and is commemorated each year on the day of his assassination.
352 True ['Maurier'] "The Birds" is a novella by British author Daphne du Maurier, first published in her 1952 collection "The Apple Tree." The story was later adapted into a famous and frightening film of the same name by director Alfred Hitchcock in 1963. Hitchcock's adaptation, while maintaining the central premise of birds turning against humans, differs significantly from du Maurier's original story in terms of plot and character development. The film has since become a classic in the horror and thriller genres and is considered one of Hitchcock's masterpieces.
353 True ['Haydn'] The music of Germany's national anthem, "Das Deutschlandlied" (The Song of Germany), was composed by Joseph Haydn. The melody was originally written for the poem "Gott erhalte Franz den Kaiser" (God Save Emperor Francis), which was a birthday ode for Emperor Francis II of the Holy Roman Empire in 1797. The poem was written by Lorenz Leopold Haschka.

The tune composed by Haydn became very popular and was later adopted for the national anthem of Germany. The first verse of the "Deutschlandlied," with lyrics by August Heinrich Hoffmann von Fallersleben, was officially adopted as the national anthem in 1922 during the Weimar Republic. After World War II, only the third verse was used as the national anthem of West Germany and, after reunification in 1990, as the anthem of the reunited Germany. The third verse begins with the line "Einigkeit und Recht und Freiheit" (Unity and Justice and Freedom), and it is this verse that is sung on official occasions.
354 False ['Endorphins'] Plain and simple, giving someone a hug can release several hormones that contribute to feelings of happiness and well-being. The hormone that is named in part for a narcotic is oxytocin, sometimes referred to as the "love hormone" or "cuddle hormone." Oxytocin is associated with bonding, trust, and relationship-building. It's released in response to physical touch, including hugging, which can lead to feelings of calmness and closeness with others.

In addition to oxytocin, hugging can also increase levels of other feel-good hormones such as dopamine and serotonin, which are neurotransmitters that can help regulate mood and promote feelings of pleasure and happiness. These hormonal releases can contribute to reducing stress, lowering blood pressure, and improving overall mental and physical health.
355 True ['Polley'] The Canadian who wrote and directed "Women Talking" is Sarah Polley. She is an acclaimed actress, writer, and director known for her work in both film and television. "Women Talking," released in 2022, is based on the novel of the same name by Miriam Toews and explores the reactions of a group of women in an isolated religious community as they grapple with the aftermath of sexual assault. Polley has received critical acclaim for her work on the film, including an Academy Award nomination for Best Adapted Screenplay.
356 False ['occlusion'] In medicine, the term that describes the complete or partial obstruction of a blood vessel, especially an artery, is "thrombosis." Thrombosis occurs when a blood clot (thrombus) forms within a blood vessel, hindering or blocking the flow of blood. This can lead to serious medical conditions such as heart attack, stroke, or pulmonary embolism, depending on the location of the blockage.

There are two main types of thrombosis:

1. **Arterial thrombosis**: This occurs in an artery and can lead to conditions such as myocardial infarction (heart attack), stroke, or peripheral artery disease.

2. **Venous thrombosis**: This occurs in a vein and includes conditions such as deep vein thrombosis (DVT), which typically affects the legs, and pulmonary embolism (PE), which occurs when a clot breaks free and travels to the lungs.

Risk factors for thrombosis include prolonged immobility, surgery, certain medications (like oral contraceptives), pregnancy, obesity, smoking, and underlying medical conditions such as cancer or genetic clotting disorders. Prevention and treatment of thrombosis often involve the use of anticoagulant medications (blood thinners) and, in some cases, surgical interventions to remove or bypass the clot.

---

microsoft/WizardLM-2-8x22B
306 T
51 F
85.7 %
